


Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited, Mumbai - Petroleum Products and Petroleum Chemical


































144188195215245280


Chemicals, Dyes & Solvents
Petroleum and Petrochemical Products
Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited



Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited Mahul, Mumbai, Maharashtra 








Send SMS







Send E-mail














XWe are here to help! Save time and let us provide youwith verified contactsYour Contact DetailsInvalid InputEnter product/service nameProvide any specific details about : 'Product/Service required', 'Quality', 'Standard', 'Size' etc...Invalid Mobile NumberMobile NumberInvalid E-mail IDEmail IDKindly enter full nameFull Name                         ConvenientCompetitiveQuotesChoice ofSuppliersPaymentProtection  








Deals in petroleum and petroleum products.




Product Range
 Petroleum ProductsAsk For Price Petroleum ChemicalAsk For Price Calcined Petroleum CokeAsk For Price Petroleum Testing EquipmentAsk For Price 
Contact Us

Tell Us What Are You Looking For?


    Website:
From:Processing...From:




Reach Us
Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited
Gmap
Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited
Mahul, Mumbai-400074, Maharashtra, India
D. Shrri Kumar
Send SMS 
Send E-MAIL
Our Company
Contact Us

Share Us: 








Invalid Input





Enter product/service name









Please enter Mobile Number





Mobile Number






Invalid Email ID






 Email ID



Invalid Email ID



 

Full Name 





Your Contact Information 
                









Provide any specific details  about : 'Product/Service required', 'Quality','Standard','Size' etc...





Convenient
               

Competitive Quotes
               

Choice of Suppliers
               

Payment Protection 
               








































Recommended CompaniesPetroleum EtherPetroleum EtherRs 10,000 / KilogramBy: A. B. Enterprises Contact Supplier TBC PetrochemicalsTBC PetrochemicalsBy: Solvay Ask Price Nitrate Nitrite/Ortho Oxalate Oxide/Photo ResistNitrate Nitrite/Ortho Oxalate...By: Pruthvi Chemicals Ask Price Related Categories Petroleum Chemical











X




  BPCL:Natl India Stock Quote - Bharat Petroleum Corp Ltd - Bloomberg Markets                     



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  Bharat Petroleum Corp Ltd   BPCL:IN   Natl India        485.60INR   14.45   3.07%     As of 7:19 AM EDT 8/1/2017     Open   472.00    Day Range   472.00 - 486.95    Volume   3,606,723    Previous Close   471.15    52Wk Range   363.12 - 513.23    1 Yr Return   28.58%                   


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Open   472.00    Day Range   472.00 - 486.95    Volume   3,606,723    Previous Close   471.15    52Wk Range   363.12 - 513.23    1 Yr Return   28.58%    YTD Return   17.42%    Current P/E Ratio (TTM)   10.05    Earnings per Share (INR) (TTM)   48.34    Market Cap (t INR)   1.053    Shares Outstanding  (b)   2.169    Price/Sales (TTM)   0.47    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   0.27%        Sector Energy   % Price Change +0.21%     Industry Energy   % Price Change +0.21%                    Related Videos  There are currently no related videos for this ticker. Please check back later.    Company News Press Releases   There are currently no news stories for this ticker. Please check back later.     6/19/2017   Alpha Olefins Market 2017-2027     5/29/2017   Terminal Management System Market Worth 1097.7 Million USD by 2023     5/9/2017   Praj Successfully Demonstrates its Cellulosic Ethanol Technology     5/9/2017   Praj Successfully Demonstrates its Cellulosic Ethanol Technology     5/9/2017   Praj Successfully Demonstrates its Cellulosic Ethanol Technology     2/23/2017   HSBC Security Services: Early Repurchase(s)     2/23/2017   HSBC Security Services: Early Repurchase(s)    There are currently no press releases for this ticker. Please check back later.      Profile   Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited explores for and refines crude oil. The Company manufactures petroleum, petroleum products, lubricants, liquefied petroleum gas, aromatics like benzene and toluene, and other related products. Bharat has retail outlets throughout the country.    Address  Bharat Bhavan4 & 6 Currimbhoy RoadBallard Estate, Mumbai, 400 001India   Phone  91-22-2271-3000   Website   www.bharatpetroleum.com     Executives Board Members    D Rajkumar  Chairman/Managing Director    Akhilesh Kumar Ambasht  Chief Vigilance Officer    Y V Apte  Chief Procurement Ofcr:Refineries    Ashok K Gupta  Chief Procurement Ofcr:Mktg    S V Kelkar  Chief Manager:Employee     Show More         Stock Market, Share Market Live Updates | BSE NSE Sensex Nifty - Stock Market News, SENSEX, Forex & Commodity News IndiaNever miss a great news story!Get instant notifications from Economic TimesAllowNot nowYou can switch off notifications anytime using browser settings.SECTIONSET APPSET Android AppET iPhone AppET iPad AppET Wealth Android AppET Blackberry AppET Nokia AppET Markets Android AppET Markets iPhone AppET Money Android AppENGLISHहिन्दीગુજરાતીE-PAPERSIGN-INFOLLOW USFACEBOOKTWITTERYOUTUBELINKEDINGOOGLE PLUSRSSMarketsLATEST NEWSSebi forms committee on fair market conductRupee rallies 12 paise to 2.5-month high on RBI rate cut hopesEIH Q1 net profit at Rs 9.48 croreJSW Steel Q1 net profit falls 43% to Rs 624 crorePiramal Enterprises Q1 net profit up 43% to Rs 247.46 croreIndia refiners outshine Asia peers with new output, rising local demandETMarkets Evening Podcast: Is sky the limit for Dalal Street now?Marico Q1 net profit falls 16% on higher input costsWestlife Development posts marginal net profit for June quarterET Home›Markets04:05 PM | 01 Augmarket statsSENSEX32,57560.23NIFTY 5010,11537.55GOLD (MCX) (Rs/10g.)28,510-47.00USD/INR64.07-0.11PortfolioLoading...Select Portfolio and Asset Combination for Display on Market BandSelect PortfolioSelect Asset ClassStocksMFETFShow MoreCREATE PORTFOLIOADD INVESTMENT
                    	Download ET MARKETS APP
                    Get ET Markets in your own languageDOWNLOAD THE APP NOW+91CHOOSE LANGUAGEENGENG - EnglishHIN - हिन्दीGUJ - ગુજરાતીMAR - मराठीBEN - বাংলা KAN - ಕನ್ನಡORI - ଓଡିଆTEL - తెలుగుTAM - தமிழ்Drag according to your convenienceET NOW RADIOET NOWTIMES NOWOpps...we are facing some technical problem with the live price data, we are working to resolve the sameMarkets NewsNewsIPORecosExpert ViewExpert ViewPaathshalaMorning BriefEvening BriefTop StoriesMost ReadVideosJust In PodcastView MoreView MoreView MoreView MoreTech view: Nifty forms 'Hanging Man' pattern; next stop 10,200This sideways move suggested traders were awaiting the monetary policy outcome.Is sky the limit for Dalal Street now? Listen nowBeware! These 70 stks are ready to go downhillF&O watch: Every small decline in the Nifty50 being bought intoNifty has to continue to hold above 10,050 to witness a upward move towards 10,200 & 10,250.After Hours: Auto stks zoom, TechM lifts IT packCochin Shipyard IPO subscribed 92% on Day 1Markets are heading for bubble; burst may come anytime soonIf you are a value focused investor, you do really scramble around for value in these markets.Why Venezuelan equities are the ultimate puzzleSIS IPO sails through; fully subscribed on Day 27K% return! How Eicher Motors beat Bajaj AutoRupee hits 2.5-mth high on RBI rate cut hopesBlog: Look who moved market on TuesdayIndian oil refiners outshine Asia peers in outputShow some grit, Mr Patel; cut rates by 50 bpsBSE names Dhirendra Swarup as chairmanIPO mart: Watch out for 6 upcoming issuesPower Grid reports 14% YoY rise in Q1 net profitSebi forms committee on fair market conductPBOC drains $4.6 bn in July via liquidity toolsView: D-St investors need to avoid animal spiritsView: Two long-term wealth creation ideasMarket MoversFinancial services to dominate for some timeAjay PiramalBetting on 2 long-term wealth creation ideasAshish KapurMarkets are heading for a bubblePramod Gubbi3 key stocks to be in focus todayYogesh MehtaGeneral direction of Modi's reforms has been positiveRandall KrosznerContinue to prefer largecaps over the mid and small cap...Daljeet Singh KohliBetting on domestic cyclicals for next 2 years Sanjay DongreBetting on 2 mid and small-cap wealth creation ideasRajesh AgarwalIndia has already become a 4% inflation economyPranjul BhandariAfter IPO is over, if Max is willing, we can start talk...Amitabh ChaudhryIIFL’s Abhimanyu Sofat on which stocks to steer clear o...Abhimanyu SofatFundamentals driving the market and not geopolitical de...James E GlassmanBULL'S EYE3,000% returns in 5 yrs! These 12 stocks have more steam leftThe stock price of tyre manufacture CEAT grew from Rs 95 to Rs 1,854 in five years.Give Nifty, take Doklam! Stellar show of Indian stocks leaves Chinese green in envyChinese media is suddenly talking a lot about the impressive 20% year-to-date surge in Nifty.$4.5 trillion investment talk creates a solid turf for multibagger huntersStock picker Porinju Veliyath bets infrastructure is a sure shot multibagger return opportunity.2,50,000% returns! These stocks made crorepatis out of small investorsThis consumer electronics company is an air-cooler manufacturer, and makes a variety of them.How GST is changing India Inc & unifying the country for greater goodIndia joins a group of over 160 countries that have embraced a unified tax policy.Had you picked these 15 stocks, you would have moved in step with NiftyThe stocks have been so steady that they still hold about a half of the total weightage in the in...Be careful when you buy stocks, don’t be an Abhimanyu of D-StInvestor should understand that they should pick quality stocks even in a bull market.Euphoria over Nifty at 10K means nothing; only sound investment lasts long!The bedrock of the investment should be such that money invested should work for investors.Want to make hot money? Check out these 10 ‘Cup and Handle’ stocksTechnical charts show that a stock with 'Cup and Handle' pattern is easy to identify.Markets VideosArvind Panagariya resigns as NITI Aayog vice chairmanSensex, Nifty turns choppy after hitting record highs; HDFC, ONGC top losersStocks in news : Max India, Reliance PowerSensex, Nifty and Nifty Bank hit fresh lifetime highWatch: Income tax return filing deadline extended to August 5It's final now: Snapdeal ends merger talks with Flipkart, will go soloSnapdeal-Flipkart deal falling apart after six months of hard negotiationsSensex rises over 100 points; Nifty above 10,000; L&amp;T rallies 4%Buy or Sell: Stock ideas by experts for July 31, 2017Powered by SlideshowProfit or lossTop NewsmakersThings you need to know about SIS IPOKey takeaways from RIL's 40th AGM5 stocks to bet on nowFintech jargons you must knowTop NewsmakersUpcoming IPOs you need to look out forWhat made news in today's sessionLatest Market StoriesMarkets Dashboard
										
													BSE
												
													NSE
												BSENSEStocks in NewsGainersLosersCommodity Gainers/Commodity Losers/ForexRupee rallies 12 paise to 2.5-month high on RBI rate cut hopes52W - High52W - LowTop Mutual FundsTop NPS Schemes NAV:   Trailing return:  in 1 Year
																ETFsIPOs: OpenQuarterly ResultsIncomePATET SPEEDRecommendationsOnly BuyerOnly SellerUpcoming Corporate ActionCurrency ConverterAmount ConvertUS DollarToIndian RupeeConvertSector PerformanceSectors Mkt. Cap (%chg)Decline/Advance< -2%-2% to < 0%0%> 0% to +2%> +2%ET Speed Community TalkHi Guest, Share news, views and links on markets with ET Community.Post as GuestNew User? Join NowLogin to PostPostWe will never share or display your Email.You will be notified, only if others like your post.Hi , share your views on Post as GuestPostGuest Post limit exceeded. Please wait forSECONDSTo enjoy uninterrupted posts Sign up now!Indices LIVEBSENSELoading...More>>My Watchlist My Portfolio Already member?Login NowNew to Market?Signup NowBSE Announcements LiveMore>>Recos for your stockLoading...Disclaimer: Views and recommendations given in this section are analysts' own and do not represent those of economictimes.com & ETMarkets.com. Please consult your financial advisor before taking any position in the stock/s mentioned.Similar News of Your InterestLoad More...Disclaimer: Views and recommendations given on this page are analysts' own and do not represent those of economictimes.com & ETMarkets.com. Please consult your financial advisor before taking any position in the stock/s mentioned.Get a QuoteBrowse CompaniesABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ|123456789Browse Mutual FundsABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ


Bharat Petroleum - Wikipedia






















 






Bharat Petroleum

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (April 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited
भारत पेट्रोलियम निगम लिमिटेड





Type

Public


Traded as
BSE: 500547
NSE: BPCL


Industry
Oil and gas


Headquarters
Mumbai, Maharashtra, India



Key people

D Rajkumar
(Chairman & Managing Director)


Products
Petroleum, natural gas, and other petrochemicals


Revenue
₹240,367 crore (US$37 billion) (2015)[1]



Operating income

₹9,777 crore (US$1.5 billion) (2015)[1]



Net income

₹5,082 crore (US$790 million) (2015)[1]


Total assets
₹44,866 crore (US$7.0 billion) (2015)[1]


Owner
Government of India (54.93%)



Number of employees

13,535 (2016)[1]


Website
www.bharatpetroleum.com


Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL) is an Indian state-controlled oil and gas company headquartered in Mumbai, Maharashtra. The Corporation operates two large refineries of the country located at Mumbai and Kochi. The company is ranked 358th on the Fortune Global 500 list of the world's biggest corporations as of 2016.[2]



Contents


1 History
2 Company History - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd
3 Operations
4 See also
5 References
6 External links



History[edit]
In 1889 during vast industrial development, an important player in the South Asian market was the Burmah Oil Company. Though incorporated in Scotland in 1886, the company grew out of the enterprises of the Chef Rohit Oil Company, which had been formed in 1871 to refine crude oil produced from primitive hand dug wells in Upper Burma.
In 1928, Asiatic Petroleum Company (India) started cooperation with Burma oil company. This alliance led to the formation of Burmah-Shell Oil Storage and Distributing Company of India Limited. Burmah Shell began its operations with import and marketing of Kerosene.
On 24 January 1976, the Burmah Shell was taken over by the Government of India to form Bharat Refineries Limited. On 1 August 1977, it was renamed Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited. It was also the first refinery to process newly found indigenous crude Bombay High.




BPCL petrol filling station near Nakirekal, Telangana, India


In 2003, following a petition by the Centre for Public Interest Litigation, the Supreme Court restrained the Central government from privatizing Hindustan Petroleum and Bharat Petroleum without the approval of Parliament.[3] As counsel for the CPIL, Rajinder Sachar and Prashant Bhushan said that the only way to disinvest in the companies would be to repeal or amend the Acts by which they were nationalized in the 1970s.[4] As a result, the government would need a majority in both houses to push through any privatization.[5]
Company History - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd[edit]
1928
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) traces its history to 1928 when the Burmah Shell Oil Storage & Distribution Company of India was incorporated in England to enter the petroleum products business in India. The business of the Company grew substantially given the international backing of Shell and it achieved the leadership position in India. In 1952, Shell and Burmah Oil Company set up Burmah Shell Refineries to set up a refinery in Mumbai. The entire operations of Burmah Shell in India were nationalised in 1976 and the Refinery and Marketing Companies were merged to form BPCL.
1952
- The Company was incorporated on 3 November 1952 under the name Burmahshell Refineries Limited (BSR). The Burmah Shell as Storage & Distributing Company of India, Ltd., a foreign company established in England in 1928 was carrying on in India the business of distributing and marketing petroleum products and for that paurpose established places in India.
1955
- The Company has a well established refinery at Mahul, Chembur (Mumbai) which has commissioned in January.
- The company's refinery in Bombay was commissioned in 1955. It introduced LPG as a cooking fuel to the Indian home and all along, it went beyond selling petroleum, to educate the customer.
1976
- The companies name changed to Bharat Refineries Limited (BRL) on 12th, February 1976.
1977
- Companies name changed to its present name (BPCL) on 1 August.
1979
- Pursuant to an agreement dated 23.12.79 bet ween Govt. of India and BSM, the Shell Petroleum Co. Ltd., the Burmah Oil Co. Ltd., and the Burmah Shell Refineries Ltd., the Govt. of India acquired 100% equity share holdings of BSR on 24 January 1976. Simultaneously also acquired the right to title and interest and liabilities of BSM in relation to its undertakings in India.
1992
- During the year the company commissioned 50 retail outlets including 9 in rural areas and 7 superior kerosene oil/light deisel oil dealerships. The total number of retail outlets/light diesel oil dealership at the end of the year stood at 4,090 and 928 respectively.
- During the year, 20% of the shares were sold by the govt. to various financial institutions and Mutual Funds. Thus presently the President of India holds 80% of the paid up capital.
1993
- During the year, the company installed microprocessor based digital integrated distributed control system in catalytic reformer and new solvent unit which replaced the pneumatic control system. Also installed advanced control system for catalytic control unit.
1994
- During the year, the corporation commissioned 124 retail outlets and 10 oil/light diesel oil dealership.
- On 25 February, a joint venture company `Bharat Oman Refineries Ltd' was incorporated. And was set up as a joint venture between Omen oil Co. Ltd and the Corporation.
- During the year, Bharat Shell Ltd. was promoted by the company and Shell Overseas Investments, B V Netherlands for marketing shell branded lubricants in the country.
1995
- During 95-96, a 6 MMTPA joint venture refinery being set up with Oman Oil Company Ltd. at Bina in M.P.
- A MOU was signed on March between the corporation and Pepsi Foods Ltd. pursuant to which customers cars drive upto select retail outlets for chilled pepsi distribution.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd., and Bank of Baroda have signed an MOU to launch the first Co-Branded Credit Card in the country which enables customers to buy petrol, diesel, lubricants and other regular commodities. The cards will carry BPCL and BOB logos and will have two categories - Premium and Regular. The cards can also be used by corporate houses as a facility to its executives for reimbursement of their fuel cost.
1996
- During the year, the corporation commissioned 61 retail outlets and 12 SKO/LDO dealerships. During the year Petronet India Ltd. was set for developing and laying a network of petroleum product pipelines in the country.
- During the year, LPG port terminal was commissioned at Okha in Gujarat, in October, with a storage capacity of 900 MT of LPG.
- The company embarked upon a strategic change plan in 1996. The organisation structure has been revamped and six Strategic Business Units have been created. The new structure is based on business processes, is flexible, more responsive to external changes, has fewer layers, and above all, ensures a much higher customer focus. 1997
- During the year corporation, has entered into a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) with the Ministry of Petroleum & Natural Gas (MOP&NG). The performance rating awarded to BPC was "Excellent" for the year ended March 31, 1996. - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd.(BPCL), has launched Apollo air stations at its petrol pumps in Mumbai. The company had signed a memorandum of understanding recently with Apollo Tyres to provide efficient air facility to customers through BPCL's retail network. - Sanghi Group of industries has signed a Memorandum of Understanding with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited. Under the agreement, BPCL will set up huge infrastructural facilities to ensure uninterrupted supply of fuels for various mega projects being undertaken by the Sanghi group including a cement plant, a petrochemical complex and a 100 per cent EOU spinning unit. - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd. (BPCL), is setting up a six million tonne per annum refinery at Bina, in Madhya Pradesh. The corporation also envisages a single point mooring and a crude oil terminal at Vadinar and a cross country crude oil pipeline from Vadinar to Bina. - ONGC is joining hands with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) for a Rs 2,552,-crore petrochemical project in Hazira, Gujarat. - An agreement to supply around 80,000 tonnes of naphtha per annum for the 230-MW combined cycle power project at Jegurupadu in East Godavari district of Andhra Pradesh, has been signed between GVK Industries Ltd and Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL). - The public sector Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) proposes to lay a pipeline from Cochin to Karur via Coimbatore to transport petrol, high speed diesel and kerosene. - The Gas Authority of India Ltd (GAIL) and Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) signed a memorandum of understanding (MoU) on September 9 for setting up a joint venture to supply pipeline cooking gas in the Capital. - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) and the UK-based global oil major - Shell, are likely to float a new company for setting up the seven million tonnes per annum (mtpa) grassroot refinery at Uttar Pradesh. - State-owned Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has made tentative plans to shut its 120,000 barrel-per-day (bpd) refinery in Mumbai in November or December 1998 for maintenance. - Between January and February, Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd had closed its crude distillation unit and 18,000 bpd fluid catalytic cracker. Its 12,000 bpd cracker was shut in May for 30–35 days. - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd is to increase its tankage capacity of petroleum products in the eastern region in the Ninth Plan by setting up new terminals involving an expenditure of about Rs 300 crores.
- The company is to set up new terminals at Budge Budge, Haldia and Alipurduar in West Bengal, Jashidih, Gaya, Barauni and Ranchi in Bihar, Balasore, Sambalpur, Rourkela, Rayagada and Paradeep in Orissa besides Lumding and Guwahati.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL), the second largest oil marketing public sector company, has signed a fuel supply agreement with Atria Power Corporation Ltd to generate 103 MW of power at Harihar, in its commitment to bring more power to Karnataka.
- It is also proposed to set up a hospital and build a residential colony in the 3500 acre land of the two projects.
1998
- The Karnataka Power Corporation Limited (KPCL) entered into a fuel supply agreement with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd for its 300-mW joint venture power project at Bidadi.
- The company will open five new, state-of-the-art, self servicing and automatic cut off nozzle facility petrol and diesel bunks in the city.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has entered into an agreement with Herdillia Chemicals Ltd for supply of 10,000 metric tonnes of naphtha for its proposed 5.5MW power project at Turbhe in Navi Mumbai. - Shell and BPCL will hold a 26 per cent stake each in the refinery project. The remaining 48 per cent will be held by institutions and the public. - The joint venture has received a letter of intent for setting up the refinery in Uttar Pradesh and government approval for direct foreign investment.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has launched its new lubricants in Calcutta from February 5.
- Shalivahana Power Corporation Ltd (SPCL) has signed a fuel supply agreement (FSA) with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) for the supply of furnace oil to its 33 MW mini-power plant to be set up at Ghatkesar.
- PIL is a 50:50 joint venture between Bharat Petroleum and Gujarat Gas.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has commissioned its Rs.450-crore Mumbai-Manmad pipeline.
- The Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd workers on April 7, observed strike throughout the country in protest against the managements reported move to damage the corporation.
- BPCL commissioned the first phase of its second coastal storage facility on the east coast at Haldia, West Bengal.
- BPCL is the only company among the three integrated refining and marketing companies - the others being HPCL and Indian Oil Corporation (IOC) - which has had a strong focus on marketing activities.
- BPCL (Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd.) has begun a New Marketing chapter with clear strategies and initiatives for Lubricants.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL) has tied up with Petronet India Limited, the oil-pipeline holding company, to form a joint venture for a 308-km pipeline from Kochi to Karur in Tamil Nadu.
- BPCL and Petronet India Ltd, will each take a 26 per cent equity stake, Cochin Refineries is expected to subscribe to 23 per cent of the equity and the balance 25 per cent will be held by other investors. The total equity will be Rs.140 crore with a 3:1 debt equity ratio.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has entered into in joint venture with Petronet (India) Ltd for the construction of a 308 km pipeline from Kochi in Kerala to Karur in Tamil Nadu.
- The company is India's second largest oil company in terms of market share. - BHARAT Petroleum Corporation Ltd proposes to set up a petrochemical complex, based on a naphtha cracker of 5,00,000-MTPA-ethylene capacity, using low aromatic naphtha available from indigenous/imported sources. It will be set up at a coastal location in Tamil Nadu. BPCL has obtained the "Letter of intent" from the Government of India for manufacture of the products. - BPCL is also setting up a three mtpa refinery at Numaligarh in Assam in a joint venture with IBP Co Ltd and the Government of Assam.
- BPCL has also successfully entered into fuel supply agreements with 22 independent power plants and four captive power plants for the supply of 1.1 mmtpa of naptha and 0.8 mmtpa of furnace oil.
- The company has commissioned the 250-km Mumbai-Manmad product pipeline, which has augmented its supply and distribution network.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) is the third largest oil refining and marketing company in the country.
- INDRAPRASTHA Gas Limited, a joint venture between Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) and the Gas Authority of India (GAIL) is set to revolutionalise transportation in New Delhi.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd has bagged the fuel supply contract for Kerala State Electricity Board's Kozhikode diesel power project at Nallalam.
1999
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) is setting up its LPG bottling plant in Hoskote Taluk near Bangalore.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has commissioned a hydrant fuelling system for aircraft at the Cochin International Airport (CIAL).
- BPCL has taken six per cent equity in the paid-up capital of the airport.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd's (BPCL) joint venture with Oman Oil Co. for setting up a six-million tonne refinery at Bina in Madhya Pradesh is expected to achieve financial closure within a month, said Mr. A. Sinha, BPCL's Finance Director.
- In an attempt to set up its naphtha-fired 200-MW project at top speed, the KPC Bidadi Power Corporation (KBPCL) entered into a fuel supply agreement (FSA) with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) for the supply of 25,0900 mtpa of naphtha.
- Jawaharlal Nehru Port Thrust (JNPT) and Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) signed a license agreement for development of a liquid cargo jetty at Jawaharlal Nehru Port.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) is exploring the option of extending a crude pipeline from its Bina refinery in Madhya Pradesh to Allahabad where it proposes to set up another seven-million-tonne refinery. - The company proposes to construct a crude-oil terminal in Gujarat from where crude will be transported through a pipeline to Bina. - BPCL has introduced the `smart-card' technology at retail outlets in Chennai. - BPCL has also entered into a marketing agreement with Reliance Petroleum Ltd for distributing 25 per cent of its production. - ICICI Bank Ltd has tied up with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) to install off-site ATMs at the company's petrol outlets.
2000
- The Company has entered into a Memorandum of Understanding with the ministry of petroleum & Natural gas for the year 2000-01. The Company has been awarded the `Excellent' rating and has been among the top-10 MoU-signing public sector companies in 1998-99.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd., the Country's second-largest oil company, announced the launch of its `Petro Card' for the retail market in Gujarat.
- Burger giant McDonald's has tied up with oil major Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) to open and run restaurants at selected petrol pumps across the country.
- The Company is mulling over a voluntary retirement scheme for its 3000-odd middle-level management staff.
- The Company signed a Transport Service Agreement with Gas Authority of India Ltd on 1 August.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd., in association with Iftex Petrochemicals Ltd., launched `Bharat Iftex', a co-branded multi functional additive (MFA).
- The Company will issue bonus shares in the ratio of one equity share for every one share held.
- SurfGold.com, the loyalty solution provider an alliance with Bharat Petroleum as one of its major Indian redemption partners.
- The Workers, of the Marketing Division of the Company went on one-day strike on 19 October affecting the normal operations in offices and establishments at Mumbai, Kandla, Solapur, Jalgaon, Jabalpur and Manmad.
- Big Mac has tied up with Bharat Petroleum Corporation for a highway complex on the Delhi-Agra highway, near Mathura.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation has offer bonus equity to its shareholders at a ratio of one bonus share for every one share held.
- The Company has been presented the FICCI award 1999 - 2000 for 'Corporate initiatives in the field of rural developments'.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has launched yet another card product, SmartFleet, aimed at fleet owners and corporates.
- During 2000-01 the company issued bonus shares in the ratio of 1:1, thereby enhancing its equity capital to Rs 300 crore. Also Recently it acquired 55% stake in Kochi Refinery Limited (KRL) from the Government of India and 19% in Numaligarh Refinery Limited (NRL) from IBP.
The company has launched 'Smart fleet', a programme for fleet owners and corporates and the same received an enthusiastic response from over 2500 clients.
-The company has 'Petrocard', an customer loyalty programme, had enrolled over 2.25 lakh customers by theend of March 2001.
2001
- The Company has launched the co-branded SmartFleet card along with Tata Finance, a smart card targeted at vehicle fleet owners and corporates.
- BPCL has tied up with Quicky's, the global coffee chain, Pepsi Foods India and Kwality Walls for providing beverages soft drinks and ice-creams at its petrol pumps.
- Standard Chartered Bank, HDFC Bank and Bharat Petroleum Corporation have joined the eCash Forum which has been set up by the Smart Card Forum of India.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd. has proposed to acquire the entire equity share holding of the Government of India in Kochi refineries Ltd. - Shell Aviation Ltd has appointed Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) as the sole distributor for Shell brands of aero lubes in India. BPCL has signed a contract with Shell Aviation for distribution rights for the next five years.
-'In & Out', a convenience retailing proposition, was selectively launched in 14 retail outlets during the year. This proposition includes utility payments, courier service, ATMs, a coffee shop, music counters, impulse stores, etc.
2002
- S Vijayaraghavan appointed as Additional Director on Board of BPCL
-M B Lal Director (Refineries) relinquishes office from BPCL.
- Tata Engg, BPCL ties up to market co-branded lubricants.
- Mr U Sundararajan has retired from the office of the Chairman & Managing Director, BPCL. Mr S Behuria, Director (Marketing) has taken over as Chairman & Managing Director of BPCL w e f July 1, 2002.
- BPCL introduced premium grade petrol "Speed" in Mumbai.
- SCI tie-up with BPCL for crude transportation.
- BPCL introduced 5 kg cylinder for rural market.
- BPCL ties up with Cafe Coffee Day to open Cafe Coffee Day outlets in select In&Out BPCL petrol pumps.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd informed that Shri S Radhakrishnan, Executive Director (Marketing Coordination) has been appointed as Director on the Board of the company and he has taken over as Director (Marketing) with effect from November 1, 2002.
- Mr. Mukesh Rohatgi, Executive Director (Refinery) has been appointed as Director on the Board of the BPCL and he has taken charge as Director (Refineries) w.e.f. November 14, 2002. Mr. Naresh Narad, Special Secretary, Ministry of Petroleum & Natural Gas, Government Nominee Director on the Board of BPCL has relinquished the Directorship w.e.f. November 11, 2002 on his appointment as Secretary, Ministry of Heavy Industries & Public Enterprises.
- ALF ties up with BPCL to launch 'affinity cards'
2003
- The board of Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) is being restructured with the induction of four new non-executive directors. The directors, all professionals of long standing, are the former chairman of Indian Oil MA Pathan, former chairman of Indian Airlines PC Sen, former chairman of railway board BD Gupta and director of the Indian Institute of Management, Kozhikode, AH Kalro.
- BPCL & ONGC signs agreement to sale crude oil for a period of 2 years
- Bharat Petroleum (BPCL) has forged an alliance with Petrovietnam for the purpose of supplying 200,00 tonnes of naptha in the next 9 months.
- BPCL ties up with HLL for marketing durables, FMCG products via LPG outlets.
- BPCL launches 'Speed '93'
- Hyderabad: Bharat petroleum corporation Ltd (BPCL) has rolled out its new plan for Bharatgas customers. The new offer called 'Beyond LPG' was unveiled in twin cities which comes with value added services where customers can get the benefit of discounts ranging from 10-20 percnt on all FMCG branded utensils.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd has informed that Shri S Vijayaraghavan, Joint Secretary, Ministry of Petroleum & Natural Gas Government Nominee Director on the Board of the company has resigned from office of director wef September 2, 2003.
Dr P N Khandwalla, Shri P P Kaliaperumal & K Vasudeva Part Time Non Official directors have resigned from office of director wef September 4, 2003
Shri V D Gupta Shri P C Sen & A H Kalro are appointed as part-time non official directors of the company wef September 5, 2003.
-the company has launched premium petrol, 'Speed' on September 9 in Visakhapatnam. The premium petrol is priced marginally higher than the ordinary fuel. The fuel is for the new generation cars and two-wheelers.
- The company has tied up with Hindustan Lever Ltd and three other kitchenware brands for selling grocery items to its LPG customers through its distributor network. the consumers can order all HLL products besides kitchenware from Hawkins, Prestige and Nirlep from Bharatgas distributors in select cities.
-Formed a strategic pact with Honda Siel to help launch gensets and geysers that run on LPG.
-Shri A K Srivastava, Joint Secretary, Ministry of Petroleum & Natural Gas has been appointed as Director—BPCL bags third slot among `Top 10' in Asiamoney's corporate governance poll on Asian companies in the energy sector. And joined the club of a select few Asian companies.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) and Oil and Natural Gas Corporation (ONGC) signed an agreement to cooperate with each other through sharing of their core strengths for exploration and production, and downstream oil refining and marketing.
2003
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) successfully completes its first swap transaction, making it the first public sector oil company to enter into an interest rate derivative transaction
2004
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation is negotiating a five-year agreement with Reliance Industries to buy products from its Jamnagar refinery. A previous product-sourcing agreement between the two companies expires on March 31, 2004.
- IDBI Bank on January 15 said that it has entered into a business-to-business (B2B) e-commerce arrangement with oil major Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) to provide an automated payment and purchase process to the BPCL's corporate and industrial clients.
-BPCL signs an initial contract with Saudi Aramco
- Tie up with Tata Consultancy Services to provide medical advisory and counselling services at Ghar, the highway retailing initiative of BPCL.
-Kochi Refineries Ltd (KRL) signs a memorandum of understanding with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd regarding capacity utilisation and other production and performance parameters
-Forges alliance with E-Charge Tech Private Limited to distribute electronically pre-paid products like mobile cards, internet cards and calling cards, making it the first company in India to electronically distribute the pre-paid products
-- GAIL India Limited has signed two joint venture agreements with Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) for implementation of city gas projects in Kanpur and Pune -Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) opened Mak Lubeshoppe at Akkayyapalem here on July 29
-Bharat Petroleum has launched another brand `Hi Speed Diesel'
-BPCL forges alliance with poultry association in Namakkal
-Speed ties up with consortium to sponsor domestic motor racing
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has entered into a marketing tie-up with automobile manufacturer Tata Motors for marketing of engine oils as co-branded lubricants for their commercial vehicles
2005
- BPCL launches Speed 97, its new brand of high-octane petrol mixed with lubricant additives, meant to improve vehicle performance
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd has launched a new concept of `Vehicle Care Centres' at its retail outlets
-Madhya Pradesh Government signs a memorandum of understanding (MoU) with Bharat Oman Refineries Ltd to set up a six-million-tonne per annum refinery at Bina on May 6, 2005
2006
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has announced that the Company & MMTC have jointly decided to work together in the area of domestic and international marketing of hydro-carbon by leveraging their core business strength in the global commodity trading.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has announced that the Company has entered into an MOU with Petroleo Brasileiro SA (Petrobras),
-BPCL acquires first Nigerian Erha cargo
-BPCL has informed that Shri. D N Narasimha Raju, Joint Secretary, Ministry of Petroleum & Natural Gas (MoP&NG) has been reappointed as Additional Director effective December 18, 2006.
2007
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has informed that Prof N Venkiteswaran, has been appointed as Additional Director effective July 16, 2007.
-BPCL acquires interest in North Sea basin
-BPCL to offload 49-pc stake in Bharat Shell
2008
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has appointed Ms. Rama Bijapurkar and Shri. S K Barua as Additional Director w.e.f. May 20, 2008.
-BPCL venture to infuse Rs 2,200cr in bio-diesel project
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL) is mulling to establish a 5-Mw wind power farm in Andhra Pradesh.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd has unveiled a GPS-technology based vehicle tracking system for its 5,200 tanker trucks fleet.
2009
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has informed BSE that BPCL, Oman Oil Company (OOC) and Bharat Oman Refinery Ltd. (BORL) have signed an agreement on November 15, 2009 in Oman related to additional investment by OOC in BORL.
-BPCL Farm-in into the Nunukan PSC in Indonesia
2010
-Bharat Petroleum Corp Ltd (BPCL) stated that natural gas reserves have been discovered in a block off Mozambique where it has a minority stake.
-BPCL announces successful pre-salt flow test offshore Brazil
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) commissioned its international bunkering facilities at the Kochi port.
-BPCL enters into agreement with M/s. Norwest to acquire Shale Gas acreages in Australia"
-BPCL announces Major Natural Gas discovery in offshore Mozambique.
-BPCL discovers hydrocarbon in ultra deep water of Sergipe-Alagoas Basin, Brazil.
-BPCL announces Oil and Gas discovery in Offshore Indonesia
-BPCL appoints R K Singh as new BPCL chairman
-Bharat Petroleum walked away with two prestigious Communication Awards at the Golden Jubilee function of the Annual Association of Business Communicators of India (ABCI) Awards Nite held at the Taj Mahal Hotel
-BPCL won the Silver Award for our Inhouse Publication, Petro Plus and the Bronze Award for our Online Web Campaign
-Bharat Petroleum was awarded the 1st position under the Best Display in Raw Space category during a spectacular awards ceremony at the recently concluded Petrotech-2010 exhibition at Pragati Maidan, New Delhi. The theme this year was Global Energy Equilibrium.
-BPCL corporate website www.bharatpetroleum.in bagged the first prize in the category ‘Most user friendly website (editors choice) in the India eGov 2.0 Awards 2010.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd receives Green Business Leaders Award: 2009- 2010
-NDTV Recognizes BPCL With Prestigious Corporate Sustainability Report Award
-BPCL has secured 289th ranking during 2008-09 in the prestigious list of Fortune Global 500
2011
-Tyre manufacturer Goodyear India has entered into an agreement with PSU major Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd to open tyre care shops at some of their petrol pumps.
-BPCL discovered of oil and gas in Sergipe-Alagoas Basin, Brazil
2012 -BPCL 's Another major appraisal success in Offshore Mozambique for BPRL
-BPCL in Successful Flow Test Offshore Mozambique
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd informs that "BPRL Announces Extension of Exploration Success with New Discovery Area in Offshore Mozambique".
-BPCL invests Rs 75 cr to set up 22 kV substation at Kochi Refinery
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd. , second largest public sector oil marketing company, has signed an MOU with LG Chem South Korea for a Joint Venture to set up a petrochemical plant adjacent to its Kochi Refinery Complex.
-BPCL - Discovery of Hydrocarbons in Espirito Santo Bash, Offshore Brazil.
-BPCL - Discovery of Hydrocarbons in Cauvery Onland in Tamil Nadu
-State run Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL) has signed a Memorandum of Understanding (MoU) with Kerala government. Following the development, the state government would extend tax deferments to BPCL's Integrated Refinery Expansion Project (IREP) and petrochemical complex.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) is in planned investments of up to Rs 45,000 crore by 2017 towards upstream projects as well as downstream expansion.
-BPCL l discovers New oil in the deep water of Sergipe - Alagoas Basin, Brasil
-Bharat Petroleum Corp Ltd (BPCL) has managed to raise USD 500 million through a maiden 10 year bond issue. The move market the debut of BPCL into the international debt market and the proceeds from issue would be used by the company to fund its capital expenditure. -Bharat Petroleum Corporation has given the Bonus in the Ratio of 1:1
2013 -Petrobras completes formation test in Farfan area in Sergipe-Alagoas Basin, Brazil. -BPRL announces new natural gas discovery in offshore Mozambique. -Bharat gas introduces IVRS to book gas refill services. -BPCL begins IVRS refill booking system in Kerala -BPCL has launched Universal Tractor Transmission Oil MAK Trac Magic + which is a special formulated lubricant for tractors, in the market of Punjab and Haryana.
2014 -Bharat Petroleum - BPRL announces Increase in Recoverable Natural Gas Resources in Mozambique. -Bharat Petroleum - Gas Discovery in Cauvery Basin, India by ONGC - BPRL Consortium.
2015
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL) has received approval from Environment Ministry for Rs 4,588 crore expansion at its refinery facility -BPCL acquires additional shares of Petronet CCK Limited -BPCL,along with GAIL Gas, a 100% subsidiary of GAIL India will jointly develop the City Gas Distribution Network (CGD Network) in Haridwar district. -BPCL has commissioned a new art Crude Distillation Unit (CDU) in Mumbai.
Operations[edit]
Bharat Petroleum operates the following refineries:

Mumbai Refinery : Located near Mumbai, Maharashtra. It has a capacity of 13 million metric tonnes per year.[6]
Kochi Refineries : Located near Kochi, Kerala. It has a capacity of 15.5  million metric tonnes per year.[7]
Bina Refinery : Located near Bina, Sagar district, Madhya Pradesh. It has a capacity of 6  million metric tonnes per year. This refinery is operated by Bharat Oman Refineries Limited, a joint venture between Bharat Petroleum and Oman Oil Company.
Numaligarh Refinery : Located near Numaligarh, Golaghat district, Assam. It has a capacity of 3  million metric tonnes per year.

The company business is divided in seven SBUs( Strategic Business Units), like Retail, Lubricants, Aviation, Refinery, Gas, I&C and LPG.
They have popular Loyalty Program like Petrocard, Smartfleet.
See also[edit]

Rajiv Gandhi Institute of Petroleum Technology[8]

References[edit]



^ a b c d e "BPCL Annual Report". CNBC TV18. 
^ "Fortune Global 500 list". CNN Money. Retrieved 22 July 2016. 
^ SAMANWAYA RAUTRAY AND PHEROZE L. VINCENT (March 4, 2011). "Feather in cap for graft fighters". The Telegraph. Retrieved 2012-04-26. 
^ Ramakrishna, G. V. (2004). Two Score and Ten: My Experiences in Government. Academic Foundation. p. 301. ISBN 8171883397. 
^ Gopal Ganesh (2008). Privatisation And Labour Restructuring. Academic Foundation. p. 136. ISBN 8171886345. 
^ http://www.bharatpetroleum.in/EnergisingEnvironment/MumbaiRefinery.aspx?id=3
^ http://www.thehindubusinessline.com/news/national/integrated-expansion-project-boosts-bpclkochi-refinery/article9677392.ece
^ http://www.topnews.in/sonia-lay-foundation-rajiv-gandhi-petroleum-institute-rae-bareli-221339



External links[edit]

Official website
Bharat gas Booking

Bharat Gas






v
t
e


Major Indian companies






Economy of India
List of companies of India





Automotive



Ashok Leyland
Bajaj Auto
Eicher Motors
Hero MotoCorp
Hindustan Motors
Mahindra & Mahindra
TAFE
Tata Motors
TVS





Aerospace
& Defence



Bharat Electronics
DRDO
HAL
Ordnance Factories





Conglomerates



Aditya Birla
Adani
Avantha
Bajaj
Bharti
DCM
Essar
Essel
GMR
Godrej
GVK
Hinduja
ITC
Jaypee
Jindal
Kirloskar
JSW
L&T
Lanco
Mahindra
Muthoot
Murugappa
RP-Sanjiv Goenka Group
Ramoji
Reliance ADAG
Reliance
RPG
Sahara
Shapoorji Pallonji
Sun
Tata
TVS
Torrent
UB
Videocon
Wadia





Civil Aviation



Air India
IndiGo
Jet Airways
SpiceJet
GoAir





Consumer Goods
& Retail



Britannia Industries
Dabur
Flipkart
Future Group
Godrej Consumer
Hindustan Unilever
ITC
Nirma
Reliance Retail
Tata Global Beverages
Patanjali Ayurved
Emami





Energy &
Natural Resources



Bharat Petroleum
Cairn India
Chennai Petroleum
Coal India
GAIL
Essar Oil
Hindustan Petroleum
Indian Oil Corporation
National Aluminum
NHPC
NMDC
NLC
NTPC
Oil India
ONGC
Power Finance
Power Grid
RINL
Reliance Infrastructure
RECL
SCI
Vedanta Limited
Suzlon Energy
Tata Power





Finance



Andhra Bank
Axis Bank
Bank of Baroda
Bank of India
Canara Bank
Central Bank of India
HDFC Bank
ICICI Bank
IDBI Bank
ING Vysya Bank
Jammu & Kashmir Bank
Kotak Mahindra Bank
LIC
MUDRA Bank
Muthoot Finance Ltd
Punjab National Bank
SBI
Tamilnad Mercantile Bank
Union Bank of India
Yes Bank





Healthcare,
Pharmaceutical
& Biotech



Aurobindo Pharma
Cadila Healthcare
Cipla
Glenmark Pharmaceuticals
Dr. Reddy's
IDPL
IIL
Lupin
Sun Pharmaceutical





Manufacturing &
Heavy Industries



ACC
Ambuja
Apollo Tyres
Asian Paints Ltd
Bengal Chemicals and Pharmaceuticals
Bhushan
BHEL
DLF
Gammon India
Havells
HCC
Hindalco
India Cements
Jindal Steel
JSW
Mittal Steel Company
MRF
SAIL
Tata Steel
UltraTech





Information technology



HCL Technologies
Infosys
Tata Consultancy Services
Tech Mahindra
Wipro





Media



Sun Group
The Times Group
Living Media
Zee Entertainment Enterprises





Telecommunications



Aircel
Airtel
BSNL
Idea Cellular
Jio
Micromax Mobile
MTNL
Reliance Communications
Tata Communications






Benchmark: FY 2015-16 revenues of over US$ 1 billion










v
t
e


Central public sector companies of India






Air India
Balmer Lawrie
Bharat Electronics
Bharat Heavy Electricals Limited
Bharat Petroleum
Bharat Sanchar Nigam
BHAVINI
Cement Corporation of India
Coal India Limited
Dredging Corporation of India Limited
Electronics Corporation of India Limited
Food Corporation of India
GAIL
Hindustan Aeronautics Limited
India Trade Promotion Organisation
Indian Oil Corporation
Indian Rare Earths Limited
Life Insurance Corporation of India
Mazagon Dock Limited
MECON Limited
Mahanagar Telephone Nigam Limited
NTPC Limited
Nuclear Power Corporation of India
Oil and Natural Gas Corporation
Power Grid Corporation of India
Rashtriya Ispat Nigam
Rural Electrification Corporation Limited
State Bank of India
Steel Authority of India
Uranium Corporation of India












v
t
e


CNX Nifty companies of India






ACC
Ambuja Cements
Asian Paints Ltd
Axis Bank
Bajaj Auto
Bank of Baroda
BHEL
BPCL
Bharti Airtel
Cairn India
Cipla
Coal India
DLF
Dr. Reddy's Laboratories
GAIL
Grasim Industries
HCL Technologies
HDFC
HDFC Bank
Hero MotoCorp
Hindalco Industries
HUL
Infosys
ICICI Bank
IDFC
IndusInd Bank Ltd.
ITC Limited
Jindal Steel and Power
Kotak Mahindra Bank
L&T
Lupin
Mahindra & Mahindra
Maruti Udyog
NMDC
NTPC
ONGC
Power Grid Corporation
PNB
Reliance Industries
Sesa Sterlite Limited
SBI
Sun Pharmaceutical
TCS
Tata Motors
Tata Power
Tata Steel
Tech Mahindra
Ultratech Cement
Wipro
Zee Entertainment Enterprises












v
t
e


Public Sector Undertakings in India (List)



Maharatna



Bharat Heavy Electricals
Coal India
Gas Authority of India
Indian Oil Corporation
National Thermal Power Corporation
Oil and Natural Gas Corporation
Steel Authority of India





Navratna



Bharat Electronics
Bharat Petroleum Corporation
Container Corporation of India
Engineers India
Hindustan Aeronautics
Hindustan Petroleum Corporation
Mahanagar Telephone Nigam
National Aluminium Company
National Buildings Construction Corporation
National Mineral Development Corporation
Neyveli Lignite Corporation
Oil India
Power Finance Corporation
Power Grid Corporation of India
Rashtriya Ispat Nigam
Rural Electrification Corporation
Shipping Corporation of India





Miniratna-I



Airports Authority of India
Antrix Corporation
Balmer Lawrie
Bharat Coking Coal
Bharat Dynamics
Bharat Earth Movers
Bharat Sanchar Nigam
Bridge & Roof Company (India)
Central Warehousing Corporation
Central Coalfields
Chennai Petroleum Corporation
Cochin Shipyard
Dredging Corporation of India
Kamarajar Port
Garden Reach Shipbuilders and Engineers
Goa Shipyard
Hindustan Copper
Hindustan Newsprint
Hindustan Paper Corporation
HLL Lifecare
HSCC (India)
Housing and Urban Development Corporation
Indian Railway Catering and Tourism Corporation
Indian Rare Earths
Indian Renewable Energy Development Agency
Ircon International
India Tourism Development Corporation
India Trade Promotion Organisation


Kudremukh Iron Ore Company
Mazagaon Dock
Mahanadi Coalfields
Mangalore Refinery and Petrochemical
Mishra Dhatu Nigam
Metals and Minerals Trading Corporation of India
MOIL
MSTC
National Fertilizers
National Seeds Corporation
Nathpa Jhakri Dam
National Hydroelectric Power Corporation
North Eastern Electric Power Corporation
Northern Coalfields
Numaligarh Refinery
Oil and Natural Gas Corporation
Pawan Hans
Projects and Development India
Rail Vikas Nigam
RailTel Corporation of India
Rashtriya Chemicals & Fertilizers
RITES
Security Printing and Minting Corporation of India
South Eastern Coalfields
State Trading Corporation of India
Telecommunications Consultants India
THDC India
Water and Power Consultancy Services
Western Coalfields





Miniratna-II



Bharat Pumps & Compressors
Broadcast Engineering Consultants India
Central Mine Planning and Design Institute
Central Railside Warehouse Company
Educational Consultants India
Engineering Projects (India) Ltd.
FCI Aravali Gypsum and Minerals (India)
Ferro Scrap Nigam
HMT (International)
Indian Medicines and Pharmaceuticals Corporation
MECON
Mineral Exploration Corporation
National Film Development Corporation of India
National Small Industries Corporation
PEC
Rajasthan Electronics and Instruments






Information updated as of 26 October, 2014 by Ministry of Heavy Industries and Public Enterprises (India) • See also Public sector banks in India








 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Bharat_Petroleum&oldid=791930042"					
Categories: Government-owned companies of IndiaPublic sector in IndiaOil and gas companies of IndiaOil pipeline companiesCompanies based in MumbaiEnergy companies established in 1976Non-renewable resource companies established in 1976Indian companies established in 1976Companies nationalised by the Government of IndiaCNX NiftyCompanies listed on the National Stock Exchange of IndiaIndian brandsHidden categories: Articles needing additional references from April 2015All articles needing additional referencesUse Indian English from February 2016All Wikipedia articles written in Indian EnglishUse dmy dates from February 2016Pages using deprecated image syntaxPages using infobox company with unsupported parameters 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


DeutschفارسیFrançaisहिन्दीಕನ್ನಡमराठीଓଡ଼ିଆРусскийУкраїнська 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 23 July 2017, at 10:39.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Bharat Petroleum - Wikipedia






















 






Bharat Petroleum

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (April 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited
भारत पेट्रोलियम निगम लिमिटेड





Type

Public


Traded as
BSE: 500547
NSE: BPCL


Industry
Oil and gas


Headquarters
Mumbai, Maharashtra, India



Key people

D Rajkumar
(Chairman & Managing Director)


Products
Petroleum, natural gas, and other petrochemicals


Revenue
₹240,367 crore (US$37 billion) (2015)[1]



Operating income

₹9,777 crore (US$1.5 billion) (2015)[1]



Net income

₹5,082 crore (US$790 million) (2015)[1]


Total assets
₹44,866 crore (US$7.0 billion) (2015)[1]


Owner
Government of India (54.93%)



Number of employees

13,535 (2016)[1]


Website
www.bharatpetroleum.com


Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL) is an Indian state-controlled oil and gas company headquartered in Mumbai, Maharashtra. The Corporation operates two large refineries of the country located at Mumbai and Kochi. The company is ranked 358th on the Fortune Global 500 list of the world's biggest corporations as of 2016.[2]



Contents


1 History
2 Company History - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd
3 Operations
4 See also
5 References
6 External links



History[edit]
In 1889 during vast industrial development, an important player in the South Asian market was the Burmah Oil Company. Though incorporated in Scotland in 1886, the company grew out of the enterprises of the Chef Rohit Oil Company, which had been formed in 1871 to refine crude oil produced from primitive hand dug wells in Upper Burma.
In 1928, Asiatic Petroleum Company (India) started cooperation with Burma oil company. This alliance led to the formation of Burmah-Shell Oil Storage and Distributing Company of India Limited. Burmah Shell began its operations with import and marketing of Kerosene.
On 24 January 1976, the Burmah Shell was taken over by the Government of India to form Bharat Refineries Limited. On 1 August 1977, it was renamed Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited. It was also the first refinery to process newly found indigenous crude Bombay High.




BPCL petrol filling station near Nakirekal, Telangana, India


In 2003, following a petition by the Centre for Public Interest Litigation, the Supreme Court restrained the Central government from privatizing Hindustan Petroleum and Bharat Petroleum without the approval of Parliament.[3] As counsel for the CPIL, Rajinder Sachar and Prashant Bhushan said that the only way to disinvest in the companies would be to repeal or amend the Acts by which they were nationalized in the 1970s.[4] As a result, the government would need a majority in both houses to push through any privatization.[5]
Company History - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd[edit]
1928
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) traces its history to 1928 when the Burmah Shell Oil Storage & Distribution Company of India was incorporated in England to enter the petroleum products business in India. The business of the Company grew substantially given the international backing of Shell and it achieved the leadership position in India. In 1952, Shell and Burmah Oil Company set up Burmah Shell Refineries to set up a refinery in Mumbai. The entire operations of Burmah Shell in India were nationalised in 1976 and the Refinery and Marketing Companies were merged to form BPCL.
1952
- The Company was incorporated on 3 November 1952 under the name Burmahshell Refineries Limited (BSR). The Burmah Shell as Storage & Distributing Company of India, Ltd., a foreign company established in England in 1928 was carrying on in India the business of distributing and marketing petroleum products and for that paurpose established places in India.
1955
- The Company has a well established refinery at Mahul, Chembur (Mumbai) which has commissioned in January.
- The company's refinery in Bombay was commissioned in 1955. It introduced LPG as a cooking fuel to the Indian home and all along, it went beyond selling petroleum, to educate the customer.
1976
- The companies name changed to Bharat Refineries Limited (BRL) on 12th, February 1976.
1977
- Companies name changed to its present name (BPCL) on 1 August.
1979
- Pursuant to an agreement dated 23.12.79 bet ween Govt. of India and BSM, the Shell Petroleum Co. Ltd., the Burmah Oil Co. Ltd., and the Burmah Shell Refineries Ltd., the Govt. of India acquired 100% equity share holdings of BSR on 24 January 1976. Simultaneously also acquired the right to title and interest and liabilities of BSM in relation to its undertakings in India.
1992
- During the year the company commissioned 50 retail outlets including 9 in rural areas and 7 superior kerosene oil/light deisel oil dealerships. The total number of retail outlets/light diesel oil dealership at the end of the year stood at 4,090 and 928 respectively.
- During the year, 20% of the shares were sold by the govt. to various financial institutions and Mutual Funds. Thus presently the President of India holds 80% of the paid up capital.
1993
- During the year, the company installed microprocessor based digital integrated distributed control system in catalytic reformer and new solvent unit which replaced the pneumatic control system. Also installed advanced control system for catalytic control unit.
1994
- During the year, the corporation commissioned 124 retail outlets and 10 oil/light diesel oil dealership.
- On 25 February, a joint venture company `Bharat Oman Refineries Ltd' was incorporated. And was set up as a joint venture between Omen oil Co. Ltd and the Corporation.
- During the year, Bharat Shell Ltd. was promoted by the company and Shell Overseas Investments, B V Netherlands for marketing shell branded lubricants in the country.
1995
- During 95-96, a 6 MMTPA joint venture refinery being set up with Oman Oil Company Ltd. at Bina in M.P.
- A MOU was signed on March between the corporation and Pepsi Foods Ltd. pursuant to which customers cars drive upto select retail outlets for chilled pepsi distribution.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd., and Bank of Baroda have signed an MOU to launch the first Co-Branded Credit Card in the country which enables customers to buy petrol, diesel, lubricants and other regular commodities. The cards will carry BPCL and BOB logos and will have two categories - Premium and Regular. The cards can also be used by corporate houses as a facility to its executives for reimbursement of their fuel cost.
1996
- During the year, the corporation commissioned 61 retail outlets and 12 SKO/LDO dealerships. During the year Petronet India Ltd. was set for developing and laying a network of petroleum product pipelines in the country.
- During the year, LPG port terminal was commissioned at Okha in Gujarat, in October, with a storage capacity of 900 MT of LPG.
- The company embarked upon a strategic change plan in 1996. The organisation structure has been revamped and six Strategic Business Units have been created. The new structure is based on business processes, is flexible, more responsive to external changes, has fewer layers, and above all, ensures a much higher customer focus. 1997
- During the year corporation, has entered into a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) with the Ministry of Petroleum & Natural Gas (MOP&NG). The performance rating awarded to BPC was "Excellent" for the year ended March 31, 1996. - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd.(BPCL), has launched Apollo air stations at its petrol pumps in Mumbai. The company had signed a memorandum of understanding recently with Apollo Tyres to provide efficient air facility to customers through BPCL's retail network. - Sanghi Group of industries has signed a Memorandum of Understanding with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited. Under the agreement, BPCL will set up huge infrastructural facilities to ensure uninterrupted supply of fuels for various mega projects being undertaken by the Sanghi group including a cement plant, a petrochemical complex and a 100 per cent EOU spinning unit. - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd. (BPCL), is setting up a six million tonne per annum refinery at Bina, in Madhya Pradesh. The corporation also envisages a single point mooring and a crude oil terminal at Vadinar and a cross country crude oil pipeline from Vadinar to Bina. - ONGC is joining hands with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) for a Rs 2,552,-crore petrochemical project in Hazira, Gujarat. - An agreement to supply around 80,000 tonnes of naphtha per annum for the 230-MW combined cycle power project at Jegurupadu in East Godavari district of Andhra Pradesh, has been signed between GVK Industries Ltd and Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL). - The public sector Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) proposes to lay a pipeline from Cochin to Karur via Coimbatore to transport petrol, high speed diesel and kerosene. - The Gas Authority of India Ltd (GAIL) and Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) signed a memorandum of understanding (MoU) on September 9 for setting up a joint venture to supply pipeline cooking gas in the Capital. - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) and the UK-based global oil major - Shell, are likely to float a new company for setting up the seven million tonnes per annum (mtpa) grassroot refinery at Uttar Pradesh. - State-owned Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has made tentative plans to shut its 120,000 barrel-per-day (bpd) refinery in Mumbai in November or December 1998 for maintenance. - Between January and February, Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd had closed its crude distillation unit and 18,000 bpd fluid catalytic cracker. Its 12,000 bpd cracker was shut in May for 30–35 days. - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd is to increase its tankage capacity of petroleum products in the eastern region in the Ninth Plan by setting up new terminals involving an expenditure of about Rs 300 crores.
- The company is to set up new terminals at Budge Budge, Haldia and Alipurduar in West Bengal, Jashidih, Gaya, Barauni and Ranchi in Bihar, Balasore, Sambalpur, Rourkela, Rayagada and Paradeep in Orissa besides Lumding and Guwahati.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL), the second largest oil marketing public sector company, has signed a fuel supply agreement with Atria Power Corporation Ltd to generate 103 MW of power at Harihar, in its commitment to bring more power to Karnataka.
- It is also proposed to set up a hospital and build a residential colony in the 3500 acre land of the two projects.
1998
- The Karnataka Power Corporation Limited (KPCL) entered into a fuel supply agreement with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd for its 300-mW joint venture power project at Bidadi.
- The company will open five new, state-of-the-art, self servicing and automatic cut off nozzle facility petrol and diesel bunks in the city.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has entered into an agreement with Herdillia Chemicals Ltd for supply of 10,000 metric tonnes of naphtha for its proposed 5.5MW power project at Turbhe in Navi Mumbai. - Shell and BPCL will hold a 26 per cent stake each in the refinery project. The remaining 48 per cent will be held by institutions and the public. - The joint venture has received a letter of intent for setting up the refinery in Uttar Pradesh and government approval for direct foreign investment.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has launched its new lubricants in Calcutta from February 5.
- Shalivahana Power Corporation Ltd (SPCL) has signed a fuel supply agreement (FSA) with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) for the supply of furnace oil to its 33 MW mini-power plant to be set up at Ghatkesar.
- PIL is a 50:50 joint venture between Bharat Petroleum and Gujarat Gas.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has commissioned its Rs.450-crore Mumbai-Manmad pipeline.
- The Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd workers on April 7, observed strike throughout the country in protest against the managements reported move to damage the corporation.
- BPCL commissioned the first phase of its second coastal storage facility on the east coast at Haldia, West Bengal.
- BPCL is the only company among the three integrated refining and marketing companies - the others being HPCL and Indian Oil Corporation (IOC) - which has had a strong focus on marketing activities.
- BPCL (Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd.) has begun a New Marketing chapter with clear strategies and initiatives for Lubricants.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL) has tied up with Petronet India Limited, the oil-pipeline holding company, to form a joint venture for a 308-km pipeline from Kochi to Karur in Tamil Nadu.
- BPCL and Petronet India Ltd, will each take a 26 per cent equity stake, Cochin Refineries is expected to subscribe to 23 per cent of the equity and the balance 25 per cent will be held by other investors. The total equity will be Rs.140 crore with a 3:1 debt equity ratio.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has entered into in joint venture with Petronet (India) Ltd for the construction of a 308 km pipeline from Kochi in Kerala to Karur in Tamil Nadu.
- The company is India's second largest oil company in terms of market share. - BHARAT Petroleum Corporation Ltd proposes to set up a petrochemical complex, based on a naphtha cracker of 5,00,000-MTPA-ethylene capacity, using low aromatic naphtha available from indigenous/imported sources. It will be set up at a coastal location in Tamil Nadu. BPCL has obtained the "Letter of intent" from the Government of India for manufacture of the products. - BPCL is also setting up a three mtpa refinery at Numaligarh in Assam in a joint venture with IBP Co Ltd and the Government of Assam.
- BPCL has also successfully entered into fuel supply agreements with 22 independent power plants and four captive power plants for the supply of 1.1 mmtpa of naptha and 0.8 mmtpa of furnace oil.
- The company has commissioned the 250-km Mumbai-Manmad product pipeline, which has augmented its supply and distribution network.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) is the third largest oil refining and marketing company in the country.
- INDRAPRASTHA Gas Limited, a joint venture between Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) and the Gas Authority of India (GAIL) is set to revolutionalise transportation in New Delhi.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd has bagged the fuel supply contract for Kerala State Electricity Board's Kozhikode diesel power project at Nallalam.
1999
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) is setting up its LPG bottling plant in Hoskote Taluk near Bangalore.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has commissioned a hydrant fuelling system for aircraft at the Cochin International Airport (CIAL).
- BPCL has taken six per cent equity in the paid-up capital of the airport.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd's (BPCL) joint venture with Oman Oil Co. for setting up a six-million tonne refinery at Bina in Madhya Pradesh is expected to achieve financial closure within a month, said Mr. A. Sinha, BPCL's Finance Director.
- In an attempt to set up its naphtha-fired 200-MW project at top speed, the KPC Bidadi Power Corporation (KBPCL) entered into a fuel supply agreement (FSA) with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) for the supply of 25,0900 mtpa of naphtha.
- Jawaharlal Nehru Port Thrust (JNPT) and Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) signed a license agreement for development of a liquid cargo jetty at Jawaharlal Nehru Port.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) is exploring the option of extending a crude pipeline from its Bina refinery in Madhya Pradesh to Allahabad where it proposes to set up another seven-million-tonne refinery. - The company proposes to construct a crude-oil terminal in Gujarat from where crude will be transported through a pipeline to Bina. - BPCL has introduced the `smart-card' technology at retail outlets in Chennai. - BPCL has also entered into a marketing agreement with Reliance Petroleum Ltd for distributing 25 per cent of its production. - ICICI Bank Ltd has tied up with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) to install off-site ATMs at the company's petrol outlets.
2000
- The Company has entered into a Memorandum of Understanding with the ministry of petroleum & Natural gas for the year 2000-01. The Company has been awarded the `Excellent' rating and has been among the top-10 MoU-signing public sector companies in 1998-99.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd., the Country's second-largest oil company, announced the launch of its `Petro Card' for the retail market in Gujarat.
- Burger giant McDonald's has tied up with oil major Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) to open and run restaurants at selected petrol pumps across the country.
- The Company is mulling over a voluntary retirement scheme for its 3000-odd middle-level management staff.
- The Company signed a Transport Service Agreement with Gas Authority of India Ltd on 1 August.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd., in association with Iftex Petrochemicals Ltd., launched `Bharat Iftex', a co-branded multi functional additive (MFA).
- The Company will issue bonus shares in the ratio of one equity share for every one share held.
- SurfGold.com, the loyalty solution provider an alliance with Bharat Petroleum as one of its major Indian redemption partners.
- The Workers, of the Marketing Division of the Company went on one-day strike on 19 October affecting the normal operations in offices and establishments at Mumbai, Kandla, Solapur, Jalgaon, Jabalpur and Manmad.
- Big Mac has tied up with Bharat Petroleum Corporation for a highway complex on the Delhi-Agra highway, near Mathura.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation has offer bonus equity to its shareholders at a ratio of one bonus share for every one share held.
- The Company has been presented the FICCI award 1999 - 2000 for 'Corporate initiatives in the field of rural developments'.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has launched yet another card product, SmartFleet, aimed at fleet owners and corporates.
- During 2000-01 the company issued bonus shares in the ratio of 1:1, thereby enhancing its equity capital to Rs 300 crore. Also Recently it acquired 55% stake in Kochi Refinery Limited (KRL) from the Government of India and 19% in Numaligarh Refinery Limited (NRL) from IBP.
The company has launched 'Smart fleet', a programme for fleet owners and corporates and the same received an enthusiastic response from over 2500 clients.
-The company has 'Petrocard', an customer loyalty programme, had enrolled over 2.25 lakh customers by theend of March 2001.
2001
- The Company has launched the co-branded SmartFleet card along with Tata Finance, a smart card targeted at vehicle fleet owners and corporates.
- BPCL has tied up with Quicky's, the global coffee chain, Pepsi Foods India and Kwality Walls for providing beverages soft drinks and ice-creams at its petrol pumps.
- Standard Chartered Bank, HDFC Bank and Bharat Petroleum Corporation have joined the eCash Forum which has been set up by the Smart Card Forum of India.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd. has proposed to acquire the entire equity share holding of the Government of India in Kochi refineries Ltd. - Shell Aviation Ltd has appointed Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) as the sole distributor for Shell brands of aero lubes in India. BPCL has signed a contract with Shell Aviation for distribution rights for the next five years.
-'In & Out', a convenience retailing proposition, was selectively launched in 14 retail outlets during the year. This proposition includes utility payments, courier service, ATMs, a coffee shop, music counters, impulse stores, etc.
2002
- S Vijayaraghavan appointed as Additional Director on Board of BPCL
-M B Lal Director (Refineries) relinquishes office from BPCL.
- Tata Engg, BPCL ties up to market co-branded lubricants.
- Mr U Sundararajan has retired from the office of the Chairman & Managing Director, BPCL. Mr S Behuria, Director (Marketing) has taken over as Chairman & Managing Director of BPCL w e f July 1, 2002.
- BPCL introduced premium grade petrol "Speed" in Mumbai.
- SCI tie-up with BPCL for crude transportation.
- BPCL introduced 5 kg cylinder for rural market.
- BPCL ties up with Cafe Coffee Day to open Cafe Coffee Day outlets in select In&Out BPCL petrol pumps.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd informed that Shri S Radhakrishnan, Executive Director (Marketing Coordination) has been appointed as Director on the Board of the company and he has taken over as Director (Marketing) with effect from November 1, 2002.
- Mr. Mukesh Rohatgi, Executive Director (Refinery) has been appointed as Director on the Board of the BPCL and he has taken charge as Director (Refineries) w.e.f. November 14, 2002. Mr. Naresh Narad, Special Secretary, Ministry of Petroleum & Natural Gas, Government Nominee Director on the Board of BPCL has relinquished the Directorship w.e.f. November 11, 2002 on his appointment as Secretary, Ministry of Heavy Industries & Public Enterprises.
- ALF ties up with BPCL to launch 'affinity cards'
2003
- The board of Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) is being restructured with the induction of four new non-executive directors. The directors, all professionals of long standing, are the former chairman of Indian Oil MA Pathan, former chairman of Indian Airlines PC Sen, former chairman of railway board BD Gupta and director of the Indian Institute of Management, Kozhikode, AH Kalro.
- BPCL & ONGC signs agreement to sale crude oil for a period of 2 years
- Bharat Petroleum (BPCL) has forged an alliance with Petrovietnam for the purpose of supplying 200,00 tonnes of naptha in the next 9 months.
- BPCL ties up with HLL for marketing durables, FMCG products via LPG outlets.
- BPCL launches 'Speed '93'
- Hyderabad: Bharat petroleum corporation Ltd (BPCL) has rolled out its new plan for Bharatgas customers. The new offer called 'Beyond LPG' was unveiled in twin cities which comes with value added services where customers can get the benefit of discounts ranging from 10-20 percnt on all FMCG branded utensils.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd has informed that Shri S Vijayaraghavan, Joint Secretary, Ministry of Petroleum & Natural Gas Government Nominee Director on the Board of the company has resigned from office of director wef September 2, 2003.
Dr P N Khandwalla, Shri P P Kaliaperumal & K Vasudeva Part Time Non Official directors have resigned from office of director wef September 4, 2003
Shri V D Gupta Shri P C Sen & A H Kalro are appointed as part-time non official directors of the company wef September 5, 2003.
-the company has launched premium petrol, 'Speed' on September 9 in Visakhapatnam. The premium petrol is priced marginally higher than the ordinary fuel. The fuel is for the new generation cars and two-wheelers.
- The company has tied up with Hindustan Lever Ltd and three other kitchenware brands for selling grocery items to its LPG customers through its distributor network. the consumers can order all HLL products besides kitchenware from Hawkins, Prestige and Nirlep from Bharatgas distributors in select cities.
-Formed a strategic pact with Honda Siel to help launch gensets and geysers that run on LPG.
-Shri A K Srivastava, Joint Secretary, Ministry of Petroleum & Natural Gas has been appointed as Director—BPCL bags third slot among `Top 10' in Asiamoney's corporate governance poll on Asian companies in the energy sector. And joined the club of a select few Asian companies.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) and Oil and Natural Gas Corporation (ONGC) signed an agreement to cooperate with each other through sharing of their core strengths for exploration and production, and downstream oil refining and marketing.
2003
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) successfully completes its first swap transaction, making it the first public sector oil company to enter into an interest rate derivative transaction
2004
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation is negotiating a five-year agreement with Reliance Industries to buy products from its Jamnagar refinery. A previous product-sourcing agreement between the two companies expires on March 31, 2004.
- IDBI Bank on January 15 said that it has entered into a business-to-business (B2B) e-commerce arrangement with oil major Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) to provide an automated payment and purchase process to the BPCL's corporate and industrial clients.
-BPCL signs an initial contract with Saudi Aramco
- Tie up with Tata Consultancy Services to provide medical advisory and counselling services at Ghar, the highway retailing initiative of BPCL.
-Kochi Refineries Ltd (KRL) signs a memorandum of understanding with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd regarding capacity utilisation and other production and performance parameters
-Forges alliance with E-Charge Tech Private Limited to distribute electronically pre-paid products like mobile cards, internet cards and calling cards, making it the first company in India to electronically distribute the pre-paid products
-- GAIL India Limited has signed two joint venture agreements with Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) for implementation of city gas projects in Kanpur and Pune -Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) opened Mak Lubeshoppe at Akkayyapalem here on July 29
-Bharat Petroleum has launched another brand `Hi Speed Diesel'
-BPCL forges alliance with poultry association in Namakkal
-Speed ties up with consortium to sponsor domestic motor racing
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has entered into a marketing tie-up with automobile manufacturer Tata Motors for marketing of engine oils as co-branded lubricants for their commercial vehicles
2005
- BPCL launches Speed 97, its new brand of high-octane petrol mixed with lubricant additives, meant to improve vehicle performance
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd has launched a new concept of `Vehicle Care Centres' at its retail outlets
-Madhya Pradesh Government signs a memorandum of understanding (MoU) with Bharat Oman Refineries Ltd to set up a six-million-tonne per annum refinery at Bina on May 6, 2005
2006
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has announced that the Company & MMTC have jointly decided to work together in the area of domestic and international marketing of hydro-carbon by leveraging their core business strength in the global commodity trading.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has announced that the Company has entered into an MOU with Petroleo Brasileiro SA (Petrobras),
-BPCL acquires first Nigerian Erha cargo
-BPCL has informed that Shri. D N Narasimha Raju, Joint Secretary, Ministry of Petroleum & Natural Gas (MoP&NG) has been reappointed as Additional Director effective December 18, 2006.
2007
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has informed that Prof N Venkiteswaran, has been appointed as Additional Director effective July 16, 2007.
-BPCL acquires interest in North Sea basin
-BPCL to offload 49-pc stake in Bharat Shell
2008
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has appointed Ms. Rama Bijapurkar and Shri. S K Barua as Additional Director w.e.f. May 20, 2008.
-BPCL venture to infuse Rs 2,200cr in bio-diesel project
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL) is mulling to establish a 5-Mw wind power farm in Andhra Pradesh.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd has unveiled a GPS-technology based vehicle tracking system for its 5,200 tanker trucks fleet.
2009
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has informed BSE that BPCL, Oman Oil Company (OOC) and Bharat Oman Refinery Ltd. (BORL) have signed an agreement on November 15, 2009 in Oman related to additional investment by OOC in BORL.
-BPCL Farm-in into the Nunukan PSC in Indonesia
2010
-Bharat Petroleum Corp Ltd (BPCL) stated that natural gas reserves have been discovered in a block off Mozambique where it has a minority stake.
-BPCL announces successful pre-salt flow test offshore Brazil
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) commissioned its international bunkering facilities at the Kochi port.
-BPCL enters into agreement with M/s. Norwest to acquire Shale Gas acreages in Australia"
-BPCL announces Major Natural Gas discovery in offshore Mozambique.
-BPCL discovers hydrocarbon in ultra deep water of Sergipe-Alagoas Basin, Brazil.
-BPCL announces Oil and Gas discovery in Offshore Indonesia
-BPCL appoints R K Singh as new BPCL chairman
-Bharat Petroleum walked away with two prestigious Communication Awards at the Golden Jubilee function of the Annual Association of Business Communicators of India (ABCI) Awards Nite held at the Taj Mahal Hotel
-BPCL won the Silver Award for our Inhouse Publication, Petro Plus and the Bronze Award for our Online Web Campaign
-Bharat Petroleum was awarded the 1st position under the Best Display in Raw Space category during a spectacular awards ceremony at the recently concluded Petrotech-2010 exhibition at Pragati Maidan, New Delhi. The theme this year was Global Energy Equilibrium.
-BPCL corporate website www.bharatpetroleum.in bagged the first prize in the category ‘Most user friendly website (editors choice) in the India eGov 2.0 Awards 2010.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd receives Green Business Leaders Award: 2009- 2010
-NDTV Recognizes BPCL With Prestigious Corporate Sustainability Report Award
-BPCL has secured 289th ranking during 2008-09 in the prestigious list of Fortune Global 500
2011
-Tyre manufacturer Goodyear India has entered into an agreement with PSU major Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd to open tyre care shops at some of their petrol pumps.
-BPCL discovered of oil and gas in Sergipe-Alagoas Basin, Brazil
2012 -BPCL 's Another major appraisal success in Offshore Mozambique for BPRL
-BPCL in Successful Flow Test Offshore Mozambique
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd informs that "BPRL Announces Extension of Exploration Success with New Discovery Area in Offshore Mozambique".
-BPCL invests Rs 75 cr to set up 22 kV substation at Kochi Refinery
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd. , second largest public sector oil marketing company, has signed an MOU with LG Chem South Korea for a Joint Venture to set up a petrochemical plant adjacent to its Kochi Refinery Complex.
-BPCL - Discovery of Hydrocarbons in Espirito Santo Bash, Offshore Brazil.
-BPCL - Discovery of Hydrocarbons in Cauvery Onland in Tamil Nadu
-State run Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL) has signed a Memorandum of Understanding (MoU) with Kerala government. Following the development, the state government would extend tax deferments to BPCL's Integrated Refinery Expansion Project (IREP) and petrochemical complex.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) is in planned investments of up to Rs 45,000 crore by 2017 towards upstream projects as well as downstream expansion.
-BPCL l discovers New oil in the deep water of Sergipe - Alagoas Basin, Brasil
-Bharat Petroleum Corp Ltd (BPCL) has managed to raise USD 500 million through a maiden 10 year bond issue. The move market the debut of BPCL into the international debt market and the proceeds from issue would be used by the company to fund its capital expenditure. -Bharat Petroleum Corporation has given the Bonus in the Ratio of 1:1
2013 -Petrobras completes formation test in Farfan area in Sergipe-Alagoas Basin, Brazil. -BPRL announces new natural gas discovery in offshore Mozambique. -Bharat gas introduces IVRS to book gas refill services. -BPCL begins IVRS refill booking system in Kerala -BPCL has launched Universal Tractor Transmission Oil MAK Trac Magic + which is a special formulated lubricant for tractors, in the market of Punjab and Haryana.
2014 -Bharat Petroleum - BPRL announces Increase in Recoverable Natural Gas Resources in Mozambique. -Bharat Petroleum - Gas Discovery in Cauvery Basin, India by ONGC - BPRL Consortium.
2015
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL) has received approval from Environment Ministry for Rs 4,588 crore expansion at its refinery facility -BPCL acquires additional shares of Petronet CCK Limited -BPCL,along with GAIL Gas, a 100% subsidiary of GAIL India will jointly develop the City Gas Distribution Network (CGD Network) in Haridwar district. -BPCL has commissioned a new art Crude Distillation Unit (CDU) in Mumbai.
Operations[edit]
Bharat Petroleum operates the following refineries:

Mumbai Refinery : Located near Mumbai, Maharashtra. It has a capacity of 13 million metric tonnes per year.[6]
Kochi Refineries : Located near Kochi, Kerala. It has a capacity of 15.5  million metric tonnes per year.[7]
Bina Refinery : Located near Bina, Sagar district, Madhya Pradesh. It has a capacity of 6  million metric tonnes per year. This refinery is operated by Bharat Oman Refineries Limited, a joint venture between Bharat Petroleum and Oman Oil Company.
Numaligarh Refinery : Located near Numaligarh, Golaghat district, Assam. It has a capacity of 3  million metric tonnes per year.

The company business is divided in seven SBUs( Strategic Business Units), like Retail, Lubricants, Aviation, Refinery, Gas, I&C and LPG.
They have popular Loyalty Program like Petrocard, Smartfleet.
See also[edit]

Rajiv Gandhi Institute of Petroleum Technology[8]

References[edit]



^ a b c d e "BPCL Annual Report". CNBC TV18. 
^ "Fortune Global 500 list". CNN Money. Retrieved 22 July 2016. 
^ SAMANWAYA RAUTRAY AND PHEROZE L. VINCENT (March 4, 2011). "Feather in cap for graft fighters". The Telegraph. Retrieved 2012-04-26. 
^ Ramakrishna, G. V. (2004). Two Score and Ten: My Experiences in Government. Academic Foundation. p. 301. ISBN 8171883397. 
^ Gopal Ganesh (2008). Privatisation And Labour Restructuring. Academic Foundation. p. 136. ISBN 8171886345. 
^ http://www.bharatpetroleum.in/EnergisingEnvironment/MumbaiRefinery.aspx?id=3
^ http://www.thehindubusinessline.com/news/national/integrated-expansion-project-boosts-bpclkochi-refinery/article9677392.ece
^ http://www.topnews.in/sonia-lay-foundation-rajiv-gandhi-petroleum-institute-rae-bareli-221339



External links[edit]

Official website
Bharat gas Booking

Bharat Gas






v
t
e


Major Indian companies






Economy of India
List of companies of India





Automotive



Ashok Leyland
Bajaj Auto
Eicher Motors
Hero MotoCorp
Hindustan Motors
Mahindra & Mahindra
TAFE
Tata Motors
TVS





Aerospace
& Defence



Bharat Electronics
DRDO
HAL
Ordnance Factories





Conglomerates



Aditya Birla
Adani
Avantha
Bajaj
Bharti
DCM
Essar
Essel
GMR
Godrej
GVK
Hinduja
ITC
Jaypee
Jindal
Kirloskar
JSW
L&T
Lanco
Mahindra
Muthoot
Murugappa
RP-Sanjiv Goenka Group
Ramoji
Reliance ADAG
Reliance
RPG
Sahara
Shapoorji Pallonji
Sun
Tata
TVS
Torrent
UB
Videocon
Wadia





Civil Aviation



Air India
IndiGo
Jet Airways
SpiceJet
GoAir





Consumer Goods
& Retail



Britannia Industries
Dabur
Flipkart
Future Group
Godrej Consumer
Hindustan Unilever
ITC
Nirma
Reliance Retail
Tata Global Beverages
Patanjali Ayurved
Emami





Energy &
Natural Resources



Bharat Petroleum
Cairn India
Chennai Petroleum
Coal India
GAIL
Essar Oil
Hindustan Petroleum
Indian Oil Corporation
National Aluminum
NHPC
NMDC
NLC
NTPC
Oil India
ONGC
Power Finance
Power Grid
RINL
Reliance Infrastructure
RECL
SCI
Vedanta Limited
Suzlon Energy
Tata Power





Finance



Andhra Bank
Axis Bank
Bank of Baroda
Bank of India
Canara Bank
Central Bank of India
HDFC Bank
ICICI Bank
IDBI Bank
ING Vysya Bank
Jammu & Kashmir Bank
Kotak Mahindra Bank
LIC
MUDRA Bank
Muthoot Finance Ltd
Punjab National Bank
SBI
Tamilnad Mercantile Bank
Union Bank of India
Yes Bank





Healthcare,
Pharmaceutical
& Biotech



Aurobindo Pharma
Cadila Healthcare
Cipla
Glenmark Pharmaceuticals
Dr. Reddy's
IDPL
IIL
Lupin
Sun Pharmaceutical





Manufacturing &
Heavy Industries



ACC
Ambuja
Apollo Tyres
Asian Paints Ltd
Bengal Chemicals and Pharmaceuticals
Bhushan
BHEL
DLF
Gammon India
Havells
HCC
Hindalco
India Cements
Jindal Steel
JSW
Mittal Steel Company
MRF
SAIL
Tata Steel
UltraTech





Information technology



HCL Technologies
Infosys
Tata Consultancy Services
Tech Mahindra
Wipro





Media



Sun Group
The Times Group
Living Media
Zee Entertainment Enterprises





Telecommunications



Aircel
Airtel
BSNL
Idea Cellular
Jio
Micromax Mobile
MTNL
Reliance Communications
Tata Communications






Benchmark: FY 2015-16 revenues of over US$ 1 billion










v
t
e


Central public sector companies of India






Air India
Balmer Lawrie
Bharat Electronics
Bharat Heavy Electricals Limited
Bharat Petroleum
Bharat Sanchar Nigam
BHAVINI
Cement Corporation of India
Coal India Limited
Dredging Corporation of India Limited
Electronics Corporation of India Limited
Food Corporation of India
GAIL
Hindustan Aeronautics Limited
India Trade Promotion Organisation
Indian Oil Corporation
Indian Rare Earths Limited
Life Insurance Corporation of India
Mazagon Dock Limited
MECON Limited
Mahanagar Telephone Nigam Limited
NTPC Limited
Nuclear Power Corporation of India
Oil and Natural Gas Corporation
Power Grid Corporation of India
Rashtriya Ispat Nigam
Rural Electrification Corporation Limited
State Bank of India
Steel Authority of India
Uranium Corporation of India












v
t
e


CNX Nifty companies of India






ACC
Ambuja Cements
Asian Paints Ltd
Axis Bank
Bajaj Auto
Bank of Baroda
BHEL
BPCL
Bharti Airtel
Cairn India
Cipla
Coal India
DLF
Dr. Reddy's Laboratories
GAIL
Grasim Industries
HCL Technologies
HDFC
HDFC Bank
Hero MotoCorp
Hindalco Industries
HUL
Infosys
ICICI Bank
IDFC
IndusInd Bank Ltd.
ITC Limited
Jindal Steel and Power
Kotak Mahindra Bank
L&T
Lupin
Mahindra & Mahindra
Maruti Udyog
NMDC
NTPC
ONGC
Power Grid Corporation
PNB
Reliance Industries
Sesa Sterlite Limited
SBI
Sun Pharmaceutical
TCS
Tata Motors
Tata Power
Tata Steel
Tech Mahindra
Ultratech Cement
Wipro
Zee Entertainment Enterprises












v
t
e


Public Sector Undertakings in India (List)



Maharatna



Bharat Heavy Electricals
Coal India
Gas Authority of India
Indian Oil Corporation
National Thermal Power Corporation
Oil and Natural Gas Corporation
Steel Authority of India





Navratna



Bharat Electronics
Bharat Petroleum Corporation
Container Corporation of India
Engineers India
Hindustan Aeronautics
Hindustan Petroleum Corporation
Mahanagar Telephone Nigam
National Aluminium Company
National Buildings Construction Corporation
National Mineral Development Corporation
Neyveli Lignite Corporation
Oil India
Power Finance Corporation
Power Grid Corporation of India
Rashtriya Ispat Nigam
Rural Electrification Corporation
Shipping Corporation of India





Miniratna-I



Airports Authority of India
Antrix Corporation
Balmer Lawrie
Bharat Coking Coal
Bharat Dynamics
Bharat Earth Movers
Bharat Sanchar Nigam
Bridge & Roof Company (India)
Central Warehousing Corporation
Central Coalfields
Chennai Petroleum Corporation
Cochin Shipyard
Dredging Corporation of India
Kamarajar Port
Garden Reach Shipbuilders and Engineers
Goa Shipyard
Hindustan Copper
Hindustan Newsprint
Hindustan Paper Corporation
HLL Lifecare
HSCC (India)
Housing and Urban Development Corporation
Indian Railway Catering and Tourism Corporation
Indian Rare Earths
Indian Renewable Energy Development Agency
Ircon International
India Tourism Development Corporation
India Trade Promotion Organisation


Kudremukh Iron Ore Company
Mazagaon Dock
Mahanadi Coalfields
Mangalore Refinery and Petrochemical
Mishra Dhatu Nigam
Metals and Minerals Trading Corporation of India
MOIL
MSTC
National Fertilizers
National Seeds Corporation
Nathpa Jhakri Dam
National Hydroelectric Power Corporation
North Eastern Electric Power Corporation
Northern Coalfields
Numaligarh Refinery
Oil and Natural Gas Corporation
Pawan Hans
Projects and Development India
Rail Vikas Nigam
RailTel Corporation of India
Rashtriya Chemicals & Fertilizers
RITES
Security Printing and Minting Corporation of India
South Eastern Coalfields
State Trading Corporation of India
Telecommunications Consultants India
THDC India
Water and Power Consultancy Services
Western Coalfields





Miniratna-II



Bharat Pumps & Compressors
Broadcast Engineering Consultants India
Central Mine Planning and Design Institute
Central Railside Warehouse Company
Educational Consultants India
Engineering Projects (India) Ltd.
FCI Aravali Gypsum and Minerals (India)
Ferro Scrap Nigam
HMT (International)
Indian Medicines and Pharmaceuticals Corporation
MECON
Mineral Exploration Corporation
National Film Development Corporation of India
National Small Industries Corporation
PEC
Rajasthan Electronics and Instruments






Information updated as of 26 October, 2014 by Ministry of Heavy Industries and Public Enterprises (India) • See also Public sector banks in India








 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Bharat_Petroleum&oldid=791930042"					
Categories: Government-owned companies of IndiaPublic sector in IndiaOil and gas companies of IndiaOil pipeline companiesCompanies based in MumbaiEnergy companies established in 1976Non-renewable resource companies established in 1976Indian companies established in 1976Companies nationalised by the Government of IndiaCNX NiftyCompanies listed on the National Stock Exchange of IndiaIndian brandsHidden categories: Articles needing additional references from April 2015All articles needing additional referencesUse Indian English from February 2016All Wikipedia articles written in Indian EnglishUse dmy dates from February 2016Pages using deprecated image syntaxPages using infobox company with unsupported parameters 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


DeutschفارسیFrançaisहिन्दीಕನ್ನಡमराठीଓଡ଼ିଆРусскийУкраїнська 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 23 July 2017, at 10:39.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






Industry Analysis and Career Guidance - Industry Articles | Career OptionsIndustry & Career Advice
    Popular this week
  
                            GenY is mentoring seniors and no one's complaining
                        
                    Tuesday, November 22, 2016
                    
                        
                            , Written by Gauri Kohli,
                    
                
                     reverse mentoring is gaining wide acceptance in India where managing the expectations and aspirations of a multi-generational workforce is becoming a big challenge for organisations



                    
                        Read more
                    Banking & Financial Services
                    GST bill tabled in Tamil Nadu assembly amid ruckus
                    Wednesday, June 21, 2017
                    
                        
                    
                Read more
                    Banking & Financial Services
                    After farm loan waiver, UP govt looks at waiving loans for physically challenged
                    Wednesday, June 21, 2017
                    
                        
                    
                Read more
                    Banking & Financial Services
                    Cabinet clears proposal for Bill to deal with bankruptcy
                    Wednesday, June 21, 2017
                    
                        
                    
                Read moreEditor's ChoiceMost Popular
            Shine jobs articlesAlignment matters when hiring a CEO
            Monday, September 26, 2016
            
                
                    , Written by Ayesha Banerjee352422
            Not in sync? Things can take a turn for the worse if an ¬organisation and its leader’s vision are...
            
                Read more
            MiscellaneousIndian organisations willing to adopt a flexible employment structure
            Friday, September 23, 2016
            
                
                    , Written by Vandana Ramnani141535
            Companies are now allowing employees the freedom to freelance, choose projects and decide compens...
            
                Read more
            Shine jobs articlesGrowth through failure acceptable
            Tuesday, July 28, 2015
            l Source:
                Shine Jobs
                
            
        258521
            TALENTSCAPE Employees should be encouraged by organisations to grow their skill-sets and take risks
            
                Read more
            Shine jobs articlesDemand for food safety experts to go up
            Tuesday, July 28, 2015
            
                
                    , Written by Gauri Kohli3212196
            While the majority of movement will be seen in sales and distribution roles, we see the role of f...
            
                Read more
            Shine jobs articlesFew government firms reach out for verification
            Tuesday, July 21, 2015
            
                
                    , Written by Vandana Ramnani812007
            Government firms may not consider employee verification as important as private firms.
            
                Read more
            Shine jobs articlesEmployees are known to lie about education and work experience
            Tuesday, July 21, 2015
            
                
                    , Written by Vandana Ramnani1714401
            Shine.com survey reveals that people are often dishonest about their work experience and educatio...
            
                Read more
            Shine jobs articlesOver 15,000 job seekers attend Shine.com jobs fair
            Tuesday, July 21, 2015
            l Source:
                Shine Jobs
                
            
        2716103
            More than 30 companies participated in the Shine.com job fair.
            
                Read more
            Interview Preparation10 Commonly Asked Questions In A BPO Interview
            Wednesday, May 20, 2015
            
                
                    , Written by Resham Beri367325085
            Appearing for a BPO interview? You should definitely be prepared for these 10 questions!
            
                Read more
            ResumeTop 10 tips for producing a better CV
            Thursday, August 08, 2013
            
                
                    , Written by Dr Hemesh Lakhani 1937202609
            Your resume is an essential tool in the job-hunt process. If you have a flawless resume, chances ...
            
                Read more
            Interview PreparationTips to face job interviews confidently
            Saturday, September 06, 2014
            l Source:
                Shine.com
                
            
        261176809
            We dread interviews and when we are scared, we bungle. Confidence and preparedness are the only t...
            
                Read more
            Interview PreparationTelephonic interview tips
            Tuesday, December 17, 2013
            l Source:
                Shine.com
                
            
        136139093
            Telephonic interview has emerged as a popular way to conduct the preliminary round during the int...
            
                Read more
            Interview Preparation“Tell me about yourself”
            Wednesday, July 23, 2014
            
                
            
        132129337
            Which is the one question asked in every interview? People with significant interview experience ...
            
                Read more
            Salary and Appraisal6 Questions to ask during salary negotiation
            Tuesday, June 03, 2014
            
                
                    , Written by Steffi Joseph344120801
            One of the most apprehensive situations in an interview process is when job seekers negotiate sal...
            
                Read more
            Interview Preparation10 Tips To Face An Interview For The First Time
            Thursday, May 28, 2015
            
                
                    , Written by Resham Beri23371770
            Sitting in the waiting room, anticipating what's going to happen next, biting your nails at the t...
            
                Read moreNews LetterExpert career advice and articles delivered to your inbox!SubscribeSubscribeProfessional Resume Help
      Let our shine specialist write you a world class resume.
    CLICK HERE
        Top Jobs on Shine
        
      
                    TCS is hiring for Salesforce Developer and Salesforce Lead on 29-7-2017
                
            Experience: 2 to 10 Yrs

            Company: Tata Consultancy  Services Ltd.
        
                    TRAVEL SALES CONSULTANT & TECH SALES EXECUTIVE - GURGAON & NOIDA
                
            Experience: 1 to 6 Yrs

            Company: EQS Placements Pvt Ltd
        
                    HIRING FOR BLENDED PROFILE ( BACK OFFICE)
                
            Experience: 0 to 2 Yrs

            Company: Viewry Services LLP
        
                Video Articles
      
            View All
        Importance of team building - Everyone achieves more
       Monday, December 15, 2014
      
                    Team building is a very important aspect of any organization. This video will help you understand the power of a team and how everyone achieves more when in a team.
                    
                        Read More
            Today's Poll / Survey
        
                        Do you regularly check your official email on weekends?
                    
                            Yes
                        
                            No
                        
                            Only if required
                        ×News Letter 
                Please provide Email Id for receiving News Letter.
                    CloseSave












Justdial - Shop Online, Order Food, Travel, Events, Local Search































 



































Free Listing
Advertise 
Favorites 


Login
or
Sign Up





















































































































Air Tickets 
Anything on Hire 
Apply for Loans  
Auto care 
Automobile 
B2B 
Baby Care 
Banquets 
Bills & Recharge  
Book Hotel  
Books 
Bus 
Cabs & Car rentals 
Caterers 
Chemists 
Civil Contractors 
Courier 
Daily Needs 
Dance & Music 
Doctor 
Education 
Emergency 
Entertainment 
Event Organizer 
Fitness 
Flights 
Foreign Exchange  
Flowers 
Home Decor 
Home Improvements 
Hospitals 
Hotels 
House Keeping 
Industrial Products 
Insurance 
Interior Designer 
International SIM Card  
Internet 
Jobs 
Jewellery 
Labs 
Language Classes 
Loan & Credit Card 
Medical 
Modular Kitchen 
Movies 
On Demand Services 
Packers and Movers 
Party 
Personal Care 
Pest Control 
Pet and Pet Care 
Play School 
Real Estate 
Repairs 
Restaurants 
Shop Online 
Security Services 
Shopping 
Sports Coach 
Sports Goods 
Train  
Training Institute 
Transporters 
Travel 
Wedding 
Wine Shop 






















×








×













Popular Services 




Restaurants  
Order Online
Book Table
Trending
more.. 





SHOP ONLINE  
Mobile
Televisions 
Air Conditioners
more.. 





MOVIES  
.....
....
.....
more.. 





Doctors  
Dentists
Dermatologists
ENT
more.. 





Whats Trending? 




Travel  
Flights
Bus
Hotels
Car Rentals Train






Daily Needs  
Grocery
Chemists
Bakery 
Cakes & Desserts
more.. 





Repairs  
AC
Laptop
Mobile Phone
Washing Machine
more.. 





Loans  
Credit Cards
Home Loans
Personal Loans
Car Loans
more.. 





Automobiles  
New Cars
Used Cars
Popular Cars
Compare Cars more...






Entertainment  
Movies
Plays
Events
Exhibitions
more.. 





Business & Services 




ON DEMAND SERVICES  
Carpenters
Electricians
Plumbers
more.. 





WEDDING  
Banquet Halls
Bridal Requisites
Caterers
Jewellery
more.. 





Jobs  
Placement Services
Search Jobs
Overseas Jobs
more.. 





Personal Care  
Beauty Parlours
Spas
Salons
Beauty Services
more.. 





Real Estate  
Buy
Sell
Residential Rental
PG Accommodation
more.. 





Flowers  
Order Online
Local Florists
24 Hour Florists
more.. 









Mobile Phones 
Shop Now







Television Sets 
Shop Now







Digital Camera
Shop Now







Air Conditioner
Shop Now







Refrigerator
Shop Now







Tablets 
Shop Now








Be a part of our family & get everything in your pocket 
Download the Justdial App




Get App








Also Available on Windows & Blackberry























×
Login



Invalid username or Password

Mobile

+91




Password








Forgot Password?
Submit











×
Forgot Your Password



Please enter your mobile number

+91





Enter the code as displayed in the image below (not case sensitive)




Unable to view the image, to reload 
						click here





Submit






verification

×





Enter verification code sent on +91 


-


Submit






Re-send verification code





×
Change Password





New Password




Re-enter Password







Password Strength: Weak







Password Strength: Medium







Password Strength: Strong









Submit





×
Change Password




Your password has been changed successfully



Done









×


Forgot Password



Ok







Switching Profile...


xProfile Information
You are now logged in as Vendor ...






×
Mobile Verification



Enter the verification code that we have sent to you


					 Your number is in NDNC (National Do Not Call Registry), we have sent a verification code via SMS. Please enter the verification code in the box below and click SEND. 
				




−





Send








×


Android Application




Thank you for your information. SMS Sent.









×



Android Application





					You have reached your maximum limit of attempts for the day.Please try again later.
				















 Please Click on the appropriate link to provide feedback: 
     I am a Registered customer of Justdial.  
     I am not a customer but my business is listed on Justdial.  
     Feedback on information provided by Justdial.  
     Feedback on Justdial staff.  
     Issues with Online orders.  
     New Listing with Justdial.  
     Suggestions with User Interface.  
     Any other issue.  


































































Bharat Petroleum - Wikipedia






















 






Bharat Petroleum

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (April 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited
भारत पेट्रोलियम निगम लिमिटेड





Type

Public


Traded as
BSE: 500547
NSE: BPCL


Industry
Oil and gas


Headquarters
Mumbai, Maharashtra, India



Key people

D Rajkumar
(Chairman & Managing Director)


Products
Petroleum, natural gas, and other petrochemicals


Revenue
₹240,367 crore (US$37 billion) (2015)[1]



Operating income

₹9,777 crore (US$1.5 billion) (2015)[1]



Net income

₹5,082 crore (US$790 million) (2015)[1]


Total assets
₹44,866 crore (US$7.0 billion) (2015)[1]


Owner
Government of India (54.93%)



Number of employees

13,535 (2016)[1]


Website
www.bharatpetroleum.com


Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL) is an Indian state-controlled oil and gas company headquartered in Mumbai, Maharashtra. The Corporation operates two large refineries of the country located at Mumbai and Kochi. The company is ranked 358th on the Fortune Global 500 list of the world's biggest corporations as of 2016.[2]



Contents


1 History
2 Company History - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd
3 Operations
4 See also
5 References
6 External links



History[edit]
In 1889 during vast industrial development, an important player in the South Asian market was the Burmah Oil Company. Though incorporated in Scotland in 1886, the company grew out of the enterprises of the Chef Rohit Oil Company, which had been formed in 1871 to refine crude oil produced from primitive hand dug wells in Upper Burma.
In 1928, Asiatic Petroleum Company (India) started cooperation with Burma oil company. This alliance led to the formation of Burmah-Shell Oil Storage and Distributing Company of India Limited. Burmah Shell began its operations with import and marketing of Kerosene.
On 24 January 1976, the Burmah Shell was taken over by the Government of India to form Bharat Refineries Limited. On 1 August 1977, it was renamed Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited. It was also the first refinery to process newly found indigenous crude Bombay High.




BPCL petrol filling station near Nakirekal, Telangana, India


In 2003, following a petition by the Centre for Public Interest Litigation, the Supreme Court restrained the Central government from privatizing Hindustan Petroleum and Bharat Petroleum without the approval of Parliament.[3] As counsel for the CPIL, Rajinder Sachar and Prashant Bhushan said that the only way to disinvest in the companies would be to repeal or amend the Acts by which they were nationalized in the 1970s.[4] As a result, the government would need a majority in both houses to push through any privatization.[5]
Company History - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd[edit]
1928
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) traces its history to 1928 when the Burmah Shell Oil Storage & Distribution Company of India was incorporated in England to enter the petroleum products business in India. The business of the Company grew substantially given the international backing of Shell and it achieved the leadership position in India. In 1952, Shell and Burmah Oil Company set up Burmah Shell Refineries to set up a refinery in Mumbai. The entire operations of Burmah Shell in India were nationalised in 1976 and the Refinery and Marketing Companies were merged to form BPCL.
1952
- The Company was incorporated on 3 November 1952 under the name Burmahshell Refineries Limited (BSR). The Burmah Shell as Storage & Distributing Company of India, Ltd., a foreign company established in England in 1928 was carrying on in India the business of distributing and marketing petroleum products and for that paurpose established places in India.
1955
- The Company has a well established refinery at Mahul, Chembur (Mumbai) which has commissioned in January.
- The company's refinery in Bombay was commissioned in 1955. It introduced LPG as a cooking fuel to the Indian home and all along, it went beyond selling petroleum, to educate the customer.
1976
- The companies name changed to Bharat Refineries Limited (BRL) on 12th, February 1976.
1977
- Companies name changed to its present name (BPCL) on 1 August.
1979
- Pursuant to an agreement dated 23.12.79 bet ween Govt. of India and BSM, the Shell Petroleum Co. Ltd., the Burmah Oil Co. Ltd., and the Burmah Shell Refineries Ltd., the Govt. of India acquired 100% equity share holdings of BSR on 24 January 1976. Simultaneously also acquired the right to title and interest and liabilities of BSM in relation to its undertakings in India.
1992
- During the year the company commissioned 50 retail outlets including 9 in rural areas and 7 superior kerosene oil/light deisel oil dealerships. The total number of retail outlets/light diesel oil dealership at the end of the year stood at 4,090 and 928 respectively.
- During the year, 20% of the shares were sold by the govt. to various financial institutions and Mutual Funds. Thus presently the President of India holds 80% of the paid up capital.
1993
- During the year, the company installed microprocessor based digital integrated distributed control system in catalytic reformer and new solvent unit which replaced the pneumatic control system. Also installed advanced control system for catalytic control unit.
1994
- During the year, the corporation commissioned 124 retail outlets and 10 oil/light diesel oil dealership.
- On 25 February, a joint venture company `Bharat Oman Refineries Ltd' was incorporated. And was set up as a joint venture between Omen oil Co. Ltd and the Corporation.
- During the year, Bharat Shell Ltd. was promoted by the company and Shell Overseas Investments, B V Netherlands for marketing shell branded lubricants in the country.
1995
- During 95-96, a 6 MMTPA joint venture refinery being set up with Oman Oil Company Ltd. at Bina in M.P.
- A MOU was signed on March between the corporation and Pepsi Foods Ltd. pursuant to which customers cars drive upto select retail outlets for chilled pepsi distribution.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd., and Bank of Baroda have signed an MOU to launch the first Co-Branded Credit Card in the country which enables customers to buy petrol, diesel, lubricants and other regular commodities. The cards will carry BPCL and BOB logos and will have two categories - Premium and Regular. The cards can also be used by corporate houses as a facility to its executives for reimbursement of their fuel cost.
1996
- During the year, the corporation commissioned 61 retail outlets and 12 SKO/LDO dealerships. During the year Petronet India Ltd. was set for developing and laying a network of petroleum product pipelines in the country.
- During the year, LPG port terminal was commissioned at Okha in Gujarat, in October, with a storage capacity of 900 MT of LPG.
- The company embarked upon a strategic change plan in 1996. The organisation structure has been revamped and six Strategic Business Units have been created. The new structure is based on business processes, is flexible, more responsive to external changes, has fewer layers, and above all, ensures a much higher customer focus. 1997
- During the year corporation, has entered into a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) with the Ministry of Petroleum & Natural Gas (MOP&NG). The performance rating awarded to BPC was "Excellent" for the year ended March 31, 1996. - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd.(BPCL), has launched Apollo air stations at its petrol pumps in Mumbai. The company had signed a memorandum of understanding recently with Apollo Tyres to provide efficient air facility to customers through BPCL's retail network. - Sanghi Group of industries has signed a Memorandum of Understanding with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited. Under the agreement, BPCL will set up huge infrastructural facilities to ensure uninterrupted supply of fuels for various mega projects being undertaken by the Sanghi group including a cement plant, a petrochemical complex and a 100 per cent EOU spinning unit. - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd. (BPCL), is setting up a six million tonne per annum refinery at Bina, in Madhya Pradesh. The corporation also envisages a single point mooring and a crude oil terminal at Vadinar and a cross country crude oil pipeline from Vadinar to Bina. - ONGC is joining hands with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) for a Rs 2,552,-crore petrochemical project in Hazira, Gujarat. - An agreement to supply around 80,000 tonnes of naphtha per annum for the 230-MW combined cycle power project at Jegurupadu in East Godavari district of Andhra Pradesh, has been signed between GVK Industries Ltd and Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL). - The public sector Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) proposes to lay a pipeline from Cochin to Karur via Coimbatore to transport petrol, high speed diesel and kerosene. - The Gas Authority of India Ltd (GAIL) and Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) signed a memorandum of understanding (MoU) on September 9 for setting up a joint venture to supply pipeline cooking gas in the Capital. - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) and the UK-based global oil major - Shell, are likely to float a new company for setting up the seven million tonnes per annum (mtpa) grassroot refinery at Uttar Pradesh. - State-owned Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has made tentative plans to shut its 120,000 barrel-per-day (bpd) refinery in Mumbai in November or December 1998 for maintenance. - Between January and February, Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd had closed its crude distillation unit and 18,000 bpd fluid catalytic cracker. Its 12,000 bpd cracker was shut in May for 30–35 days. - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd is to increase its tankage capacity of petroleum products in the eastern region in the Ninth Plan by setting up new terminals involving an expenditure of about Rs 300 crores.
- The company is to set up new terminals at Budge Budge, Haldia and Alipurduar in West Bengal, Jashidih, Gaya, Barauni and Ranchi in Bihar, Balasore, Sambalpur, Rourkela, Rayagada and Paradeep in Orissa besides Lumding and Guwahati.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL), the second largest oil marketing public sector company, has signed a fuel supply agreement with Atria Power Corporation Ltd to generate 103 MW of power at Harihar, in its commitment to bring more power to Karnataka.
- It is also proposed to set up a hospital and build a residential colony in the 3500 acre land of the two projects.
1998
- The Karnataka Power Corporation Limited (KPCL) entered into a fuel supply agreement with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd for its 300-mW joint venture power project at Bidadi.
- The company will open five new, state-of-the-art, self servicing and automatic cut off nozzle facility petrol and diesel bunks in the city.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has entered into an agreement with Herdillia Chemicals Ltd for supply of 10,000 metric tonnes of naphtha for its proposed 5.5MW power project at Turbhe in Navi Mumbai. - Shell and BPCL will hold a 26 per cent stake each in the refinery project. The remaining 48 per cent will be held by institutions and the public. - The joint venture has received a letter of intent for setting up the refinery in Uttar Pradesh and government approval for direct foreign investment.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has launched its new lubricants in Calcutta from February 5.
- Shalivahana Power Corporation Ltd (SPCL) has signed a fuel supply agreement (FSA) with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) for the supply of furnace oil to its 33 MW mini-power plant to be set up at Ghatkesar.
- PIL is a 50:50 joint venture between Bharat Petroleum and Gujarat Gas.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has commissioned its Rs.450-crore Mumbai-Manmad pipeline.
- The Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd workers on April 7, observed strike throughout the country in protest against the managements reported move to damage the corporation.
- BPCL commissioned the first phase of its second coastal storage facility on the east coast at Haldia, West Bengal.
- BPCL is the only company among the three integrated refining and marketing companies - the others being HPCL and Indian Oil Corporation (IOC) - which has had a strong focus on marketing activities.
- BPCL (Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd.) has begun a New Marketing chapter with clear strategies and initiatives for Lubricants.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL) has tied up with Petronet India Limited, the oil-pipeline holding company, to form a joint venture for a 308-km pipeline from Kochi to Karur in Tamil Nadu.
- BPCL and Petronet India Ltd, will each take a 26 per cent equity stake, Cochin Refineries is expected to subscribe to 23 per cent of the equity and the balance 25 per cent will be held by other investors. The total equity will be Rs.140 crore with a 3:1 debt equity ratio.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has entered into in joint venture with Petronet (India) Ltd for the construction of a 308 km pipeline from Kochi in Kerala to Karur in Tamil Nadu.
- The company is India's second largest oil company in terms of market share. - BHARAT Petroleum Corporation Ltd proposes to set up a petrochemical complex, based on a naphtha cracker of 5,00,000-MTPA-ethylene capacity, using low aromatic naphtha available from indigenous/imported sources. It will be set up at a coastal location in Tamil Nadu. BPCL has obtained the "Letter of intent" from the Government of India for manufacture of the products. - BPCL is also setting up a three mtpa refinery at Numaligarh in Assam in a joint venture with IBP Co Ltd and the Government of Assam.
- BPCL has also successfully entered into fuel supply agreements with 22 independent power plants and four captive power plants for the supply of 1.1 mmtpa of naptha and 0.8 mmtpa of furnace oil.
- The company has commissioned the 250-km Mumbai-Manmad product pipeline, which has augmented its supply and distribution network.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) is the third largest oil refining and marketing company in the country.
- INDRAPRASTHA Gas Limited, a joint venture between Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) and the Gas Authority of India (GAIL) is set to revolutionalise transportation in New Delhi.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd has bagged the fuel supply contract for Kerala State Electricity Board's Kozhikode diesel power project at Nallalam.
1999
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) is setting up its LPG bottling plant in Hoskote Taluk near Bangalore.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has commissioned a hydrant fuelling system for aircraft at the Cochin International Airport (CIAL).
- BPCL has taken six per cent equity in the paid-up capital of the airport.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd's (BPCL) joint venture with Oman Oil Co. for setting up a six-million tonne refinery at Bina in Madhya Pradesh is expected to achieve financial closure within a month, said Mr. A. Sinha, BPCL's Finance Director.
- In an attempt to set up its naphtha-fired 200-MW project at top speed, the KPC Bidadi Power Corporation (KBPCL) entered into a fuel supply agreement (FSA) with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) for the supply of 25,0900 mtpa of naphtha.
- Jawaharlal Nehru Port Thrust (JNPT) and Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) signed a license agreement for development of a liquid cargo jetty at Jawaharlal Nehru Port.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) is exploring the option of extending a crude pipeline from its Bina refinery in Madhya Pradesh to Allahabad where it proposes to set up another seven-million-tonne refinery. - The company proposes to construct a crude-oil terminal in Gujarat from where crude will be transported through a pipeline to Bina. - BPCL has introduced the `smart-card' technology at retail outlets in Chennai. - BPCL has also entered into a marketing agreement with Reliance Petroleum Ltd for distributing 25 per cent of its production. - ICICI Bank Ltd has tied up with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) to install off-site ATMs at the company's petrol outlets.
2000
- The Company has entered into a Memorandum of Understanding with the ministry of petroleum & Natural gas for the year 2000-01. The Company has been awarded the `Excellent' rating and has been among the top-10 MoU-signing public sector companies in 1998-99.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd., the Country's second-largest oil company, announced the launch of its `Petro Card' for the retail market in Gujarat.
- Burger giant McDonald's has tied up with oil major Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) to open and run restaurants at selected petrol pumps across the country.
- The Company is mulling over a voluntary retirement scheme for its 3000-odd middle-level management staff.
- The Company signed a Transport Service Agreement with Gas Authority of India Ltd on 1 August.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd., in association with Iftex Petrochemicals Ltd., launched `Bharat Iftex', a co-branded multi functional additive (MFA).
- The Company will issue bonus shares in the ratio of one equity share for every one share held.
- SurfGold.com, the loyalty solution provider an alliance with Bharat Petroleum as one of its major Indian redemption partners.
- The Workers, of the Marketing Division of the Company went on one-day strike on 19 October affecting the normal operations in offices and establishments at Mumbai, Kandla, Solapur, Jalgaon, Jabalpur and Manmad.
- Big Mac has tied up with Bharat Petroleum Corporation for a highway complex on the Delhi-Agra highway, near Mathura.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation has offer bonus equity to its shareholders at a ratio of one bonus share for every one share held.
- The Company has been presented the FICCI award 1999 - 2000 for 'Corporate initiatives in the field of rural developments'.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has launched yet another card product, SmartFleet, aimed at fleet owners and corporates.
- During 2000-01 the company issued bonus shares in the ratio of 1:1, thereby enhancing its equity capital to Rs 300 crore. Also Recently it acquired 55% stake in Kochi Refinery Limited (KRL) from the Government of India and 19% in Numaligarh Refinery Limited (NRL) from IBP.
The company has launched 'Smart fleet', a programme for fleet owners and corporates and the same received an enthusiastic response from over 2500 clients.
-The company has 'Petrocard', an customer loyalty programme, had enrolled over 2.25 lakh customers by theend of March 2001.
2001
- The Company has launched the co-branded SmartFleet card along with Tata Finance, a smart card targeted at vehicle fleet owners and corporates.
- BPCL has tied up with Quicky's, the global coffee chain, Pepsi Foods India and Kwality Walls for providing beverages soft drinks and ice-creams at its petrol pumps.
- Standard Chartered Bank, HDFC Bank and Bharat Petroleum Corporation have joined the eCash Forum which has been set up by the Smart Card Forum of India.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd. has proposed to acquire the entire equity share holding of the Government of India in Kochi refineries Ltd. - Shell Aviation Ltd has appointed Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) as the sole distributor for Shell brands of aero lubes in India. BPCL has signed a contract with Shell Aviation for distribution rights for the next five years.
-'In & Out', a convenience retailing proposition, was selectively launched in 14 retail outlets during the year. This proposition includes utility payments, courier service, ATMs, a coffee shop, music counters, impulse stores, etc.
2002
- S Vijayaraghavan appointed as Additional Director on Board of BPCL
-M B Lal Director (Refineries) relinquishes office from BPCL.
- Tata Engg, BPCL ties up to market co-branded lubricants.
- Mr U Sundararajan has retired from the office of the Chairman & Managing Director, BPCL. Mr S Behuria, Director (Marketing) has taken over as Chairman & Managing Director of BPCL w e f July 1, 2002.
- BPCL introduced premium grade petrol "Speed" in Mumbai.
- SCI tie-up with BPCL for crude transportation.
- BPCL introduced 5 kg cylinder for rural market.
- BPCL ties up with Cafe Coffee Day to open Cafe Coffee Day outlets in select In&Out BPCL petrol pumps.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd informed that Shri S Radhakrishnan, Executive Director (Marketing Coordination) has been appointed as Director on the Board of the company and he has taken over as Director (Marketing) with effect from November 1, 2002.
- Mr. Mukesh Rohatgi, Executive Director (Refinery) has been appointed as Director on the Board of the BPCL and he has taken charge as Director (Refineries) w.e.f. November 14, 2002. Mr. Naresh Narad, Special Secretary, Ministry of Petroleum & Natural Gas, Government Nominee Director on the Board of BPCL has relinquished the Directorship w.e.f. November 11, 2002 on his appointment as Secretary, Ministry of Heavy Industries & Public Enterprises.
- ALF ties up with BPCL to launch 'affinity cards'
2003
- The board of Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) is being restructured with the induction of four new non-executive directors. The directors, all professionals of long standing, are the former chairman of Indian Oil MA Pathan, former chairman of Indian Airlines PC Sen, former chairman of railway board BD Gupta and director of the Indian Institute of Management, Kozhikode, AH Kalro.
- BPCL & ONGC signs agreement to sale crude oil for a period of 2 years
- Bharat Petroleum (BPCL) has forged an alliance with Petrovietnam for the purpose of supplying 200,00 tonnes of naptha in the next 9 months.
- BPCL ties up with HLL for marketing durables, FMCG products via LPG outlets.
- BPCL launches 'Speed '93'
- Hyderabad: Bharat petroleum corporation Ltd (BPCL) has rolled out its new plan for Bharatgas customers. The new offer called 'Beyond LPG' was unveiled in twin cities which comes with value added services where customers can get the benefit of discounts ranging from 10-20 percnt on all FMCG branded utensils.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd has informed that Shri S Vijayaraghavan, Joint Secretary, Ministry of Petroleum & Natural Gas Government Nominee Director on the Board of the company has resigned from office of director wef September 2, 2003.
Dr P N Khandwalla, Shri P P Kaliaperumal & K Vasudeva Part Time Non Official directors have resigned from office of director wef September 4, 2003
Shri V D Gupta Shri P C Sen & A H Kalro are appointed as part-time non official directors of the company wef September 5, 2003.
-the company has launched premium petrol, 'Speed' on September 9 in Visakhapatnam. The premium petrol is priced marginally higher than the ordinary fuel. The fuel is for the new generation cars and two-wheelers.
- The company has tied up with Hindustan Lever Ltd and three other kitchenware brands for selling grocery items to its LPG customers through its distributor network. the consumers can order all HLL products besides kitchenware from Hawkins, Prestige and Nirlep from Bharatgas distributors in select cities.
-Formed a strategic pact with Honda Siel to help launch gensets and geysers that run on LPG.
-Shri A K Srivastava, Joint Secretary, Ministry of Petroleum & Natural Gas has been appointed as Director—BPCL bags third slot among `Top 10' in Asiamoney's corporate governance poll on Asian companies in the energy sector. And joined the club of a select few Asian companies.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) and Oil and Natural Gas Corporation (ONGC) signed an agreement to cooperate with each other through sharing of their core strengths for exploration and production, and downstream oil refining and marketing.
2003
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) successfully completes its first swap transaction, making it the first public sector oil company to enter into an interest rate derivative transaction
2004
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation is negotiating a five-year agreement with Reliance Industries to buy products from its Jamnagar refinery. A previous product-sourcing agreement between the two companies expires on March 31, 2004.
- IDBI Bank on January 15 said that it has entered into a business-to-business (B2B) e-commerce arrangement with oil major Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) to provide an automated payment and purchase process to the BPCL's corporate and industrial clients.
-BPCL signs an initial contract with Saudi Aramco
- Tie up with Tata Consultancy Services to provide medical advisory and counselling services at Ghar, the highway retailing initiative of BPCL.
-Kochi Refineries Ltd (KRL) signs a memorandum of understanding with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd regarding capacity utilisation and other production and performance parameters
-Forges alliance with E-Charge Tech Private Limited to distribute electronically pre-paid products like mobile cards, internet cards and calling cards, making it the first company in India to electronically distribute the pre-paid products
-- GAIL India Limited has signed two joint venture agreements with Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) for implementation of city gas projects in Kanpur and Pune -Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) opened Mak Lubeshoppe at Akkayyapalem here on July 29
-Bharat Petroleum has launched another brand `Hi Speed Diesel'
-BPCL forges alliance with poultry association in Namakkal
-Speed ties up with consortium to sponsor domestic motor racing
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has entered into a marketing tie-up with automobile manufacturer Tata Motors for marketing of engine oils as co-branded lubricants for their commercial vehicles
2005
- BPCL launches Speed 97, its new brand of high-octane petrol mixed with lubricant additives, meant to improve vehicle performance
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd has launched a new concept of `Vehicle Care Centres' at its retail outlets
-Madhya Pradesh Government signs a memorandum of understanding (MoU) with Bharat Oman Refineries Ltd to set up a six-million-tonne per annum refinery at Bina on May 6, 2005
2006
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has announced that the Company & MMTC have jointly decided to work together in the area of domestic and international marketing of hydro-carbon by leveraging their core business strength in the global commodity trading.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has announced that the Company has entered into an MOU with Petroleo Brasileiro SA (Petrobras),
-BPCL acquires first Nigerian Erha cargo
-BPCL has informed that Shri. D N Narasimha Raju, Joint Secretary, Ministry of Petroleum & Natural Gas (MoP&NG) has been reappointed as Additional Director effective December 18, 2006.
2007
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has informed that Prof N Venkiteswaran, has been appointed as Additional Director effective July 16, 2007.
-BPCL acquires interest in North Sea basin
-BPCL to offload 49-pc stake in Bharat Shell
2008
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has appointed Ms. Rama Bijapurkar and Shri. S K Barua as Additional Director w.e.f. May 20, 2008.
-BPCL venture to infuse Rs 2,200cr in bio-diesel project
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL) is mulling to establish a 5-Mw wind power farm in Andhra Pradesh.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd has unveiled a GPS-technology based vehicle tracking system for its 5,200 tanker trucks fleet.
2009
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has informed BSE that BPCL, Oman Oil Company (OOC) and Bharat Oman Refinery Ltd. (BORL) have signed an agreement on November 15, 2009 in Oman related to additional investment by OOC in BORL.
-BPCL Farm-in into the Nunukan PSC in Indonesia
2010
-Bharat Petroleum Corp Ltd (BPCL) stated that natural gas reserves have been discovered in a block off Mozambique where it has a minority stake.
-BPCL announces successful pre-salt flow test offshore Brazil
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) commissioned its international bunkering facilities at the Kochi port.
-BPCL enters into agreement with M/s. Norwest to acquire Shale Gas acreages in Australia"
-BPCL announces Major Natural Gas discovery in offshore Mozambique.
-BPCL discovers hydrocarbon in ultra deep water of Sergipe-Alagoas Basin, Brazil.
-BPCL announces Oil and Gas discovery in Offshore Indonesia
-BPCL appoints R K Singh as new BPCL chairman
-Bharat Petroleum walked away with two prestigious Communication Awards at the Golden Jubilee function of the Annual Association of Business Communicators of India (ABCI) Awards Nite held at the Taj Mahal Hotel
-BPCL won the Silver Award for our Inhouse Publication, Petro Plus and the Bronze Award for our Online Web Campaign
-Bharat Petroleum was awarded the 1st position under the Best Display in Raw Space category during a spectacular awards ceremony at the recently concluded Petrotech-2010 exhibition at Pragati Maidan, New Delhi. The theme this year was Global Energy Equilibrium.
-BPCL corporate website www.bharatpetroleum.in bagged the first prize in the category ‘Most user friendly website (editors choice) in the India eGov 2.0 Awards 2010.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd receives Green Business Leaders Award: 2009- 2010
-NDTV Recognizes BPCL With Prestigious Corporate Sustainability Report Award
-BPCL has secured 289th ranking during 2008-09 in the prestigious list of Fortune Global 500
2011
-Tyre manufacturer Goodyear India has entered into an agreement with PSU major Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd to open tyre care shops at some of their petrol pumps.
-BPCL discovered of oil and gas in Sergipe-Alagoas Basin, Brazil
2012 -BPCL 's Another major appraisal success in Offshore Mozambique for BPRL
-BPCL in Successful Flow Test Offshore Mozambique
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd informs that "BPRL Announces Extension of Exploration Success with New Discovery Area in Offshore Mozambique".
-BPCL invests Rs 75 cr to set up 22 kV substation at Kochi Refinery
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd. , second largest public sector oil marketing company, has signed an MOU with LG Chem South Korea for a Joint Venture to set up a petrochemical plant adjacent to its Kochi Refinery Complex.
-BPCL - Discovery of Hydrocarbons in Espirito Santo Bash, Offshore Brazil.
-BPCL - Discovery of Hydrocarbons in Cauvery Onland in Tamil Nadu
-State run Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL) has signed a Memorandum of Understanding (MoU) with Kerala government. Following the development, the state government would extend tax deferments to BPCL's Integrated Refinery Expansion Project (IREP) and petrochemical complex.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) is in planned investments of up to Rs 45,000 crore by 2017 towards upstream projects as well as downstream expansion.
-BPCL l discovers New oil in the deep water of Sergipe - Alagoas Basin, Brasil
-Bharat Petroleum Corp Ltd (BPCL) has managed to raise USD 500 million through a maiden 10 year bond issue. The move market the debut of BPCL into the international debt market and the proceeds from issue would be used by the company to fund its capital expenditure. -Bharat Petroleum Corporation has given the Bonus in the Ratio of 1:1
2013 -Petrobras completes formation test in Farfan area in Sergipe-Alagoas Basin, Brazil. -BPRL announces new natural gas discovery in offshore Mozambique. -Bharat gas introduces IVRS to book gas refill services. -BPCL begins IVRS refill booking system in Kerala -BPCL has launched Universal Tractor Transmission Oil MAK Trac Magic + which is a special formulated lubricant for tractors, in the market of Punjab and Haryana.
2014 -Bharat Petroleum - BPRL announces Increase in Recoverable Natural Gas Resources in Mozambique. -Bharat Petroleum - Gas Discovery in Cauvery Basin, India by ONGC - BPRL Consortium.
2015
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL) has received approval from Environment Ministry for Rs 4,588 crore expansion at its refinery facility -BPCL acquires additional shares of Petronet CCK Limited -BPCL,along with GAIL Gas, a 100% subsidiary of GAIL India will jointly develop the City Gas Distribution Network (CGD Network) in Haridwar district. -BPCL has commissioned a new art Crude Distillation Unit (CDU) in Mumbai.
Operations[edit]
Bharat Petroleum operates the following refineries:

Mumbai Refinery : Located near Mumbai, Maharashtra. It has a capacity of 13 million metric tonnes per year.[6]
Kochi Refineries : Located near Kochi, Kerala. It has a capacity of 15.5  million metric tonnes per year.[7]
Bina Refinery : Located near Bina, Sagar district, Madhya Pradesh. It has a capacity of 6  million metric tonnes per year. This refinery is operated by Bharat Oman Refineries Limited, a joint venture between Bharat Petroleum and Oman Oil Company.
Numaligarh Refinery : Located near Numaligarh, Golaghat district, Assam. It has a capacity of 3  million metric tonnes per year.

The company business is divided in seven SBUs( Strategic Business Units), like Retail, Lubricants, Aviation, Refinery, Gas, I&C and LPG.
They have popular Loyalty Program like Petrocard, Smartfleet.
See also[edit]

Rajiv Gandhi Institute of Petroleum Technology[8]

References[edit]



^ a b c d e "BPCL Annual Report". CNBC TV18. 
^ "Fortune Global 500 list". CNN Money. Retrieved 22 July 2016. 
^ SAMANWAYA RAUTRAY AND PHEROZE L. VINCENT (March 4, 2011). "Feather in cap for graft fighters". The Telegraph. Retrieved 2012-04-26. 
^ Ramakrishna, G. V. (2004). Two Score and Ten: My Experiences in Government. Academic Foundation. p. 301. ISBN 8171883397. 
^ Gopal Ganesh (2008). Privatisation And Labour Restructuring. Academic Foundation. p. 136. ISBN 8171886345. 
^ http://www.bharatpetroleum.in/EnergisingEnvironment/MumbaiRefinery.aspx?id=3
^ http://www.thehindubusinessline.com/news/national/integrated-expansion-project-boosts-bpclkochi-refinery/article9677392.ece
^ http://www.topnews.in/sonia-lay-foundation-rajiv-gandhi-petroleum-institute-rae-bareli-221339



External links[edit]

Official website
Bharat gas Booking

Bharat Gas






v
t
e


Major Indian companies






Economy of India
List of companies of India





Automotive



Ashok Leyland
Bajaj Auto
Eicher Motors
Hero MotoCorp
Hindustan Motors
Mahindra & Mahindra
TAFE
Tata Motors
TVS





Aerospace
& Defence



Bharat Electronics
DRDO
HAL
Ordnance Factories





Conglomerates



Aditya Birla
Adani
Avantha
Bajaj
Bharti
DCM
Essar
Essel
GMR
Godrej
GVK
Hinduja
ITC
Jaypee
Jindal
Kirloskar
JSW
L&T
Lanco
Mahindra
Muthoot
Murugappa
RP-Sanjiv Goenka Group
Ramoji
Reliance ADAG
Reliance
RPG
Sahara
Shapoorji Pallonji
Sun
Tata
TVS
Torrent
UB
Videocon
Wadia





Civil Aviation



Air India
IndiGo
Jet Airways
SpiceJet
GoAir





Consumer Goods
& Retail



Britannia Industries
Dabur
Flipkart
Future Group
Godrej Consumer
Hindustan Unilever
ITC
Nirma
Reliance Retail
Tata Global Beverages
Patanjali Ayurved
Emami





Energy &
Natural Resources



Bharat Petroleum
Cairn India
Chennai Petroleum
Coal India
GAIL
Essar Oil
Hindustan Petroleum
Indian Oil Corporation
National Aluminum
NHPC
NMDC
NLC
NTPC
Oil India
ONGC
Power Finance
Power Grid
RINL
Reliance Infrastructure
RECL
SCI
Vedanta Limited
Suzlon Energy
Tata Power





Finance



Andhra Bank
Axis Bank
Bank of Baroda
Bank of India
Canara Bank
Central Bank of India
HDFC Bank
ICICI Bank
IDBI Bank
ING Vysya Bank
Jammu & Kashmir Bank
Kotak Mahindra Bank
LIC
MUDRA Bank
Muthoot Finance Ltd
Punjab National Bank
SBI
Tamilnad Mercantile Bank
Union Bank of India
Yes Bank





Healthcare,
Pharmaceutical
& Biotech



Aurobindo Pharma
Cadila Healthcare
Cipla
Glenmark Pharmaceuticals
Dr. Reddy's
IDPL
IIL
Lupin
Sun Pharmaceutical





Manufacturing &
Heavy Industries



ACC
Ambuja
Apollo Tyres
Asian Paints Ltd
Bengal Chemicals and Pharmaceuticals
Bhushan
BHEL
DLF
Gammon India
Havells
HCC
Hindalco
India Cements
Jindal Steel
JSW
Mittal Steel Company
MRF
SAIL
Tata Steel
UltraTech





Information technology



HCL Technologies
Infosys
Tata Consultancy Services
Tech Mahindra
Wipro





Media



Sun Group
The Times Group
Living Media
Zee Entertainment Enterprises





Telecommunications



Aircel
Airtel
BSNL
Idea Cellular
Jio
Micromax Mobile
MTNL
Reliance Communications
Tata Communications






Benchmark: FY 2015-16 revenues of over US$ 1 billion










v
t
e


Central public sector companies of India






Air India
Balmer Lawrie
Bharat Electronics
Bharat Heavy Electricals Limited
Bharat Petroleum
Bharat Sanchar Nigam
BHAVINI
Cement Corporation of India
Coal India Limited
Dredging Corporation of India Limited
Electronics Corporation of India Limited
Food Corporation of India
GAIL
Hindustan Aeronautics Limited
India Trade Promotion Organisation
Indian Oil Corporation
Indian Rare Earths Limited
Life Insurance Corporation of India
Mazagon Dock Limited
MECON Limited
Mahanagar Telephone Nigam Limited
NTPC Limited
Nuclear Power Corporation of India
Oil and Natural Gas Corporation
Power Grid Corporation of India
Rashtriya Ispat Nigam
Rural Electrification Corporation Limited
State Bank of India
Steel Authority of India
Uranium Corporation of India












v
t
e


CNX Nifty companies of India






ACC
Ambuja Cements
Asian Paints Ltd
Axis Bank
Bajaj Auto
Bank of Baroda
BHEL
BPCL
Bharti Airtel
Cairn India
Cipla
Coal India
DLF
Dr. Reddy's Laboratories
GAIL
Grasim Industries
HCL Technologies
HDFC
HDFC Bank
Hero MotoCorp
Hindalco Industries
HUL
Infosys
ICICI Bank
IDFC
IndusInd Bank Ltd.
ITC Limited
Jindal Steel and Power
Kotak Mahindra Bank
L&T
Lupin
Mahindra & Mahindra
Maruti Udyog
NMDC
NTPC
ONGC
Power Grid Corporation
PNB
Reliance Industries
Sesa Sterlite Limited
SBI
Sun Pharmaceutical
TCS
Tata Motors
Tata Power
Tata Steel
Tech Mahindra
Ultratech Cement
Wipro
Zee Entertainment Enterprises












v
t
e


Public Sector Undertakings in India (List)



Maharatna



Bharat Heavy Electricals
Coal India
Gas Authority of India
Indian Oil Corporation
National Thermal Power Corporation
Oil and Natural Gas Corporation
Steel Authority of India





Navratna



Bharat Electronics
Bharat Petroleum Corporation
Container Corporation of India
Engineers India
Hindustan Aeronautics
Hindustan Petroleum Corporation
Mahanagar Telephone Nigam
National Aluminium Company
National Buildings Construction Corporation
National Mineral Development Corporation
Neyveli Lignite Corporation
Oil India
Power Finance Corporation
Power Grid Corporation of India
Rashtriya Ispat Nigam
Rural Electrification Corporation
Shipping Corporation of India





Miniratna-I



Airports Authority of India
Antrix Corporation
Balmer Lawrie
Bharat Coking Coal
Bharat Dynamics
Bharat Earth Movers
Bharat Sanchar Nigam
Bridge & Roof Company (India)
Central Warehousing Corporation
Central Coalfields
Chennai Petroleum Corporation
Cochin Shipyard
Dredging Corporation of India
Kamarajar Port
Garden Reach Shipbuilders and Engineers
Goa Shipyard
Hindustan Copper
Hindustan Newsprint
Hindustan Paper Corporation
HLL Lifecare
HSCC (India)
Housing and Urban Development Corporation
Indian Railway Catering and Tourism Corporation
Indian Rare Earths
Indian Renewable Energy Development Agency
Ircon International
India Tourism Development Corporation
India Trade Promotion Organisation


Kudremukh Iron Ore Company
Mazagaon Dock
Mahanadi Coalfields
Mangalore Refinery and Petrochemical
Mishra Dhatu Nigam
Metals and Minerals Trading Corporation of India
MOIL
MSTC
National Fertilizers
National Seeds Corporation
Nathpa Jhakri Dam
National Hydroelectric Power Corporation
North Eastern Electric Power Corporation
Northern Coalfields
Numaligarh Refinery
Oil and Natural Gas Corporation
Pawan Hans
Projects and Development India
Rail Vikas Nigam
RailTel Corporation of India
Rashtriya Chemicals & Fertilizers
RITES
Security Printing and Minting Corporation of India
South Eastern Coalfields
State Trading Corporation of India
Telecommunications Consultants India
THDC India
Water and Power Consultancy Services
Western Coalfields





Miniratna-II



Bharat Pumps & Compressors
Broadcast Engineering Consultants India
Central Mine Planning and Design Institute
Central Railside Warehouse Company
Educational Consultants India
Engineering Projects (India) Ltd.
FCI Aravali Gypsum and Minerals (India)
Ferro Scrap Nigam
HMT (International)
Indian Medicines and Pharmaceuticals Corporation
MECON
Mineral Exploration Corporation
National Film Development Corporation of India
National Small Industries Corporation
PEC
Rajasthan Electronics and Instruments






Information updated as of 26 October, 2014 by Ministry of Heavy Industries and Public Enterprises (India) • See also Public sector banks in India








 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Bharat_Petroleum&oldid=791930042"					
Categories: Government-owned companies of IndiaPublic sector in IndiaOil and gas companies of IndiaOil pipeline companiesCompanies based in MumbaiEnergy companies established in 1976Non-renewable resource companies established in 1976Indian companies established in 1976Companies nationalised by the Government of IndiaCNX NiftyCompanies listed on the National Stock Exchange of IndiaIndian brandsHidden categories: Articles needing additional references from April 2015All articles needing additional referencesUse Indian English from February 2016All Wikipedia articles written in Indian EnglishUse dmy dates from February 2016Pages using deprecated image syntaxPages using infobox company with unsupported parameters 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


DeutschفارسیFrançaisहिन्दीಕನ್ನಡमराठीଓଡ଼ିଆРусскийУкраїнська 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 23 July 2017, at 10:39.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Bharat Petroleum - Wikipedia






















 






Bharat Petroleum

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (April 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited
भारत पेट्रोलियम निगम लिमिटेड





Type

Public


Traded as
BSE: 500547
NSE: BPCL


Industry
Oil and gas


Headquarters
Mumbai, Maharashtra, India



Key people

D Rajkumar
(Chairman & Managing Director)


Products
Petroleum, natural gas, and other petrochemicals


Revenue
₹240,367 crore (US$37 billion) (2015)[1]



Operating income

₹9,777 crore (US$1.5 billion) (2015)[1]



Net income

₹5,082 crore (US$790 million) (2015)[1]


Total assets
₹44,866 crore (US$7.0 billion) (2015)[1]


Owner
Government of India (54.93%)



Number of employees

13,535 (2016)[1]


Website
www.bharatpetroleum.com


Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL) is an Indian state-controlled oil and gas company headquartered in Mumbai, Maharashtra. The Corporation operates two large refineries of the country located at Mumbai and Kochi. The company is ranked 358th on the Fortune Global 500 list of the world's biggest corporations as of 2016.[2]



Contents


1 History
2 Company History - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd
3 Operations
4 See also
5 References
6 External links



History[edit]
In 1889 during vast industrial development, an important player in the South Asian market was the Burmah Oil Company. Though incorporated in Scotland in 1886, the company grew out of the enterprises of the Chef Rohit Oil Company, which had been formed in 1871 to refine crude oil produced from primitive hand dug wells in Upper Burma.
In 1928, Asiatic Petroleum Company (India) started cooperation with Burma oil company. This alliance led to the formation of Burmah-Shell Oil Storage and Distributing Company of India Limited. Burmah Shell began its operations with import and marketing of Kerosene.
On 24 January 1976, the Burmah Shell was taken over by the Government of India to form Bharat Refineries Limited. On 1 August 1977, it was renamed Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited. It was also the first refinery to process newly found indigenous crude Bombay High.




BPCL petrol filling station near Nakirekal, Telangana, India


In 2003, following a petition by the Centre for Public Interest Litigation, the Supreme Court restrained the Central government from privatizing Hindustan Petroleum and Bharat Petroleum without the approval of Parliament.[3] As counsel for the CPIL, Rajinder Sachar and Prashant Bhushan said that the only way to disinvest in the companies would be to repeal or amend the Acts by which they were nationalized in the 1970s.[4] As a result, the government would need a majority in both houses to push through any privatization.[5]
Company History - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd[edit]
1928
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) traces its history to 1928 when the Burmah Shell Oil Storage & Distribution Company of India was incorporated in England to enter the petroleum products business in India. The business of the Company grew substantially given the international backing of Shell and it achieved the leadership position in India. In 1952, Shell and Burmah Oil Company set up Burmah Shell Refineries to set up a refinery in Mumbai. The entire operations of Burmah Shell in India were nationalised in 1976 and the Refinery and Marketing Companies were merged to form BPCL.
1952
- The Company was incorporated on 3 November 1952 under the name Burmahshell Refineries Limited (BSR). The Burmah Shell as Storage & Distributing Company of India, Ltd., a foreign company established in England in 1928 was carrying on in India the business of distributing and marketing petroleum products and for that paurpose established places in India.
1955
- The Company has a well established refinery at Mahul, Chembur (Mumbai) which has commissioned in January.
- The company's refinery in Bombay was commissioned in 1955. It introduced LPG as a cooking fuel to the Indian home and all along, it went beyond selling petroleum, to educate the customer.
1976
- The companies name changed to Bharat Refineries Limited (BRL) on 12th, February 1976.
1977
- Companies name changed to its present name (BPCL) on 1 August.
1979
- Pursuant to an agreement dated 23.12.79 bet ween Govt. of India and BSM, the Shell Petroleum Co. Ltd., the Burmah Oil Co. Ltd., and the Burmah Shell Refineries Ltd., the Govt. of India acquired 100% equity share holdings of BSR on 24 January 1976. Simultaneously also acquired the right to title and interest and liabilities of BSM in relation to its undertakings in India.
1992
- During the year the company commissioned 50 retail outlets including 9 in rural areas and 7 superior kerosene oil/light deisel oil dealerships. The total number of retail outlets/light diesel oil dealership at the end of the year stood at 4,090 and 928 respectively.
- During the year, 20% of the shares were sold by the govt. to various financial institutions and Mutual Funds. Thus presently the President of India holds 80% of the paid up capital.
1993
- During the year, the company installed microprocessor based digital integrated distributed control system in catalytic reformer and new solvent unit which replaced the pneumatic control system. Also installed advanced control system for catalytic control unit.
1994
- During the year, the corporation commissioned 124 retail outlets and 10 oil/light diesel oil dealership.
- On 25 February, a joint venture company `Bharat Oman Refineries Ltd' was incorporated. And was set up as a joint venture between Omen oil Co. Ltd and the Corporation.
- During the year, Bharat Shell Ltd. was promoted by the company and Shell Overseas Investments, B V Netherlands for marketing shell branded lubricants in the country.
1995
- During 95-96, a 6 MMTPA joint venture refinery being set up with Oman Oil Company Ltd. at Bina in M.P.
- A MOU was signed on March between the corporation and Pepsi Foods Ltd. pursuant to which customers cars drive upto select retail outlets for chilled pepsi distribution.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd., and Bank of Baroda have signed an MOU to launch the first Co-Branded Credit Card in the country which enables customers to buy petrol, diesel, lubricants and other regular commodities. The cards will carry BPCL and BOB logos and will have two categories - Premium and Regular. The cards can also be used by corporate houses as a facility to its executives for reimbursement of their fuel cost.
1996
- During the year, the corporation commissioned 61 retail outlets and 12 SKO/LDO dealerships. During the year Petronet India Ltd. was set for developing and laying a network of petroleum product pipelines in the country.
- During the year, LPG port terminal was commissioned at Okha in Gujarat, in October, with a storage capacity of 900 MT of LPG.
- The company embarked upon a strategic change plan in 1996. The organisation structure has been revamped and six Strategic Business Units have been created. The new structure is based on business processes, is flexible, more responsive to external changes, has fewer layers, and above all, ensures a much higher customer focus. 1997
- During the year corporation, has entered into a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) with the Ministry of Petroleum & Natural Gas (MOP&NG). The performance rating awarded to BPC was "Excellent" for the year ended March 31, 1996. - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd.(BPCL), has launched Apollo air stations at its petrol pumps in Mumbai. The company had signed a memorandum of understanding recently with Apollo Tyres to provide efficient air facility to customers through BPCL's retail network. - Sanghi Group of industries has signed a Memorandum of Understanding with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited. Under the agreement, BPCL will set up huge infrastructural facilities to ensure uninterrupted supply of fuels for various mega projects being undertaken by the Sanghi group including a cement plant, a petrochemical complex and a 100 per cent EOU spinning unit. - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd. (BPCL), is setting up a six million tonne per annum refinery at Bina, in Madhya Pradesh. The corporation also envisages a single point mooring and a crude oil terminal at Vadinar and a cross country crude oil pipeline from Vadinar to Bina. - ONGC is joining hands with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) for a Rs 2,552,-crore petrochemical project in Hazira, Gujarat. - An agreement to supply around 80,000 tonnes of naphtha per annum for the 230-MW combined cycle power project at Jegurupadu in East Godavari district of Andhra Pradesh, has been signed between GVK Industries Ltd and Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL). - The public sector Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) proposes to lay a pipeline from Cochin to Karur via Coimbatore to transport petrol, high speed diesel and kerosene. - The Gas Authority of India Ltd (GAIL) and Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) signed a memorandum of understanding (MoU) on September 9 for setting up a joint venture to supply pipeline cooking gas in the Capital. - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) and the UK-based global oil major - Shell, are likely to float a new company for setting up the seven million tonnes per annum (mtpa) grassroot refinery at Uttar Pradesh. - State-owned Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has made tentative plans to shut its 120,000 barrel-per-day (bpd) refinery in Mumbai in November or December 1998 for maintenance. - Between January and February, Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd had closed its crude distillation unit and 18,000 bpd fluid catalytic cracker. Its 12,000 bpd cracker was shut in May for 30–35 days. - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd is to increase its tankage capacity of petroleum products in the eastern region in the Ninth Plan by setting up new terminals involving an expenditure of about Rs 300 crores.
- The company is to set up new terminals at Budge Budge, Haldia and Alipurduar in West Bengal, Jashidih, Gaya, Barauni and Ranchi in Bihar, Balasore, Sambalpur, Rourkela, Rayagada and Paradeep in Orissa besides Lumding and Guwahati.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL), the second largest oil marketing public sector company, has signed a fuel supply agreement with Atria Power Corporation Ltd to generate 103 MW of power at Harihar, in its commitment to bring more power to Karnataka.
- It is also proposed to set up a hospital and build a residential colony in the 3500 acre land of the two projects.
1998
- The Karnataka Power Corporation Limited (KPCL) entered into a fuel supply agreement with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd for its 300-mW joint venture power project at Bidadi.
- The company will open five new, state-of-the-art, self servicing and automatic cut off nozzle facility petrol and diesel bunks in the city.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has entered into an agreement with Herdillia Chemicals Ltd for supply of 10,000 metric tonnes of naphtha for its proposed 5.5MW power project at Turbhe in Navi Mumbai. - Shell and BPCL will hold a 26 per cent stake each in the refinery project. The remaining 48 per cent will be held by institutions and the public. - The joint venture has received a letter of intent for setting up the refinery in Uttar Pradesh and government approval for direct foreign investment.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has launched its new lubricants in Calcutta from February 5.
- Shalivahana Power Corporation Ltd (SPCL) has signed a fuel supply agreement (FSA) with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) for the supply of furnace oil to its 33 MW mini-power plant to be set up at Ghatkesar.
- PIL is a 50:50 joint venture between Bharat Petroleum and Gujarat Gas.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has commissioned its Rs.450-crore Mumbai-Manmad pipeline.
- The Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd workers on April 7, observed strike throughout the country in protest against the managements reported move to damage the corporation.
- BPCL commissioned the first phase of its second coastal storage facility on the east coast at Haldia, West Bengal.
- BPCL is the only company among the three integrated refining and marketing companies - the others being HPCL and Indian Oil Corporation (IOC) - which has had a strong focus on marketing activities.
- BPCL (Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd.) has begun a New Marketing chapter with clear strategies and initiatives for Lubricants.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL) has tied up with Petronet India Limited, the oil-pipeline holding company, to form a joint venture for a 308-km pipeline from Kochi to Karur in Tamil Nadu.
- BPCL and Petronet India Ltd, will each take a 26 per cent equity stake, Cochin Refineries is expected to subscribe to 23 per cent of the equity and the balance 25 per cent will be held by other investors. The total equity will be Rs.140 crore with a 3:1 debt equity ratio.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has entered into in joint venture with Petronet (India) Ltd for the construction of a 308 km pipeline from Kochi in Kerala to Karur in Tamil Nadu.
- The company is India's second largest oil company in terms of market share. - BHARAT Petroleum Corporation Ltd proposes to set up a petrochemical complex, based on a naphtha cracker of 5,00,000-MTPA-ethylene capacity, using low aromatic naphtha available from indigenous/imported sources. It will be set up at a coastal location in Tamil Nadu. BPCL has obtained the "Letter of intent" from the Government of India for manufacture of the products. - BPCL is also setting up a three mtpa refinery at Numaligarh in Assam in a joint venture with IBP Co Ltd and the Government of Assam.
- BPCL has also successfully entered into fuel supply agreements with 22 independent power plants and four captive power plants for the supply of 1.1 mmtpa of naptha and 0.8 mmtpa of furnace oil.
- The company has commissioned the 250-km Mumbai-Manmad product pipeline, which has augmented its supply and distribution network.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) is the third largest oil refining and marketing company in the country.
- INDRAPRASTHA Gas Limited, a joint venture between Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) and the Gas Authority of India (GAIL) is set to revolutionalise transportation in New Delhi.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd has bagged the fuel supply contract for Kerala State Electricity Board's Kozhikode diesel power project at Nallalam.
1999
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) is setting up its LPG bottling plant in Hoskote Taluk near Bangalore.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has commissioned a hydrant fuelling system for aircraft at the Cochin International Airport (CIAL).
- BPCL has taken six per cent equity in the paid-up capital of the airport.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd's (BPCL) joint venture with Oman Oil Co. for setting up a six-million tonne refinery at Bina in Madhya Pradesh is expected to achieve financial closure within a month, said Mr. A. Sinha, BPCL's Finance Director.
- In an attempt to set up its naphtha-fired 200-MW project at top speed, the KPC Bidadi Power Corporation (KBPCL) entered into a fuel supply agreement (FSA) with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) for the supply of 25,0900 mtpa of naphtha.
- Jawaharlal Nehru Port Thrust (JNPT) and Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) signed a license agreement for development of a liquid cargo jetty at Jawaharlal Nehru Port.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) is exploring the option of extending a crude pipeline from its Bina refinery in Madhya Pradesh to Allahabad where it proposes to set up another seven-million-tonne refinery. - The company proposes to construct a crude-oil terminal in Gujarat from where crude will be transported through a pipeline to Bina. - BPCL has introduced the `smart-card' technology at retail outlets in Chennai. - BPCL has also entered into a marketing agreement with Reliance Petroleum Ltd for distributing 25 per cent of its production. - ICICI Bank Ltd has tied up with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) to install off-site ATMs at the company's petrol outlets.
2000
- The Company has entered into a Memorandum of Understanding with the ministry of petroleum & Natural gas for the year 2000-01. The Company has been awarded the `Excellent' rating and has been among the top-10 MoU-signing public sector companies in 1998-99.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd., the Country's second-largest oil company, announced the launch of its `Petro Card' for the retail market in Gujarat.
- Burger giant McDonald's has tied up with oil major Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) to open and run restaurants at selected petrol pumps across the country.
- The Company is mulling over a voluntary retirement scheme for its 3000-odd middle-level management staff.
- The Company signed a Transport Service Agreement with Gas Authority of India Ltd on 1 August.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd., in association with Iftex Petrochemicals Ltd., launched `Bharat Iftex', a co-branded multi functional additive (MFA).
- The Company will issue bonus shares in the ratio of one equity share for every one share held.
- SurfGold.com, the loyalty solution provider an alliance with Bharat Petroleum as one of its major Indian redemption partners.
- The Workers, of the Marketing Division of the Company went on one-day strike on 19 October affecting the normal operations in offices and establishments at Mumbai, Kandla, Solapur, Jalgaon, Jabalpur and Manmad.
- Big Mac has tied up with Bharat Petroleum Corporation for a highway complex on the Delhi-Agra highway, near Mathura.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation has offer bonus equity to its shareholders at a ratio of one bonus share for every one share held.
- The Company has been presented the FICCI award 1999 - 2000 for 'Corporate initiatives in the field of rural developments'.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has launched yet another card product, SmartFleet, aimed at fleet owners and corporates.
- During 2000-01 the company issued bonus shares in the ratio of 1:1, thereby enhancing its equity capital to Rs 300 crore. Also Recently it acquired 55% stake in Kochi Refinery Limited (KRL) from the Government of India and 19% in Numaligarh Refinery Limited (NRL) from IBP.
The company has launched 'Smart fleet', a programme for fleet owners and corporates and the same received an enthusiastic response from over 2500 clients.
-The company has 'Petrocard', an customer loyalty programme, had enrolled over 2.25 lakh customers by theend of March 2001.
2001
- The Company has launched the co-branded SmartFleet card along with Tata Finance, a smart card targeted at vehicle fleet owners and corporates.
- BPCL has tied up with Quicky's, the global coffee chain, Pepsi Foods India and Kwality Walls for providing beverages soft drinks and ice-creams at its petrol pumps.
- Standard Chartered Bank, HDFC Bank and Bharat Petroleum Corporation have joined the eCash Forum which has been set up by the Smart Card Forum of India.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd. has proposed to acquire the entire equity share holding of the Government of India in Kochi refineries Ltd. - Shell Aviation Ltd has appointed Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) as the sole distributor for Shell brands of aero lubes in India. BPCL has signed a contract with Shell Aviation for distribution rights for the next five years.
-'In & Out', a convenience retailing proposition, was selectively launched in 14 retail outlets during the year. This proposition includes utility payments, courier service, ATMs, a coffee shop, music counters, impulse stores, etc.
2002
- S Vijayaraghavan appointed as Additional Director on Board of BPCL
-M B Lal Director (Refineries) relinquishes office from BPCL.
- Tata Engg, BPCL ties up to market co-branded lubricants.
- Mr U Sundararajan has retired from the office of the Chairman & Managing Director, BPCL. Mr S Behuria, Director (Marketing) has taken over as Chairman & Managing Director of BPCL w e f July 1, 2002.
- BPCL introduced premium grade petrol "Speed" in Mumbai.
- SCI tie-up with BPCL for crude transportation.
- BPCL introduced 5 kg cylinder for rural market.
- BPCL ties up with Cafe Coffee Day to open Cafe Coffee Day outlets in select In&Out BPCL petrol pumps.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd informed that Shri S Radhakrishnan, Executive Director (Marketing Coordination) has been appointed as Director on the Board of the company and he has taken over as Director (Marketing) with effect from November 1, 2002.
- Mr. Mukesh Rohatgi, Executive Director (Refinery) has been appointed as Director on the Board of the BPCL and he has taken charge as Director (Refineries) w.e.f. November 14, 2002. Mr. Naresh Narad, Special Secretary, Ministry of Petroleum & Natural Gas, Government Nominee Director on the Board of BPCL has relinquished the Directorship w.e.f. November 11, 2002 on his appointment as Secretary, Ministry of Heavy Industries & Public Enterprises.
- ALF ties up with BPCL to launch 'affinity cards'
2003
- The board of Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) is being restructured with the induction of four new non-executive directors. The directors, all professionals of long standing, are the former chairman of Indian Oil MA Pathan, former chairman of Indian Airlines PC Sen, former chairman of railway board BD Gupta and director of the Indian Institute of Management, Kozhikode, AH Kalro.
- BPCL & ONGC signs agreement to sale crude oil for a period of 2 years
- Bharat Petroleum (BPCL) has forged an alliance with Petrovietnam for the purpose of supplying 200,00 tonnes of naptha in the next 9 months.
- BPCL ties up with HLL for marketing durables, FMCG products via LPG outlets.
- BPCL launches 'Speed '93'
- Hyderabad: Bharat petroleum corporation Ltd (BPCL) has rolled out its new plan for Bharatgas customers. The new offer called 'Beyond LPG' was unveiled in twin cities which comes with value added services where customers can get the benefit of discounts ranging from 10-20 percnt on all FMCG branded utensils.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd has informed that Shri S Vijayaraghavan, Joint Secretary, Ministry of Petroleum & Natural Gas Government Nominee Director on the Board of the company has resigned from office of director wef September 2, 2003.
Dr P N Khandwalla, Shri P P Kaliaperumal & K Vasudeva Part Time Non Official directors have resigned from office of director wef September 4, 2003
Shri V D Gupta Shri P C Sen & A H Kalro are appointed as part-time non official directors of the company wef September 5, 2003.
-the company has launched premium petrol, 'Speed' on September 9 in Visakhapatnam. The premium petrol is priced marginally higher than the ordinary fuel. The fuel is for the new generation cars and two-wheelers.
- The company has tied up with Hindustan Lever Ltd and three other kitchenware brands for selling grocery items to its LPG customers through its distributor network. the consumers can order all HLL products besides kitchenware from Hawkins, Prestige and Nirlep from Bharatgas distributors in select cities.
-Formed a strategic pact with Honda Siel to help launch gensets and geysers that run on LPG.
-Shri A K Srivastava, Joint Secretary, Ministry of Petroleum & Natural Gas has been appointed as Director—BPCL bags third slot among `Top 10' in Asiamoney's corporate governance poll on Asian companies in the energy sector. And joined the club of a select few Asian companies.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) and Oil and Natural Gas Corporation (ONGC) signed an agreement to cooperate with each other through sharing of their core strengths for exploration and production, and downstream oil refining and marketing.
2003
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) successfully completes its first swap transaction, making it the first public sector oil company to enter into an interest rate derivative transaction
2004
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation is negotiating a five-year agreement with Reliance Industries to buy products from its Jamnagar refinery. A previous product-sourcing agreement between the two companies expires on March 31, 2004.
- IDBI Bank on January 15 said that it has entered into a business-to-business (B2B) e-commerce arrangement with oil major Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) to provide an automated payment and purchase process to the BPCL's corporate and industrial clients.
-BPCL signs an initial contract with Saudi Aramco
- Tie up with Tata Consultancy Services to provide medical advisory and counselling services at Ghar, the highway retailing initiative of BPCL.
-Kochi Refineries Ltd (KRL) signs a memorandum of understanding with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd regarding capacity utilisation and other production and performance parameters
-Forges alliance with E-Charge Tech Private Limited to distribute electronically pre-paid products like mobile cards, internet cards and calling cards, making it the first company in India to electronically distribute the pre-paid products
-- GAIL India Limited has signed two joint venture agreements with Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) for implementation of city gas projects in Kanpur and Pune -Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) opened Mak Lubeshoppe at Akkayyapalem here on July 29
-Bharat Petroleum has launched another brand `Hi Speed Diesel'
-BPCL forges alliance with poultry association in Namakkal
-Speed ties up with consortium to sponsor domestic motor racing
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has entered into a marketing tie-up with automobile manufacturer Tata Motors for marketing of engine oils as co-branded lubricants for their commercial vehicles
2005
- BPCL launches Speed 97, its new brand of high-octane petrol mixed with lubricant additives, meant to improve vehicle performance
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd has launched a new concept of `Vehicle Care Centres' at its retail outlets
-Madhya Pradesh Government signs a memorandum of understanding (MoU) with Bharat Oman Refineries Ltd to set up a six-million-tonne per annum refinery at Bina on May 6, 2005
2006
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has announced that the Company & MMTC have jointly decided to work together in the area of domestic and international marketing of hydro-carbon by leveraging their core business strength in the global commodity trading.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has announced that the Company has entered into an MOU with Petroleo Brasileiro SA (Petrobras),
-BPCL acquires first Nigerian Erha cargo
-BPCL has informed that Shri. D N Narasimha Raju, Joint Secretary, Ministry of Petroleum & Natural Gas (MoP&NG) has been reappointed as Additional Director effective December 18, 2006.
2007
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has informed that Prof N Venkiteswaran, has been appointed as Additional Director effective July 16, 2007.
-BPCL acquires interest in North Sea basin
-BPCL to offload 49-pc stake in Bharat Shell
2008
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has appointed Ms. Rama Bijapurkar and Shri. S K Barua as Additional Director w.e.f. May 20, 2008.
-BPCL venture to infuse Rs 2,200cr in bio-diesel project
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL) is mulling to establish a 5-Mw wind power farm in Andhra Pradesh.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd has unveiled a GPS-technology based vehicle tracking system for its 5,200 tanker trucks fleet.
2009
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has informed BSE that BPCL, Oman Oil Company (OOC) and Bharat Oman Refinery Ltd. (BORL) have signed an agreement on November 15, 2009 in Oman related to additional investment by OOC in BORL.
-BPCL Farm-in into the Nunukan PSC in Indonesia
2010
-Bharat Petroleum Corp Ltd (BPCL) stated that natural gas reserves have been discovered in a block off Mozambique where it has a minority stake.
-BPCL announces successful pre-salt flow test offshore Brazil
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) commissioned its international bunkering facilities at the Kochi port.
-BPCL enters into agreement with M/s. Norwest to acquire Shale Gas acreages in Australia"
-BPCL announces Major Natural Gas discovery in offshore Mozambique.
-BPCL discovers hydrocarbon in ultra deep water of Sergipe-Alagoas Basin, Brazil.
-BPCL announces Oil and Gas discovery in Offshore Indonesia
-BPCL appoints R K Singh as new BPCL chairman
-Bharat Petroleum walked away with two prestigious Communication Awards at the Golden Jubilee function of the Annual Association of Business Communicators of India (ABCI) Awards Nite held at the Taj Mahal Hotel
-BPCL won the Silver Award for our Inhouse Publication, Petro Plus and the Bronze Award for our Online Web Campaign
-Bharat Petroleum was awarded the 1st position under the Best Display in Raw Space category during a spectacular awards ceremony at the recently concluded Petrotech-2010 exhibition at Pragati Maidan, New Delhi. The theme this year was Global Energy Equilibrium.
-BPCL corporate website www.bharatpetroleum.in bagged the first prize in the category ‘Most user friendly website (editors choice) in the India eGov 2.0 Awards 2010.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd receives Green Business Leaders Award: 2009- 2010
-NDTV Recognizes BPCL With Prestigious Corporate Sustainability Report Award
-BPCL has secured 289th ranking during 2008-09 in the prestigious list of Fortune Global 500
2011
-Tyre manufacturer Goodyear India has entered into an agreement with PSU major Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd to open tyre care shops at some of their petrol pumps.
-BPCL discovered of oil and gas in Sergipe-Alagoas Basin, Brazil
2012 -BPCL 's Another major appraisal success in Offshore Mozambique for BPRL
-BPCL in Successful Flow Test Offshore Mozambique
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd informs that "BPRL Announces Extension of Exploration Success with New Discovery Area in Offshore Mozambique".
-BPCL invests Rs 75 cr to set up 22 kV substation at Kochi Refinery
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd. , second largest public sector oil marketing company, has signed an MOU with LG Chem South Korea for a Joint Venture to set up a petrochemical plant adjacent to its Kochi Refinery Complex.
-BPCL - Discovery of Hydrocarbons in Espirito Santo Bash, Offshore Brazil.
-BPCL - Discovery of Hydrocarbons in Cauvery Onland in Tamil Nadu
-State run Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL) has signed a Memorandum of Understanding (MoU) with Kerala government. Following the development, the state government would extend tax deferments to BPCL's Integrated Refinery Expansion Project (IREP) and petrochemical complex.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) is in planned investments of up to Rs 45,000 crore by 2017 towards upstream projects as well as downstream expansion.
-BPCL l discovers New oil in the deep water of Sergipe - Alagoas Basin, Brasil
-Bharat Petroleum Corp Ltd (BPCL) has managed to raise USD 500 million through a maiden 10 year bond issue. The move market the debut of BPCL into the international debt market and the proceeds from issue would be used by the company to fund its capital expenditure. -Bharat Petroleum Corporation has given the Bonus in the Ratio of 1:1
2013 -Petrobras completes formation test in Farfan area in Sergipe-Alagoas Basin, Brazil. -BPRL announces new natural gas discovery in offshore Mozambique. -Bharat gas introduces IVRS to book gas refill services. -BPCL begins IVRS refill booking system in Kerala -BPCL has launched Universal Tractor Transmission Oil MAK Trac Magic + which is a special formulated lubricant for tractors, in the market of Punjab and Haryana.
2014 -Bharat Petroleum - BPRL announces Increase in Recoverable Natural Gas Resources in Mozambique. -Bharat Petroleum - Gas Discovery in Cauvery Basin, India by ONGC - BPRL Consortium.
2015
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL) has received approval from Environment Ministry for Rs 4,588 crore expansion at its refinery facility -BPCL acquires additional shares of Petronet CCK Limited -BPCL,along with GAIL Gas, a 100% subsidiary of GAIL India will jointly develop the City Gas Distribution Network (CGD Network) in Haridwar district. -BPCL has commissioned a new art Crude Distillation Unit (CDU) in Mumbai.
Operations[edit]
Bharat Petroleum operates the following refineries:

Mumbai Refinery : Located near Mumbai, Maharashtra. It has a capacity of 13 million metric tonnes per year.[6]
Kochi Refineries : Located near Kochi, Kerala. It has a capacity of 15.5  million metric tonnes per year.[7]
Bina Refinery : Located near Bina, Sagar district, Madhya Pradesh. It has a capacity of 6  million metric tonnes per year. This refinery is operated by Bharat Oman Refineries Limited, a joint venture between Bharat Petroleum and Oman Oil Company.
Numaligarh Refinery : Located near Numaligarh, Golaghat district, Assam. It has a capacity of 3  million metric tonnes per year.

The company business is divided in seven SBUs( Strategic Business Units), like Retail, Lubricants, Aviation, Refinery, Gas, I&C and LPG.
They have popular Loyalty Program like Petrocard, Smartfleet.
See also[edit]

Rajiv Gandhi Institute of Petroleum Technology[8]

References[edit]



^ a b c d e "BPCL Annual Report". CNBC TV18. 
^ "Fortune Global 500 list". CNN Money. Retrieved 22 July 2016. 
^ SAMANWAYA RAUTRAY AND PHEROZE L. VINCENT (March 4, 2011). "Feather in cap for graft fighters". The Telegraph. Retrieved 2012-04-26. 
^ Ramakrishna, G. V. (2004). Two Score and Ten: My Experiences in Government. Academic Foundation. p. 301. ISBN 8171883397. 
^ Gopal Ganesh (2008). Privatisation And Labour Restructuring. Academic Foundation. p. 136. ISBN 8171886345. 
^ http://www.bharatpetroleum.in/EnergisingEnvironment/MumbaiRefinery.aspx?id=3
^ http://www.thehindubusinessline.com/news/national/integrated-expansion-project-boosts-bpclkochi-refinery/article9677392.ece
^ http://www.topnews.in/sonia-lay-foundation-rajiv-gandhi-petroleum-institute-rae-bareli-221339



External links[edit]

Official website
Bharat gas Booking

Bharat Gas






v
t
e


Major Indian companies






Economy of India
List of companies of India





Automotive



Ashok Leyland
Bajaj Auto
Eicher Motors
Hero MotoCorp
Hindustan Motors
Mahindra & Mahindra
TAFE
Tata Motors
TVS





Aerospace
& Defence



Bharat Electronics
DRDO
HAL
Ordnance Factories





Conglomerates



Aditya Birla
Adani
Avantha
Bajaj
Bharti
DCM
Essar
Essel
GMR
Godrej
GVK
Hinduja
ITC
Jaypee
Jindal
Kirloskar
JSW
L&T
Lanco
Mahindra
Muthoot
Murugappa
RP-Sanjiv Goenka Group
Ramoji
Reliance ADAG
Reliance
RPG
Sahara
Shapoorji Pallonji
Sun
Tata
TVS
Torrent
UB
Videocon
Wadia





Civil Aviation



Air India
IndiGo
Jet Airways
SpiceJet
GoAir





Consumer Goods
& Retail



Britannia Industries
Dabur
Flipkart
Future Group
Godrej Consumer
Hindustan Unilever
ITC
Nirma
Reliance Retail
Tata Global Beverages
Patanjali Ayurved
Emami





Energy &
Natural Resources



Bharat Petroleum
Cairn India
Chennai Petroleum
Coal India
GAIL
Essar Oil
Hindustan Petroleum
Indian Oil Corporation
National Aluminum
NHPC
NMDC
NLC
NTPC
Oil India
ONGC
Power Finance
Power Grid
RINL
Reliance Infrastructure
RECL
SCI
Vedanta Limited
Suzlon Energy
Tata Power





Finance



Andhra Bank
Axis Bank
Bank of Baroda
Bank of India
Canara Bank
Central Bank of India
HDFC Bank
ICICI Bank
IDBI Bank
ING Vysya Bank
Jammu & Kashmir Bank
Kotak Mahindra Bank
LIC
MUDRA Bank
Muthoot Finance Ltd
Punjab National Bank
SBI
Tamilnad Mercantile Bank
Union Bank of India
Yes Bank





Healthcare,
Pharmaceutical
& Biotech



Aurobindo Pharma
Cadila Healthcare
Cipla
Glenmark Pharmaceuticals
Dr. Reddy's
IDPL
IIL
Lupin
Sun Pharmaceutical





Manufacturing &
Heavy Industries



ACC
Ambuja
Apollo Tyres
Asian Paints Ltd
Bengal Chemicals and Pharmaceuticals
Bhushan
BHEL
DLF
Gammon India
Havells
HCC
Hindalco
India Cements
Jindal Steel
JSW
Mittal Steel Company
MRF
SAIL
Tata Steel
UltraTech





Information technology



HCL Technologies
Infosys
Tata Consultancy Services
Tech Mahindra
Wipro





Media



Sun Group
The Times Group
Living Media
Zee Entertainment Enterprises





Telecommunications



Aircel
Airtel
BSNL
Idea Cellular
Jio
Micromax Mobile
MTNL
Reliance Communications
Tata Communications






Benchmark: FY 2015-16 revenues of over US$ 1 billion










v
t
e


Central public sector companies of India






Air India
Balmer Lawrie
Bharat Electronics
Bharat Heavy Electricals Limited
Bharat Petroleum
Bharat Sanchar Nigam
BHAVINI
Cement Corporation of India
Coal India Limited
Dredging Corporation of India Limited
Electronics Corporation of India Limited
Food Corporation of India
GAIL
Hindustan Aeronautics Limited
India Trade Promotion Organisation
Indian Oil Corporation
Indian Rare Earths Limited
Life Insurance Corporation of India
Mazagon Dock Limited
MECON Limited
Mahanagar Telephone Nigam Limited
NTPC Limited
Nuclear Power Corporation of India
Oil and Natural Gas Corporation
Power Grid Corporation of India
Rashtriya Ispat Nigam
Rural Electrification Corporation Limited
State Bank of India
Steel Authority of India
Uranium Corporation of India












v
t
e


CNX Nifty companies of India






ACC
Ambuja Cements
Asian Paints Ltd
Axis Bank
Bajaj Auto
Bank of Baroda
BHEL
BPCL
Bharti Airtel
Cairn India
Cipla
Coal India
DLF
Dr. Reddy's Laboratories
GAIL
Grasim Industries
HCL Technologies
HDFC
HDFC Bank
Hero MotoCorp
Hindalco Industries
HUL
Infosys
ICICI Bank
IDFC
IndusInd Bank Ltd.
ITC Limited
Jindal Steel and Power
Kotak Mahindra Bank
L&T
Lupin
Mahindra & Mahindra
Maruti Udyog
NMDC
NTPC
ONGC
Power Grid Corporation
PNB
Reliance Industries
Sesa Sterlite Limited
SBI
Sun Pharmaceutical
TCS
Tata Motors
Tata Power
Tata Steel
Tech Mahindra
Ultratech Cement
Wipro
Zee Entertainment Enterprises












v
t
e


Public Sector Undertakings in India (List)



Maharatna



Bharat Heavy Electricals
Coal India
Gas Authority of India
Indian Oil Corporation
National Thermal Power Corporation
Oil and Natural Gas Corporation
Steel Authority of India





Navratna



Bharat Electronics
Bharat Petroleum Corporation
Container Corporation of India
Engineers India
Hindustan Aeronautics
Hindustan Petroleum Corporation
Mahanagar Telephone Nigam
National Aluminium Company
National Buildings Construction Corporation
National Mineral Development Corporation
Neyveli Lignite Corporation
Oil India
Power Finance Corporation
Power Grid Corporation of India
Rashtriya Ispat Nigam
Rural Electrification Corporation
Shipping Corporation of India





Miniratna-I



Airports Authority of India
Antrix Corporation
Balmer Lawrie
Bharat Coking Coal
Bharat Dynamics
Bharat Earth Movers
Bharat Sanchar Nigam
Bridge & Roof Company (India)
Central Warehousing Corporation
Central Coalfields
Chennai Petroleum Corporation
Cochin Shipyard
Dredging Corporation of India
Kamarajar Port
Garden Reach Shipbuilders and Engineers
Goa Shipyard
Hindustan Copper
Hindustan Newsprint
Hindustan Paper Corporation
HLL Lifecare
HSCC (India)
Housing and Urban Development Corporation
Indian Railway Catering and Tourism Corporation
Indian Rare Earths
Indian Renewable Energy Development Agency
Ircon International
India Tourism Development Corporation
India Trade Promotion Organisation


Kudremukh Iron Ore Company
Mazagaon Dock
Mahanadi Coalfields
Mangalore Refinery and Petrochemical
Mishra Dhatu Nigam
Metals and Minerals Trading Corporation of India
MOIL
MSTC
National Fertilizers
National Seeds Corporation
Nathpa Jhakri Dam
National Hydroelectric Power Corporation
North Eastern Electric Power Corporation
Northern Coalfields
Numaligarh Refinery
Oil and Natural Gas Corporation
Pawan Hans
Projects and Development India
Rail Vikas Nigam
RailTel Corporation of India
Rashtriya Chemicals & Fertilizers
RITES
Security Printing and Minting Corporation of India
South Eastern Coalfields
State Trading Corporation of India
Telecommunications Consultants India
THDC India
Water and Power Consultancy Services
Western Coalfields





Miniratna-II



Bharat Pumps & Compressors
Broadcast Engineering Consultants India
Central Mine Planning and Design Institute
Central Railside Warehouse Company
Educational Consultants India
Engineering Projects (India) Ltd.
FCI Aravali Gypsum and Minerals (India)
Ferro Scrap Nigam
HMT (International)
Indian Medicines and Pharmaceuticals Corporation
MECON
Mineral Exploration Corporation
National Film Development Corporation of India
National Small Industries Corporation
PEC
Rajasthan Electronics and Instruments






Information updated as of 26 October, 2014 by Ministry of Heavy Industries and Public Enterprises (India) • See also Public sector banks in India








 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Bharat_Petroleum&oldid=791930042"					
Categories: Government-owned companies of IndiaPublic sector in IndiaOil and gas companies of IndiaOil pipeline companiesCompanies based in MumbaiEnergy companies established in 1976Non-renewable resource companies established in 1976Indian companies established in 1976Companies nationalised by the Government of IndiaCNX NiftyCompanies listed on the National Stock Exchange of IndiaIndian brandsHidden categories: Articles needing additional references from April 2015All articles needing additional referencesUse Indian English from February 2016All Wikipedia articles written in Indian EnglishUse dmy dates from February 2016Pages using deprecated image syntaxPages using infobox company with unsupported parameters 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


DeutschفارسیFrançaisहिन्दीಕನ್ನಡमराठीଓଡ଼ିଆРусскийУкраїнська 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 23 July 2017, at 10:39.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Bharat Petroleum - Wikipedia






















 






Bharat Petroleum

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (April 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited
भारत पेट्रोलियम निगम लिमिटेड





Type

Public


Traded as
BSE: 500547
NSE: BPCL


Industry
Oil and gas


Headquarters
Mumbai, Maharashtra, India



Key people

D Rajkumar
(Chairman & Managing Director)


Products
Petroleum, natural gas, and other petrochemicals


Revenue
₹240,367 crore (US$37 billion) (2015)[1]



Operating income

₹9,777 crore (US$1.5 billion) (2015)[1]



Net income

₹5,082 crore (US$790 million) (2015)[1]


Total assets
₹44,866 crore (US$7.0 billion) (2015)[1]


Owner
Government of India (54.93%)



Number of employees

13,535 (2016)[1]


Website
www.bharatpetroleum.com


Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL) is an Indian state-controlled oil and gas company headquartered in Mumbai, Maharashtra. The Corporation operates two large refineries of the country located at Mumbai and Kochi. The company is ranked 358th on the Fortune Global 500 list of the world's biggest corporations as of 2016.[2]



Contents


1 History
2 Company History - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd
3 Operations
4 See also
5 References
6 External links



History[edit]
In 1889 during vast industrial development, an important player in the South Asian market was the Burmah Oil Company. Though incorporated in Scotland in 1886, the company grew out of the enterprises of the Chef Rohit Oil Company, which had been formed in 1871 to refine crude oil produced from primitive hand dug wells in Upper Burma.
In 1928, Asiatic Petroleum Company (India) started cooperation with Burma oil company. This alliance led to the formation of Burmah-Shell Oil Storage and Distributing Company of India Limited. Burmah Shell began its operations with import and marketing of Kerosene.
On 24 January 1976, the Burmah Shell was taken over by the Government of India to form Bharat Refineries Limited. On 1 August 1977, it was renamed Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited. It was also the first refinery to process newly found indigenous crude Bombay High.




BPCL petrol filling station near Nakirekal, Telangana, India


In 2003, following a petition by the Centre for Public Interest Litigation, the Supreme Court restrained the Central government from privatizing Hindustan Petroleum and Bharat Petroleum without the approval of Parliament.[3] As counsel for the CPIL, Rajinder Sachar and Prashant Bhushan said that the only way to disinvest in the companies would be to repeal or amend the Acts by which they were nationalized in the 1970s.[4] As a result, the government would need a majority in both houses to push through any privatization.[5]
Company History - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd[edit]
1928
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) traces its history to 1928 when the Burmah Shell Oil Storage & Distribution Company of India was incorporated in England to enter the petroleum products business in India. The business of the Company grew substantially given the international backing of Shell and it achieved the leadership position in India. In 1952, Shell and Burmah Oil Company set up Burmah Shell Refineries to set up a refinery in Mumbai. The entire operations of Burmah Shell in India were nationalised in 1976 and the Refinery and Marketing Companies were merged to form BPCL.
1952
- The Company was incorporated on 3 November 1952 under the name Burmahshell Refineries Limited (BSR). The Burmah Shell as Storage & Distributing Company of India, Ltd., a foreign company established in England in 1928 was carrying on in India the business of distributing and marketing petroleum products and for that paurpose established places in India.
1955
- The Company has a well established refinery at Mahul, Chembur (Mumbai) which has commissioned in January.
- The company's refinery in Bombay was commissioned in 1955. It introduced LPG as a cooking fuel to the Indian home and all along, it went beyond selling petroleum, to educate the customer.
1976
- The companies name changed to Bharat Refineries Limited (BRL) on 12th, February 1976.
1977
- Companies name changed to its present name (BPCL) on 1 August.
1979
- Pursuant to an agreement dated 23.12.79 bet ween Govt. of India and BSM, the Shell Petroleum Co. Ltd., the Burmah Oil Co. Ltd., and the Burmah Shell Refineries Ltd., the Govt. of India acquired 100% equity share holdings of BSR on 24 January 1976. Simultaneously also acquired the right to title and interest and liabilities of BSM in relation to its undertakings in India.
1992
- During the year the company commissioned 50 retail outlets including 9 in rural areas and 7 superior kerosene oil/light deisel oil dealerships. The total number of retail outlets/light diesel oil dealership at the end of the year stood at 4,090 and 928 respectively.
- During the year, 20% of the shares were sold by the govt. to various financial institutions and Mutual Funds. Thus presently the President of India holds 80% of the paid up capital.
1993
- During the year, the company installed microprocessor based digital integrated distributed control system in catalytic reformer and new solvent unit which replaced the pneumatic control system. Also installed advanced control system for catalytic control unit.
1994
- During the year, the corporation commissioned 124 retail outlets and 10 oil/light diesel oil dealership.
- On 25 February, a joint venture company `Bharat Oman Refineries Ltd' was incorporated. And was set up as a joint venture between Omen oil Co. Ltd and the Corporation.
- During the year, Bharat Shell Ltd. was promoted by the company and Shell Overseas Investments, B V Netherlands for marketing shell branded lubricants in the country.
1995
- During 95-96, a 6 MMTPA joint venture refinery being set up with Oman Oil Company Ltd. at Bina in M.P.
- A MOU was signed on March between the corporation and Pepsi Foods Ltd. pursuant to which customers cars drive upto select retail outlets for chilled pepsi distribution.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd., and Bank of Baroda have signed an MOU to launch the first Co-Branded Credit Card in the country which enables customers to buy petrol, diesel, lubricants and other regular commodities. The cards will carry BPCL and BOB logos and will have two categories - Premium and Regular. The cards can also be used by corporate houses as a facility to its executives for reimbursement of their fuel cost.
1996
- During the year, the corporation commissioned 61 retail outlets and 12 SKO/LDO dealerships. During the year Petronet India Ltd. was set for developing and laying a network of petroleum product pipelines in the country.
- During the year, LPG port terminal was commissioned at Okha in Gujarat, in October, with a storage capacity of 900 MT of LPG.
- The company embarked upon a strategic change plan in 1996. The organisation structure has been revamped and six Strategic Business Units have been created. The new structure is based on business processes, is flexible, more responsive to external changes, has fewer layers, and above all, ensures a much higher customer focus. 1997
- During the year corporation, has entered into a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) with the Ministry of Petroleum & Natural Gas (MOP&NG). The performance rating awarded to BPC was "Excellent" for the year ended March 31, 1996. - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd.(BPCL), has launched Apollo air stations at its petrol pumps in Mumbai. The company had signed a memorandum of understanding recently with Apollo Tyres to provide efficient air facility to customers through BPCL's retail network. - Sanghi Group of industries has signed a Memorandum of Understanding with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited. Under the agreement, BPCL will set up huge infrastructural facilities to ensure uninterrupted supply of fuels for various mega projects being undertaken by the Sanghi group including a cement plant, a petrochemical complex and a 100 per cent EOU spinning unit. - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd. (BPCL), is setting up a six million tonne per annum refinery at Bina, in Madhya Pradesh. The corporation also envisages a single point mooring and a crude oil terminal at Vadinar and a cross country crude oil pipeline from Vadinar to Bina. - ONGC is joining hands with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) for a Rs 2,552,-crore petrochemical project in Hazira, Gujarat. - An agreement to supply around 80,000 tonnes of naphtha per annum for the 230-MW combined cycle power project at Jegurupadu in East Godavari district of Andhra Pradesh, has been signed between GVK Industries Ltd and Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL). - The public sector Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) proposes to lay a pipeline from Cochin to Karur via Coimbatore to transport petrol, high speed diesel and kerosene. - The Gas Authority of India Ltd (GAIL) and Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) signed a memorandum of understanding (MoU) on September 9 for setting up a joint venture to supply pipeline cooking gas in the Capital. - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) and the UK-based global oil major - Shell, are likely to float a new company for setting up the seven million tonnes per annum (mtpa) grassroot refinery at Uttar Pradesh. - State-owned Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has made tentative plans to shut its 120,000 barrel-per-day (bpd) refinery in Mumbai in November or December 1998 for maintenance. - Between January and February, Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd had closed its crude distillation unit and 18,000 bpd fluid catalytic cracker. Its 12,000 bpd cracker was shut in May for 30–35 days. - Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd is to increase its tankage capacity of petroleum products in the eastern region in the Ninth Plan by setting up new terminals involving an expenditure of about Rs 300 crores.
- The company is to set up new terminals at Budge Budge, Haldia and Alipurduar in West Bengal, Jashidih, Gaya, Barauni and Ranchi in Bihar, Balasore, Sambalpur, Rourkela, Rayagada and Paradeep in Orissa besides Lumding and Guwahati.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL), the second largest oil marketing public sector company, has signed a fuel supply agreement with Atria Power Corporation Ltd to generate 103 MW of power at Harihar, in its commitment to bring more power to Karnataka.
- It is also proposed to set up a hospital and build a residential colony in the 3500 acre land of the two projects.
1998
- The Karnataka Power Corporation Limited (KPCL) entered into a fuel supply agreement with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd for its 300-mW joint venture power project at Bidadi.
- The company will open five new, state-of-the-art, self servicing and automatic cut off nozzle facility petrol and diesel bunks in the city.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has entered into an agreement with Herdillia Chemicals Ltd for supply of 10,000 metric tonnes of naphtha for its proposed 5.5MW power project at Turbhe in Navi Mumbai. - Shell and BPCL will hold a 26 per cent stake each in the refinery project. The remaining 48 per cent will be held by institutions and the public. - The joint venture has received a letter of intent for setting up the refinery in Uttar Pradesh and government approval for direct foreign investment.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has launched its new lubricants in Calcutta from February 5.
- Shalivahana Power Corporation Ltd (SPCL) has signed a fuel supply agreement (FSA) with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) for the supply of furnace oil to its 33 MW mini-power plant to be set up at Ghatkesar.
- PIL is a 50:50 joint venture between Bharat Petroleum and Gujarat Gas.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has commissioned its Rs.450-crore Mumbai-Manmad pipeline.
- The Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd workers on April 7, observed strike throughout the country in protest against the managements reported move to damage the corporation.
- BPCL commissioned the first phase of its second coastal storage facility on the east coast at Haldia, West Bengal.
- BPCL is the only company among the three integrated refining and marketing companies - the others being HPCL and Indian Oil Corporation (IOC) - which has had a strong focus on marketing activities.
- BPCL (Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd.) has begun a New Marketing chapter with clear strategies and initiatives for Lubricants.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL) has tied up with Petronet India Limited, the oil-pipeline holding company, to form a joint venture for a 308-km pipeline from Kochi to Karur in Tamil Nadu.
- BPCL and Petronet India Ltd, will each take a 26 per cent equity stake, Cochin Refineries is expected to subscribe to 23 per cent of the equity and the balance 25 per cent will be held by other investors. The total equity will be Rs.140 crore with a 3:1 debt equity ratio.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has entered into in joint venture with Petronet (India) Ltd for the construction of a 308 km pipeline from Kochi in Kerala to Karur in Tamil Nadu.
- The company is India's second largest oil company in terms of market share. - BHARAT Petroleum Corporation Ltd proposes to set up a petrochemical complex, based on a naphtha cracker of 5,00,000-MTPA-ethylene capacity, using low aromatic naphtha available from indigenous/imported sources. It will be set up at a coastal location in Tamil Nadu. BPCL has obtained the "Letter of intent" from the Government of India for manufacture of the products. - BPCL is also setting up a three mtpa refinery at Numaligarh in Assam in a joint venture with IBP Co Ltd and the Government of Assam.
- BPCL has also successfully entered into fuel supply agreements with 22 independent power plants and four captive power plants for the supply of 1.1 mmtpa of naptha and 0.8 mmtpa of furnace oil.
- The company has commissioned the 250-km Mumbai-Manmad product pipeline, which has augmented its supply and distribution network.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) is the third largest oil refining and marketing company in the country.
- INDRAPRASTHA Gas Limited, a joint venture between Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) and the Gas Authority of India (GAIL) is set to revolutionalise transportation in New Delhi.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd has bagged the fuel supply contract for Kerala State Electricity Board's Kozhikode diesel power project at Nallalam.
1999
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) is setting up its LPG bottling plant in Hoskote Taluk near Bangalore.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has commissioned a hydrant fuelling system for aircraft at the Cochin International Airport (CIAL).
- BPCL has taken six per cent equity in the paid-up capital of the airport.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd's (BPCL) joint venture with Oman Oil Co. for setting up a six-million tonne refinery at Bina in Madhya Pradesh is expected to achieve financial closure within a month, said Mr. A. Sinha, BPCL's Finance Director.
- In an attempt to set up its naphtha-fired 200-MW project at top speed, the KPC Bidadi Power Corporation (KBPCL) entered into a fuel supply agreement (FSA) with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) for the supply of 25,0900 mtpa of naphtha.
- Jawaharlal Nehru Port Thrust (JNPT) and Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) signed a license agreement for development of a liquid cargo jetty at Jawaharlal Nehru Port.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) is exploring the option of extending a crude pipeline from its Bina refinery in Madhya Pradesh to Allahabad where it proposes to set up another seven-million-tonne refinery. - The company proposes to construct a crude-oil terminal in Gujarat from where crude will be transported through a pipeline to Bina. - BPCL has introduced the `smart-card' technology at retail outlets in Chennai. - BPCL has also entered into a marketing agreement with Reliance Petroleum Ltd for distributing 25 per cent of its production. - ICICI Bank Ltd has tied up with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) to install off-site ATMs at the company's petrol outlets.
2000
- The Company has entered into a Memorandum of Understanding with the ministry of petroleum & Natural gas for the year 2000-01. The Company has been awarded the `Excellent' rating and has been among the top-10 MoU-signing public sector companies in 1998-99.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd., the Country's second-largest oil company, announced the launch of its `Petro Card' for the retail market in Gujarat.
- Burger giant McDonald's has tied up with oil major Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) to open and run restaurants at selected petrol pumps across the country.
- The Company is mulling over a voluntary retirement scheme for its 3000-odd middle-level management staff.
- The Company signed a Transport Service Agreement with Gas Authority of India Ltd on 1 August.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd., in association with Iftex Petrochemicals Ltd., launched `Bharat Iftex', a co-branded multi functional additive (MFA).
- The Company will issue bonus shares in the ratio of one equity share for every one share held.
- SurfGold.com, the loyalty solution provider an alliance with Bharat Petroleum as one of its major Indian redemption partners.
- The Workers, of the Marketing Division of the Company went on one-day strike on 19 October affecting the normal operations in offices and establishments at Mumbai, Kandla, Solapur, Jalgaon, Jabalpur and Manmad.
- Big Mac has tied up with Bharat Petroleum Corporation for a highway complex on the Delhi-Agra highway, near Mathura.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation has offer bonus equity to its shareholders at a ratio of one bonus share for every one share held.
- The Company has been presented the FICCI award 1999 - 2000 for 'Corporate initiatives in the field of rural developments'.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has launched yet another card product, SmartFleet, aimed at fleet owners and corporates.
- During 2000-01 the company issued bonus shares in the ratio of 1:1, thereby enhancing its equity capital to Rs 300 crore. Also Recently it acquired 55% stake in Kochi Refinery Limited (KRL) from the Government of India and 19% in Numaligarh Refinery Limited (NRL) from IBP.
The company has launched 'Smart fleet', a programme for fleet owners and corporates and the same received an enthusiastic response from over 2500 clients.
-The company has 'Petrocard', an customer loyalty programme, had enrolled over 2.25 lakh customers by theend of March 2001.
2001
- The Company has launched the co-branded SmartFleet card along with Tata Finance, a smart card targeted at vehicle fleet owners and corporates.
- BPCL has tied up with Quicky's, the global coffee chain, Pepsi Foods India and Kwality Walls for providing beverages soft drinks and ice-creams at its petrol pumps.
- Standard Chartered Bank, HDFC Bank and Bharat Petroleum Corporation have joined the eCash Forum which has been set up by the Smart Card Forum of India.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd. has proposed to acquire the entire equity share holding of the Government of India in Kochi refineries Ltd. - Shell Aviation Ltd has appointed Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) as the sole distributor for Shell brands of aero lubes in India. BPCL has signed a contract with Shell Aviation for distribution rights for the next five years.
-'In & Out', a convenience retailing proposition, was selectively launched in 14 retail outlets during the year. This proposition includes utility payments, courier service, ATMs, a coffee shop, music counters, impulse stores, etc.
2002
- S Vijayaraghavan appointed as Additional Director on Board of BPCL
-M B Lal Director (Refineries) relinquishes office from BPCL.
- Tata Engg, BPCL ties up to market co-branded lubricants.
- Mr U Sundararajan has retired from the office of the Chairman & Managing Director, BPCL. Mr S Behuria, Director (Marketing) has taken over as Chairman & Managing Director of BPCL w e f July 1, 2002.
- BPCL introduced premium grade petrol "Speed" in Mumbai.
- SCI tie-up with BPCL for crude transportation.
- BPCL introduced 5 kg cylinder for rural market.
- BPCL ties up with Cafe Coffee Day to open Cafe Coffee Day outlets in select In&Out BPCL petrol pumps.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd informed that Shri S Radhakrishnan, Executive Director (Marketing Coordination) has been appointed as Director on the Board of the company and he has taken over as Director (Marketing) with effect from November 1, 2002.
- Mr. Mukesh Rohatgi, Executive Director (Refinery) has been appointed as Director on the Board of the BPCL and he has taken charge as Director (Refineries) w.e.f. November 14, 2002. Mr. Naresh Narad, Special Secretary, Ministry of Petroleum & Natural Gas, Government Nominee Director on the Board of BPCL has relinquished the Directorship w.e.f. November 11, 2002 on his appointment as Secretary, Ministry of Heavy Industries & Public Enterprises.
- ALF ties up with BPCL to launch 'affinity cards'
2003
- The board of Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) is being restructured with the induction of four new non-executive directors. The directors, all professionals of long standing, are the former chairman of Indian Oil MA Pathan, former chairman of Indian Airlines PC Sen, former chairman of railway board BD Gupta and director of the Indian Institute of Management, Kozhikode, AH Kalro.
- BPCL & ONGC signs agreement to sale crude oil for a period of 2 years
- Bharat Petroleum (BPCL) has forged an alliance with Petrovietnam for the purpose of supplying 200,00 tonnes of naptha in the next 9 months.
- BPCL ties up with HLL for marketing durables, FMCG products via LPG outlets.
- BPCL launches 'Speed '93'
- Hyderabad: Bharat petroleum corporation Ltd (BPCL) has rolled out its new plan for Bharatgas customers. The new offer called 'Beyond LPG' was unveiled in twin cities which comes with value added services where customers can get the benefit of discounts ranging from 10-20 percnt on all FMCG branded utensils.
- Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd has informed that Shri S Vijayaraghavan, Joint Secretary, Ministry of Petroleum & Natural Gas Government Nominee Director on the Board of the company has resigned from office of director wef September 2, 2003.
Dr P N Khandwalla, Shri P P Kaliaperumal & K Vasudeva Part Time Non Official directors have resigned from office of director wef September 4, 2003
Shri V D Gupta Shri P C Sen & A H Kalro are appointed as part-time non official directors of the company wef September 5, 2003.
-the company has launched premium petrol, 'Speed' on September 9 in Visakhapatnam. The premium petrol is priced marginally higher than the ordinary fuel. The fuel is for the new generation cars and two-wheelers.
- The company has tied up with Hindustan Lever Ltd and three other kitchenware brands for selling grocery items to its LPG customers through its distributor network. the consumers can order all HLL products besides kitchenware from Hawkins, Prestige and Nirlep from Bharatgas distributors in select cities.
-Formed a strategic pact with Honda Siel to help launch gensets and geysers that run on LPG.
-Shri A K Srivastava, Joint Secretary, Ministry of Petroleum & Natural Gas has been appointed as Director—BPCL bags third slot among `Top 10' in Asiamoney's corporate governance poll on Asian companies in the energy sector. And joined the club of a select few Asian companies.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) and Oil and Natural Gas Corporation (ONGC) signed an agreement to cooperate with each other through sharing of their core strengths for exploration and production, and downstream oil refining and marketing.
2003
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) successfully completes its first swap transaction, making it the first public sector oil company to enter into an interest rate derivative transaction
2004
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation is negotiating a five-year agreement with Reliance Industries to buy products from its Jamnagar refinery. A previous product-sourcing agreement between the two companies expires on March 31, 2004.
- IDBI Bank on January 15 said that it has entered into a business-to-business (B2B) e-commerce arrangement with oil major Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) to provide an automated payment and purchase process to the BPCL's corporate and industrial clients.
-BPCL signs an initial contract with Saudi Aramco
- Tie up with Tata Consultancy Services to provide medical advisory and counselling services at Ghar, the highway retailing initiative of BPCL.
-Kochi Refineries Ltd (KRL) signs a memorandum of understanding with Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd regarding capacity utilisation and other production and performance parameters
-Forges alliance with E-Charge Tech Private Limited to distribute electronically pre-paid products like mobile cards, internet cards and calling cards, making it the first company in India to electronically distribute the pre-paid products
-- GAIL India Limited has signed two joint venture agreements with Bharat Petroleum Corporation (BPCL) for implementation of city gas projects in Kanpur and Pune -Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) opened Mak Lubeshoppe at Akkayyapalem here on July 29
-Bharat Petroleum has launched another brand `Hi Speed Diesel'
-BPCL forges alliance with poultry association in Namakkal
-Speed ties up with consortium to sponsor domestic motor racing
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has entered into a marketing tie-up with automobile manufacturer Tata Motors for marketing of engine oils as co-branded lubricants for their commercial vehicles
2005
- BPCL launches Speed 97, its new brand of high-octane petrol mixed with lubricant additives, meant to improve vehicle performance
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd has launched a new concept of `Vehicle Care Centres' at its retail outlets
-Madhya Pradesh Government signs a memorandum of understanding (MoU) with Bharat Oman Refineries Ltd to set up a six-million-tonne per annum refinery at Bina on May 6, 2005
2006
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has announced that the Company & MMTC have jointly decided to work together in the area of domestic and international marketing of hydro-carbon by leveraging their core business strength in the global commodity trading.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has announced that the Company has entered into an MOU with Petroleo Brasileiro SA (Petrobras),
-BPCL acquires first Nigerian Erha cargo
-BPCL has informed that Shri. D N Narasimha Raju, Joint Secretary, Ministry of Petroleum & Natural Gas (MoP&NG) has been reappointed as Additional Director effective December 18, 2006.
2007
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has informed that Prof N Venkiteswaran, has been appointed as Additional Director effective July 16, 2007.
-BPCL acquires interest in North Sea basin
-BPCL to offload 49-pc stake in Bharat Shell
2008
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has appointed Ms. Rama Bijapurkar and Shri. S K Barua as Additional Director w.e.f. May 20, 2008.
-BPCL venture to infuse Rs 2,200cr in bio-diesel project
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL) is mulling to establish a 5-Mw wind power farm in Andhra Pradesh.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd has unveiled a GPS-technology based vehicle tracking system for its 5,200 tanker trucks fleet.
2009
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) has informed BSE that BPCL, Oman Oil Company (OOC) and Bharat Oman Refinery Ltd. (BORL) have signed an agreement on November 15, 2009 in Oman related to additional investment by OOC in BORL.
-BPCL Farm-in into the Nunukan PSC in Indonesia
2010
-Bharat Petroleum Corp Ltd (BPCL) stated that natural gas reserves have been discovered in a block off Mozambique where it has a minority stake.
-BPCL announces successful pre-salt flow test offshore Brazil
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) commissioned its international bunkering facilities at the Kochi port.
-BPCL enters into agreement with M/s. Norwest to acquire Shale Gas acreages in Australia"
-BPCL announces Major Natural Gas discovery in offshore Mozambique.
-BPCL discovers hydrocarbon in ultra deep water of Sergipe-Alagoas Basin, Brazil.
-BPCL announces Oil and Gas discovery in Offshore Indonesia
-BPCL appoints R K Singh as new BPCL chairman
-Bharat Petroleum walked away with two prestigious Communication Awards at the Golden Jubilee function of the Annual Association of Business Communicators of India (ABCI) Awards Nite held at the Taj Mahal Hotel
-BPCL won the Silver Award for our Inhouse Publication, Petro Plus and the Bronze Award for our Online Web Campaign
-Bharat Petroleum was awarded the 1st position under the Best Display in Raw Space category during a spectacular awards ceremony at the recently concluded Petrotech-2010 exhibition at Pragati Maidan, New Delhi. The theme this year was Global Energy Equilibrium.
-BPCL corporate website www.bharatpetroleum.in bagged the first prize in the category ‘Most user friendly website (editors choice) in the India eGov 2.0 Awards 2010.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd receives Green Business Leaders Award: 2009- 2010
-NDTV Recognizes BPCL With Prestigious Corporate Sustainability Report Award
-BPCL has secured 289th ranking during 2008-09 in the prestigious list of Fortune Global 500
2011
-Tyre manufacturer Goodyear India has entered into an agreement with PSU major Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd to open tyre care shops at some of their petrol pumps.
-BPCL discovered of oil and gas in Sergipe-Alagoas Basin, Brazil
2012 -BPCL 's Another major appraisal success in Offshore Mozambique for BPRL
-BPCL in Successful Flow Test Offshore Mozambique
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd informs that "BPRL Announces Extension of Exploration Success with New Discovery Area in Offshore Mozambique".
-BPCL invests Rs 75 cr to set up 22 kV substation at Kochi Refinery
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd. , second largest public sector oil marketing company, has signed an MOU with LG Chem South Korea for a Joint Venture to set up a petrochemical plant adjacent to its Kochi Refinery Complex.
-BPCL - Discovery of Hydrocarbons in Espirito Santo Bash, Offshore Brazil.
-BPCL - Discovery of Hydrocarbons in Cauvery Onland in Tamil Nadu
-State run Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL) has signed a Memorandum of Understanding (MoU) with Kerala government. Following the development, the state government would extend tax deferments to BPCL's Integrated Refinery Expansion Project (IREP) and petrochemical complex.
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd (BPCL) is in planned investments of up to Rs 45,000 crore by 2017 towards upstream projects as well as downstream expansion.
-BPCL l discovers New oil in the deep water of Sergipe - Alagoas Basin, Brasil
-Bharat Petroleum Corp Ltd (BPCL) has managed to raise USD 500 million through a maiden 10 year bond issue. The move market the debut of BPCL into the international debt market and the proceeds from issue would be used by the company to fund its capital expenditure. -Bharat Petroleum Corporation has given the Bonus in the Ratio of 1:1
2013 -Petrobras completes formation test in Farfan area in Sergipe-Alagoas Basin, Brazil. -BPRL announces new natural gas discovery in offshore Mozambique. -Bharat gas introduces IVRS to book gas refill services. -BPCL begins IVRS refill booking system in Kerala -BPCL has launched Universal Tractor Transmission Oil MAK Trac Magic + which is a special formulated lubricant for tractors, in the market of Punjab and Haryana.
2014 -Bharat Petroleum - BPRL announces Increase in Recoverable Natural Gas Resources in Mozambique. -Bharat Petroleum - Gas Discovery in Cauvery Basin, India by ONGC - BPRL Consortium.
2015
-Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL) has received approval from Environment Ministry for Rs 4,588 crore expansion at its refinery facility -BPCL acquires additional shares of Petronet CCK Limited -BPCL,along with GAIL Gas, a 100% subsidiary of GAIL India will jointly develop the City Gas Distribution Network (CGD Network) in Haridwar district. -BPCL has commissioned a new art Crude Distillation Unit (CDU) in Mumbai.
Operations[edit]
Bharat Petroleum operates the following refineries:

Mumbai Refinery : Located near Mumbai, Maharashtra. It has a capacity of 13 million metric tonnes per year.[6]
Kochi Refineries : Located near Kochi, Kerala. It has a capacity of 15.5  million metric tonnes per year.[7]
Bina Refinery : Located near Bina, Sagar district, Madhya Pradesh. It has a capacity of 6  million metric tonnes per year. This refinery is operated by Bharat Oman Refineries Limited, a joint venture between Bharat Petroleum and Oman Oil Company.
Numaligarh Refinery : Located near Numaligarh, Golaghat district, Assam. It has a capacity of 3  million metric tonnes per year.

The company business is divided in seven SBUs( Strategic Business Units), like Retail, Lubricants, Aviation, Refinery, Gas, I&C and LPG.
They have popular Loyalty Program like Petrocard, Smartfleet.
See also[edit]

Rajiv Gandhi Institute of Petroleum Technology[8]

References[edit]



^ a b c d e "BPCL Annual Report". CNBC TV18. 
^ "Fortune Global 500 list". CNN Money. Retrieved 22 July 2016. 
^ SAMANWAYA RAUTRAY AND PHEROZE L. VINCENT (March 4, 2011). "Feather in cap for graft fighters". The Telegraph. Retrieved 2012-04-26. 
^ Ramakrishna, G. V. (2004). Two Score and Ten: My Experiences in Government. Academic Foundation. p. 301. ISBN 8171883397. 
^ Gopal Ganesh (2008). Privatisation And Labour Restructuring. Academic Foundation. p. 136. ISBN 8171886345. 
^ http://www.bharatpetroleum.in/EnergisingEnvironment/MumbaiRefinery.aspx?id=3
^ http://www.thehindubusinessline.com/news/national/integrated-expansion-project-boosts-bpclkochi-refinery/article9677392.ece
^ http://www.topnews.in/sonia-lay-foundation-rajiv-gandhi-petroleum-institute-rae-bareli-221339



External links[edit]

Official website
Bharat gas Booking

Bharat Gas






v
t
e


Major Indian companies






Economy of India
List of companies of India





Automotive



Ashok Leyland
Bajaj Auto
Eicher Motors
Hero MotoCorp
Hindustan Motors
Mahindra & Mahindra
TAFE
Tata Motors
TVS





Aerospace
& Defence



Bharat Electronics
DRDO
HAL
Ordnance Factories





Conglomerates



Aditya Birla
Adani
Avantha
Bajaj
Bharti
DCM
Essar
Essel
GMR
Godrej
GVK
Hinduja
ITC
Jaypee
Jindal
Kirloskar
JSW
L&T
Lanco
Mahindra
Muthoot
Murugappa
RP-Sanjiv Goenka Group
Ramoji
Reliance ADAG
Reliance
RPG
Sahara
Shapoorji Pallonji
Sun
Tata
TVS
Torrent
UB
Videocon
Wadia





Civil Aviation



Air India
IndiGo
Jet Airways
SpiceJet
GoAir





Consumer Goods
& Retail



Britannia Industries
Dabur
Flipkart
Future Group
Godrej Consumer
Hindustan Unilever
ITC
Nirma
Reliance Retail
Tata Global Beverages
Patanjali Ayurved
Emami





Energy &
Natural Resources



Bharat Petroleum
Cairn India
Chennai Petroleum
Coal India
GAIL
Essar Oil
Hindustan Petroleum
Indian Oil Corporation
National Aluminum
NHPC
NMDC
NLC
NTPC
Oil India
ONGC
Power Finance
Power Grid
RINL
Reliance Infrastructure
RECL
SCI
Vedanta Limited
Suzlon Energy
Tata Power





Finance



Andhra Bank
Axis Bank
Bank of Baroda
Bank of India
Canara Bank
Central Bank of India
HDFC Bank
ICICI Bank
IDBI Bank
ING Vysya Bank
Jammu & Kashmir Bank
Kotak Mahindra Bank
LIC
MUDRA Bank
Muthoot Finance Ltd
Punjab National Bank
SBI
Tamilnad Mercantile Bank
Union Bank of India
Yes Bank





Healthcare,
Pharmaceutical
& Biotech



Aurobindo Pharma
Cadila Healthcare
Cipla
Glenmark Pharmaceuticals
Dr. Reddy's
IDPL
IIL
Lupin
Sun Pharmaceutical





Manufacturing &
Heavy Industries



ACC
Ambuja
Apollo Tyres
Asian Paints Ltd
Bengal Chemicals and Pharmaceuticals
Bhushan
BHEL
DLF
Gammon India
Havells
HCC
Hindalco
India Cements
Jindal Steel
JSW
Mittal Steel Company
MRF
SAIL
Tata Steel
UltraTech





Information technology



HCL Technologies
Infosys
Tata Consultancy Services
Tech Mahindra
Wipro





Media



Sun Group
The Times Group
Living Media
Zee Entertainment Enterprises





Telecommunications



Aircel
Airtel
BSNL
Idea Cellular
Jio
Micromax Mobile
MTNL
Reliance Communications
Tata Communications






Benchmark: FY 2015-16 revenues of over US$ 1 billion










v
t
e


Central public sector companies of India






Air India
Balmer Lawrie
Bharat Electronics
Bharat Heavy Electricals Limited
Bharat Petroleum
Bharat Sanchar Nigam
BHAVINI
Cement Corporation of India
Coal India Limited
Dredging Corporation of India Limited
Electronics Corporation of India Limited
Food Corporation of India
GAIL
Hindustan Aeronautics Limited
India Trade Promotion Organisation
Indian Oil Corporation
Indian Rare Earths Limited
Life Insurance Corporation of India
Mazagon Dock Limited
MECON Limited
Mahanagar Telephone Nigam Limited
NTPC Limited
Nuclear Power Corporation of India
Oil and Natural Gas Corporation
Power Grid Corporation of India
Rashtriya Ispat Nigam
Rural Electrification Corporation Limited
State Bank of India
Steel Authority of India
Uranium Corporation of India












v
t
e


CNX Nifty companies of India






ACC
Ambuja Cements
Asian Paints Ltd
Axis Bank
Bajaj Auto
Bank of Baroda
BHEL
BPCL
Bharti Airtel
Cairn India
Cipla
Coal India
DLF
Dr. Reddy's Laboratories
GAIL
Grasim Industries
HCL Technologies
HDFC
HDFC Bank
Hero MotoCorp
Hindalco Industries
HUL
Infosys
ICICI Bank
IDFC
IndusInd Bank Ltd.
ITC Limited
Jindal Steel and Power
Kotak Mahindra Bank
L&T
Lupin
Mahindra & Mahindra
Maruti Udyog
NMDC
NTPC
ONGC
Power Grid Corporation
PNB
Reliance Industries
Sesa Sterlite Limited
SBI
Sun Pharmaceutical
TCS
Tata Motors
Tata Power
Tata Steel
Tech Mahindra
Ultratech Cement
Wipro
Zee Entertainment Enterprises












v
t
e


Public Sector Undertakings in India (List)



Maharatna



Bharat Heavy Electricals
Coal India
Gas Authority of India
Indian Oil Corporation
National Thermal Power Corporation
Oil and Natural Gas Corporation
Steel Authority of India





Navratna



Bharat Electronics
Bharat Petroleum Corporation
Container Corporation of India
Engineers India
Hindustan Aeronautics
Hindustan Petroleum Corporation
Mahanagar Telephone Nigam
National Aluminium Company
National Buildings Construction Corporation
National Mineral Development Corporation
Neyveli Lignite Corporation
Oil India
Power Finance Corporation
Power Grid Corporation of India
Rashtriya Ispat Nigam
Rural Electrification Corporation
Shipping Corporation of India





Miniratna-I



Airports Authority of India
Antrix Corporation
Balmer Lawrie
Bharat Coking Coal
Bharat Dynamics
Bharat Earth Movers
Bharat Sanchar Nigam
Bridge & Roof Company (India)
Central Warehousing Corporation
Central Coalfields
Chennai Petroleum Corporation
Cochin Shipyard
Dredging Corporation of India
Kamarajar Port
Garden Reach Shipbuilders and Engineers
Goa Shipyard
Hindustan Copper
Hindustan Newsprint
Hindustan Paper Corporation
HLL Lifecare
HSCC (India)
Housing and Urban Development Corporation
Indian Railway Catering and Tourism Corporation
Indian Rare Earths
Indian Renewable Energy Development Agency
Ircon International
India Tourism Development Corporation
India Trade Promotion Organisation


Kudremukh Iron Ore Company
Mazagaon Dock
Mahanadi Coalfields
Mangalore Refinery and Petrochemical
Mishra Dhatu Nigam
Metals and Minerals Trading Corporation of India
MOIL
MSTC
National Fertilizers
National Seeds Corporation
Nathpa Jhakri Dam
National Hydroelectric Power Corporation
North Eastern Electric Power Corporation
Northern Coalfields
Numaligarh Refinery
Oil and Natural Gas Corporation
Pawan Hans
Projects and Development India
Rail Vikas Nigam
RailTel Corporation of India
Rashtriya Chemicals & Fertilizers
RITES
Security Printing and Minting Corporation of India
South Eastern Coalfields
State Trading Corporation of India
Telecommunications Consultants India
THDC India
Water and Power Consultancy Services
Western Coalfields





Miniratna-II



Bharat Pumps & Compressors
Broadcast Engineering Consultants India
Central Mine Planning and Design Institute
Central Railside Warehouse Company
Educational Consultants India
Engineering Projects (India) Ltd.
FCI Aravali Gypsum and Minerals (India)
Ferro Scrap Nigam
HMT (International)
Indian Medicines and Pharmaceuticals Corporation
MECON
Mineral Exploration Corporation
National Film Development Corporation of India
National Small Industries Corporation
PEC
Rajasthan Electronics and Instruments






Information updated as of 26 October, 2014 by Ministry of Heavy Industries and Public Enterprises (India) • See also Public sector banks in India








 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Bharat_Petroleum&oldid=791930042"					
Categories: Government-owned companies of IndiaPublic sector in IndiaOil and gas companies of IndiaOil pipeline companiesCompanies based in MumbaiEnergy companies established in 1976Non-renewable resource companies established in 1976Indian companies established in 1976Companies nationalised by the Government of IndiaCNX NiftyCompanies listed on the National Stock Exchange of IndiaIndian brandsHidden categories: Articles needing additional references from April 2015All articles needing additional referencesUse Indian English from February 2016All Wikipedia articles written in Indian EnglishUse dmy dates from February 2016Pages using deprecated image syntaxPages using infobox company with unsupported parameters 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


DeutschفارسیFrançaisहिन्दीಕನ್ನಡमराठीଓଡ଼ିଆРусскийУкраїнська 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 23 July 2017, at 10:39.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 



















Bharat Petroleum Corp Ltd, East Gokalpur, Delhi - Petroleum Product Dealers - Justdial




























 












































×






All Restaurants
Home Delivery Restaurants
Restaurants in 5 Star Hotels
Buffet
Sunday Brunch 
Nightlife 
Cafes
Sweet Tooth

















×












Air Tickets 
Anything on Hire 
Apply for Loans 
Auto care 
Automobile 
B2B 
Baby Care 
Banquets 
Bills & Recharge 
Book Hotel 
Books 
Bus 
Cabs & Car rentals 
Caterers 
Chemists 
Civil Contractors 
Courier 
Daily Needs 
Dance & Music 
Doctor 
Education 
Emergency 
Entertainment 
Event Organizer 
Fitness 
Flights 
Foreign Exchange 
Flowers 
Home Decor 
Home Improvements 
Hospitals 
Hotels 
House Keeping 
Industrial Products 
Insurance 
Interior Designer 
International SIM Card 
Internet 
Jobs 
Jewellery 
Labs 
Language Classes 
Loan & Credit Card 
Medical 
Modular Kitchen 
Movies 
On Demand Services 
Packers and Movers 
Party 
Personal Care 
Pest Control 
Pet and Pet Care 
Play School 
Real Estate 
Repairs 
Restaurants 
Shop Online 
Security Services 
Shopping 
Sports Coach 
Sports Goods 
Train 
Training Institute 
Transporters 
Travel 
Wedding 
Wine Shop 





Free Listing
Advertise 
Favorites 


Login
or
Sign Up

































 Bharat Petroleum Corp Ltd







4.3 
 

  15  Votes













																										East Gokalpur															






+(91)-120-2683003, 2683025 

...






















SMS/Email










Call





Write a Review



















Your Vote ( - )
Rate this





Edit This





Manage Campaign











Click here to view your friends rating














 


 


 


 


 


 


 

Add Photo










+(91)-120-2683003, 2683025




+(91)-120-2683025



 



Loni LPG Territory, Bpcl, Hastinapur Yojana, East Gokalpur, Ghaziabad - 201010, Loni








							Petroleum Product Dealers						





				Petroleum Product Dealers 
 
Less




					bpcl.eproc.in
						



					eprocure.gov.in
						






Hours of Operation (View all)(Show less)


Today


								 09:00 am - 05:30 pm							

Closed Now





Monday 
 09:00 am - 05:30 pm


Tuesday 
 09:00 am - 05:30 pm


Wednesday 
 09:00 am - 05:30 pm


Thursday 
 09:00 am - 05:30 pm


Friday 
 09:00 am - 05:30 pm


Saturday 
 09:00 am - 05:30 pm


Sunday 
 Closed - Closed




Also Listed in


Petroleum Product Dealers



Additional Information

 Lpg Petrol Pump Plant










 FREE Home Delivery, and 10% Off for First Time Users
										






Reviews

Mr Sahil
has rated 5.0 stars







Hours Of Operation

Today : 09:00 am - 05:30 pm
(View all)






More Information

Phone number, website, Get Directions, Listing, Buissness etc










Best Deal



 

											WRITE A REVIEW 



 

REVIEWS & RATINGS












All Ratings (15)
			
Friends Ratings
			
My Ratings 
			







Overall Ratings (15)































Mr Sahil

 

6th Dec, 2016




Excellent










Mr Shailender Sharma

 

7th Nov, 2016




Excellent










Mr Mahavir

 

9th Oct, 2016




Average










Mr Jayad Khan

 

7th Jan, 2016




Excellent










Mr Aman Arora

 

1st May, 2015

aman*****@gmail.com								
							

Excellent










Mr Sajid

 

4th Jan, 2015




Excellent










Ms Madhu

 

29th Nov, 2014




Excellent










Mr Mohit

 

24th Oct, 2014

aksh*****@tatamotors.com								
							

Excellent










Mr Ajay

 

6th Jul, 2014




Excellent










Mr Ramlal

 

26th Apr, 2014




Excellent























Please rate your experience 


















Add Review
Review Guidelines




Share with friends

Facebook

Twitter




Attach Photos to this Review (Optional)







Uploading Images
Cancel

Uploding Image



Upload Images
Remove All

























































- Upload photos of "Bharat Petroleum Corp Ltd"
- Please share photos of your experiences there
- Avoid uploading personal/ family photographs taken elsewhere
- Do not upload photos from internet as they cause copyright issues





Submit



 
Review Upload in Progress
	







 
Review Upload in Progress
							








Most Searched
Home Delivery Restaurants
Electricians
Paying Guest Accommodation For Women
Hotels
Aadhaar Card Agents
Taxi Services
Electricians
Taxi Services
Water Parks
Personal Loans

























X

Send Enquiry By Email



To
Bharat Petroleum Corp Ltd


Name*



Mobile No



Email*



Body*




OK


* Denotes mandatory fields.






X

Send Enquiry By Email

					Thank you, your enquiry has been sent.
				





X

 




Your Name *



Your Mobile Number *



Your Email ID (Optional)



 



Submit







							Your requirement is sent to the selected relevant businesses						


							Businesses compete with each other to get you the 						


							You choose whichever suits you best
						


							Contact Info sent to you by SMS/Email
						

  



X

Your number is in NDNC (National Do Not Call Registry), we have sent verification code via SMS. Please enter the verification code in the box below and click SUBMIT.











							Your requirement is sent to the selected relevant businesses						


							Businesses compete with each other to get you the 						


							You choose whichever suits you best
						


							Contact Info sent to you by SMS/Email
						

  



X






You have reached your maximum limit of attempts for the day.
We are therefore unable to send any SMS on the mobile number provided by you.




X







Hi ,
Thank you for using Justdial.com
Your details have been sent to vendors who would compete for your requirement.
Alternatively you could call these vendors and negotiate.




X

Select what you are looking for



 Petroleum Product Dealers




Your Name *



Your Mobile Number *



Your Email ID (Optional)





 


Submit







							Your requirement is sent to the selected relevant businesses						


							Businesses compete with each other to get you the Best Deal						


							You choose whichever suits you best
						


							Contact Info sent to you by SMS/Email
						

  












Thank you for using Justdial.com
Your details have been sent to vendors who would compete for your requirement.
Alternatively you could call these vendors and negotiate.
 
 

Be Smart, Buy Smart
Fill this form and get best deals
 

 


Your requirement is sent to the selected relevant businesses



Businesses compete with each other to get you the Best Deal



You choose whatever suits you best



Contact Info is sent to you by SMS/Email

   





X


Upload Photos of Bharat Petroleum Corp Ltd

				Only JPG, GIF, PNG files are allowed, Maximum file size of 10 MB.
			


	1.  
	2.  
	3.  
	4.  
	5.  

 I agree to the terms & conditions


Photo Upload Guidelines


Upload






















X
Thanks for sharing with us!

Upload more photos
Exit





X

Report Abuse!



Name *



Contact *



Email ID *



Comments *



 
Send






X

Help us improve this listing
Select from the options below



Report as inaccurate



Edit this business



Report that business has shutdown

Submit





X

Edit Listing

Please select an appropriate option from below to make changes. 



I own this listing / I work here.



I am a User. 


Submit





X

Edit Listing
				Verification
				In order to confirm you own this listing, please enter the verification code.
Click to Get Verification Code

					(The verification SMS/Email will be sent on the Mobile number or Email id registered with Justdial) 
				




X

Manage Campaign
				Verification
				In order to confirm you own this listing, please enter the verification code.
Click to Get Verification Code

					(The verification SMS/Email will be sent on the Mobile number or Email id registered with Justdial) 
				




X

Report Inaccurate !
If you find any details incorrect, let us know by entering a comment here.





Submit





X

Thank you for your inputs.
We shall verify and update the same.

Submit









X



What is Just Dial Verified?



					"Just Dial/JD verified" means, the information related to name, address, contact details of the business establishments have been verified as existing at the time of registering any advertiser with Just Dial. This verification is solely based on the documents as supplied by an advertiser/s or as per the details contained in Customer Registration Form. 
				



We strongly recommend our Users/callers to exercise their discretion & due diligence about all relevant aspects prior to availing any products/services. Please note that Just Dial does not implicitly or explicitly endorse any product/s or services provided by advertisers/service providers. 




					For more details please refer to terms and conditions. 
				

 


X


Get information by SMS/Email
Enter the details below and click on SEND



Name



Mobile
+91

(Only India Numbers.SMS to Mobile is FREE)


Email



 
Send

 Processing...









X
Verification

We have sent you a Verification Code by SMS.
For your rating/review to be considered, please enter the code here.




−

Verify
Did not receive the verification code?
To resend the same on your mobile phone - Click Here







X
Review/Rating
You have reached your maximum limit of attempts for the day.


OK






X
Rating & Review
Thank You for the rating/review. All submitted content will be the sole property of justdial.com and may be used, edited or rejected at Just Dial's sole discretion.


 OK 





X
Review/Rating
You have already rated this 

OK




X
Review/Rating
You have exceeded your maximum limit of rating for last three hours.

OK




X
Thank you for your rating/review.
Your rating/review will be under moderation as you have not verified your mobile number.All submitted content will be the sole property of justdial.com and may be used, edited or rejected at Just Dial's sole discretion.

OK




X
Content Uploading
Authentication

			For your own business interest we require you to confirm that you own this listing by entering the verification code.
		

Click To Get Verification Code


			(The verification SMS/Email will be sent on the mobile number or Email id registered with justdial)
		





X
Also Listed In




Petroleum Product Dealers








 


X
Just Dial Rating Guidelines


Rate your very own experience and help us serve you better !!!

					By taking a few moments to rate local businesses, services, and destinations, you're helping friends, neighbors, and visitors find the best places to eat, shop, get stuff done, and enjoy themselves.
				

					By submitting your rating, you agree that Justdial may include your rating in its Justdial website and publicly post your comments. You may submit only one rating per local listing. 
				

					Justdial reserves the right to refuse or remove any rating that does not comply with the below Guidelines or the Justdial Terms of Service. Justdial is not responsible or liable in any way for ratings posted by its users.
				




Guidelines to rate a listing

					Be frank and honest. Tell us how you really feel and why. Useful ratings are detailed and specific, and give the readers a feel of your experience.	
				

					Think what information you want when you ask a friend or co-worker to recommend you a restaurant, a service, an activity, or a business. 
				
Here are some questions you might want to answer in your rating:

 Were you satisfied with the overall experience? Would you want to experience it again? 
				

 Do you believe this store/service was better as compared to other similar businesses that you have experienced earlier? Do you think you got value for your money?  
				

 Do you believe the whole experience was special? Did you have to compromise in any way? If yes, was it worth it? 
				

 Would you recommend this service to others?  
				

 Try to present facts and keep it objective. Was your pizza hot? Were the wraps fresh? 
				

 Keep it short & sweet. Write short sentences that stick to the point and focus on your experience. The recommended length for a local review is from 100 to 250 words. 
				
Please

Do not spoil it for others. Do not abuse the service. Ratings should not harass, abuse, or threaten someone personal safety or property, make false statements, defame, impersonate anyone, contain profanity, be sexually explicit, illegal or otherwise objectionable content, as determined by Justdial in its sole discretion.


Do not post personal information. Never assume that you are completely anonymous and cannot be identified by your posts. Rating should not include personal information, such as email addresses, mailing addresses, phone numbers or credit card numbers belonging to you or others.


Do not post multiple or commercial ratings. Ratings should not include posts that have spam, commercial or advertising content or links. 


Do not imitate or copy others' trademarks or material. Ratings should include your own, original thoughts. We want to hear from you!

How does the rating system work?

					The rating a business or service receives is determined by the average rating it gets from all who have rated it. Ratings are based on a scale of 1 to 5 stars:
				


Excellent







Very Good






Good





Average




Poor



BACK TO WRITE A REVIEW







X







X

Bharat Petroleum Corp Ltd - Services Offered






X

Thank you for your rating/review.
All submitted content will be the sole property of justdial.com and may be used, edited or rejected at Just Dial's sole discretion.






X


Register with Justdial


			To register with justdial.com enter the password of your choice.
		





Register
Skip This Step


Benefits Of Registration

Tag your friends on Justdial and share reviews on various places visited by you
Send yourself free SMS/Email of any business listed with Justdial on one click
Benefit through 53 million reviews on business across the country





X


Register with Justdial


			To register with justdial.com enter the password of your choice.
		
Please Enter Password







Register
Skip This Step


Benefits Of Registration

Tag your friends on Justdial and share reviews on various places visited by you
Send yourself free SMS/Email of any business listed with Justdial on one click
Benefit through 53 million reviews on business across the country





X
Share With Friends


Facebook
Twitter
Google +
Linkedin
Pinterest
VKontakte
SMS
Email






X


Share Information by Email
Enter your friend details below and click on SEND











Name





Email


















Send






X


Share Information by SMS
Enter your friend details below and click on SEND











Name





Mobile




+91














Send





X
Mobile Verification

We have sent you a Verification Code by SMS.
Please enter the verification code in the box below and click SEND to share listing with your friends




−

Send
Did not receive the verification code?
To resend the same on your mobile phone - 





X

Share With Friends





X


				To submit your ratings, please provide the following information
			


Name*




Mobile*
+91




Email




 
Submit

* denotes mandatory fields
					






X
Verification
We have sent you a Verification Code by SMS.
For your rating/review to be considered, please enter the code here.





−


Verify
Did not receive the verification code?
To resend the same on your mobile phone - Click Here






X
Rating & Review
Thank You for the rating/review. All submitted content will be the sole property of justdial.com and may be used, edited or rejected at Just Dial's sole discretion.


 OK 




X

Are you the owner of this business?

YES
NO





X

Please enter your Mobile Number below to get the Verification code.





Submit





X

We have sent you the verification on the following number

Enter the Verification below




−



Submit





X

Thank you, your mobile number has been verified successfully
Proceed to upload photos




X
This number is blocked from availing this service. To know the reasons please write to rusers@justdial.com
OK


X

Help us improve this listing
Select from the options below

Report as inaccurate
Edit / Modify this business
Upload photos
Report abuse
Report that business has shutdown
Remove My Listing
Own this






X
Mobile Verification
Enter the verification code sent on your mobile number "" and click on SEND


Verification Code


−


Send





X

Please select from the areas listed below







X
Unable to process your request







X
Contact Information Of  Bharat Petroleum Corp Ltd
 +(91)-120-2683003, 2683025
+(91)-120-2683025
Loni LPG Territory, Bpcl, Hastinapur Yojana, East Gokalpur, Ghaziabad - 201010, Loni


bpcl.eproc.in
							 | 								eprocure.gov.in





Bharat Petroleum Corp Ltd,  Loni LPG Territory, Bpcl, Hastinapur Yojana, East Gokalpur, Ghaziabad - 201010, Loni





Get Direction
My Location





























Get Direction


x







Privacy | 
			Terms

 	Copyrights 2008-17. All Rights Reserved.
 









×
Review Guidelines

Your review will be posted on justdial.com website subject to conditions:

Justdial reserves the right to refuse and remove any review.
Justdial will not be held responsible or accept any liability of reviews posted for any  











You are here:





Home


Petroleum Product Dealers in Delhi





Petroleum Product Dealers in East Gokalpur




Bharat Petroleum Corp Ltd


















































































Stock News, Latest Stock Market News | Share Market News - The Economic Times


   
Never miss a great news story!Get instant notifications from Economic TimesAllowNot nowYou can switch off notifications anytime using browser settings.SECTIONSET APPSET Android AppET iPhone AppET iPad AppET Wealth Android AppET Blackberry AppET Nokia AppET Markets Android AppET Markets iPhone AppET Money Android AppENGLISHहिन्दीગુજરાતીE-PAPERSIGN-INFOLLOW USFACEBOOKTWITTERYOUTUBELINKEDINGOOGLE PLUSRSSStocksLATEST NEWSSebi forms committee on fair market conductRupee rallies 12 paise to 2.5-month high on RBI rate cut hopesEIH Q1 net profit at Rs 9.48 croreJSW Steel Q1 net profit falls 43% to Rs 624 crorePiramal Enterprises Q1 net profit up 43% to Rs 247.46 croreIndia refiners outshine Asia peers with new output, rising local demandETMarkets Evening Podcast: Is sky the limit for Dalal Street now?Marico Q1 net profit falls 16% on higher input costsWestlife Development posts marginal net profit for June quarterET Home›Markets›Stocks04:05 PM | 01 Augmarket statsSENSEX32,57560.23NIFTY 5010,11537.55GOLD (MCX) (Rs/10g.)28,520-37.00USD/INR64.07-0.11PortfolioLoading...Select Portfolio and Asset Combination for Display on Market BandSelect PortfolioSelect Asset ClassStocksMFETFShow MoreCREATE PORTFOLIOADD INVESTMENT
                    	Download ET MARKETS APP
                    Get ET Markets in your own languageDOWNLOAD THE APP NOW+91CHOOSE LANGUAGEENGENG - EnglishHIN - हिन्दीGUJ - ગુજરાતીMAR - मराठीBEN - বাংলা KAN - ಕನ್ನಡORI - ଓଡିଆTEL - తెలుగుTAM - தமிழ்Drag according to your convenienceET NOW RADIOET NOWTIMES NOWSebi forms committee on fair market conductAug 1, 2017, 07:31 PM ISTThe panel would be responsible for recommending steps to align insider trading regulations with Companies Act provisions.EIH Q1 net profit at Rs 9.48 croreAug 1, 2017, 07:21 PM ISTThe company had posted a net loss of Rs 12.96 crore in April-June quarter a year ago, EIH Ltd said in a BSE filing.JSW Steel Q1 net profit falls 43% to Rs 624 croreAug 1, 2017, 07:19 PM ISTPiramal Enterprises Q1 net profit up 43% to Rs 247.46 croreAug 1, 2017, 07:17 PM ISTETMarkets Evening Podcast: Is sky the limit for Dalal Street now?Aug 1, 2017, 07:09 PM ISTMarico Q1 net profit falls 16% on higher input costsAug 1, 2017, 05:59 PM ISTWestlife Development posts marginal net profit for June quarterAug 1, 2017, 05:53 PM ISTETMarkets After Hours: Auto stocks in fast lane, TechM lifts entire IT packAug 1, 2017, 05:42 PM ISTPower Grid reports 14% YoY rise in Q1 net profitAug 1, 2017, 05:14 PM ISTSebi approves appointment of Dhirendra Swarup as chairman of BSEAug 1, 2017, 04:57 PM IST
  Can You Take Advantage of the Intel® Software Innovator P..Ad: Intel
Tech view: Nifty50 forms ‘Hanging Man’ pattern; rate cut can lift it higherF&O: Every small decline in the Nifty50 being bought intoSensex, Nifty50 rise another notch to scale fresh peaksThese stocks surged up to 33% today
  Say Goodbye To Snoring, Say Hello to SleepAd: My Snoring Solution
Top gainers and losers from Tuesday's sessionNewsSebi forms committee on fair market conductAug 1, 2017, 07:31 PM ISTETMarkets Evening Podcast: Is sky the limit for Dalal Street now?Aug 1, 2017, 07:09 PM ISTMarico Q1 net profit falls 16% on higher input costsAug 1, 2017, 05:59 PM ISTETMarkets After Hours: Auto stocks in fast lane, TechM lifts entire IT packAug 1, 2017, 05:42 PM ISTSebi approves appointment of Dhirendra Swarup as chairman of BSEAug 1, 2017, 04:57 PM ISTRecosBuy  State Bank of India,  target Rs  337:   Dharmesh ShahAug 1, 2017, 01:55 PM ISTBuy  SREI Infrastructure Finance,  target Rs  126:   Kunal BothraAug 1, 2017, 01:53 PM ISTBuy  Larsen & Toubro, target Rs  1,280:   Dharmesh ShahAug 1, 2017, 01:52 PM ISTBuy  Shriram Transport Finance Company, target Rs  1,080:   Kunal BothraAug 1, 2017, 01:51 PM ISTBuy  Hindustan Zinc, target Rs  305:   Dharmesh ShahAug 1, 2017, 01:50 PM ISTBULL'S EYE3,000% returns in 5 yrs! These 12 stocks have more steam leftThe stock price of tyre manufacture CEAT grew from Rs 95 to Rs 1,854 in five years.Give Nifty, take Doklam! Stellar show of Indian stocks leaves Chinese green in envyChinese media is suddenly talking a lot about the impressive 20% year-to-date surge in Nifty.$4.5 trillion investment talk creates a solid turf for multibagger huntersStock picker Porinju Veliyath bets infrastructure is a sure shot multibagger return opportunity.2,50,000% returns! These stocks made crorepatis out of small investorsThis consumer electronics company is an air-cooler manufacturer, and makes a variety of them.How GST is changing India Inc & unifying the country for greater goodIndia joins a group of over 160 countries that have embraced a unified tax policy.Had you picked these 15 stocks, you would have moved in step with NiftyThe stocks have been so steady that they still hold about a half of the total weightage in the inBe careful when you buy stocks, don’t be an Abhimanyu of D-StInvestor should understand that they should pick quality stocks even in a bull market.Euphoria over Nifty at 10K means nothing; only sound investment lasts long!The bedrock of the investment should be such that money invested should work for investors.Want to make hot money? Check out these 10 ‘Cup and Handle’ stocksTechnical charts show that a stock with 'Cup and Handle' pattern is easy to identify.Market MoversFinancial services to dominate for some timeBetting on 2 long-term wealth creation ideasMarkets are heading for a bubble3 key stocks to be in focus todayGeneral direction of Modi's reforms has been positiveContinue to prefer largecaps over the mid and small capsBetting on domestic cyclicals for next 2 years Betting on 2 mid and small-cap wealth creation ideasMarkets VideosArvind Panagariya resigns as NITI Aayog vice chairmanSensex, Nifty turns choppy after hitting record highs; HDFC, ONGC top losers'BUY' or 'SELL' ideas from experts for August 1, 2017Stocks in news : Max India, Reliance PowerSensex, Nifty and Nifty Bank hit fresh lifetime highWatch: Income tax return filing deadline extended to August 5It's final now: Snapdeal ends merger talks with Flipkart, will go soloSnapdeal-Flipkart deal falling apart after six months of hard negotiationsPowered by EarningsEIH Q1 net profit at Rs 9.48 croreAug 1, 2017, 07:21 PM ISTJSW Steel Q1 net profit falls 43% to Rs 624 croreAug 1, 2017, 07:19 PM ISTPiramal Enterprises Q1 net profit up 43% to Rs 247.46 croreAug 1, 2017, 07:17 PM ISTWestlife Development posts marginal net profit for June quarterAug 1, 2017, 05:53 PM ISTPower Grid reports 14% YoY rise in Q1 net profitAug 1, 2017, 05:14 PM ISTAnnouncementsKotak Mahindra Bank board hikes FII investment limit to 42%Mar 8, 2017, 01:03 PM ISTSpencer’s Retail MD Mohit Kampani quitsJun 29, 2016, 01:51 AM ISTSatin Creditcare plans to raise Rs 5,000 crore to expand growthJun 14, 2016, 04:36 PM ISTAdani Transmission raises Rs 500 crore via NCDsJun 3, 2016, 08:16 PM ISTNMDC to consider share buyback next weekJun 2, 2016, 08:10 PM ISTVIDEOStocksExpertsCorporateMarketsAutoTechPolicyFinanceCommoditiesDailyET PromotionsBrand EquityEntertainmentResultsBudget❮❯More Videos »PolicyNSE case: Sebi may recast panel after two members raise conflict on interest issueSebi may ask companies to keep bourses in loop on defaultsSEBI may seek feedback on Kotak committee report in Sept-OctSebi extends deadline for comments on investment adviser normsSebi norms for P-Notes having derivatives as underlying assetSEBI toughens rules for credit rating agenciesGet a QuoteBrowse CompaniesABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ|123456789Browse Mutual FundsABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZBACK TO TOP

ET Home›Markets›Stocks CloseIndustry Analysis and Career Guidance - Industry Articles | Career OptionsIndustry & Career Advice
    Popular this week
  
                            GenY is mentoring seniors and no one's complaining
                        
                    Tuesday, November 22, 2016
                    
                        
                            , Written by Gauri Kohli,
                    
                
                     reverse mentoring is gaining wide acceptance in India where managing the expectations and aspirations of a multi-generational workforce is becoming a big challenge for organisations



                    
                        Read more
                    Banking & Financial Services
                    GST bill tabled in Tamil Nadu assembly amid ruckus
                    Wednesday, June 21, 2017
                    
                        
                    
                Read more
                    Banking & Financial Services
                    After farm loan waiver, UP govt looks at waiving loans for physically challenged
                    Wednesday, June 21, 2017
                    
                        
                    
                Read more
                    Banking & Financial Services
                    Cabinet clears proposal for Bill to deal with bankruptcy
                    Wednesday, June 21, 2017
                    
                        
                    
                Read moreEditor's ChoiceMost Popular
            Shine jobs articlesAlignment matters when hiring a CEO
            Monday, September 26, 2016
            
                
                    , Written by Ayesha Banerjee352422
            Not in sync? Things can take a turn for the worse if an ¬organisation and its leader’s vision are...
            
                Read more
            MiscellaneousIndian organisations willing to adopt a flexible employment structure
            Friday, September 23, 2016
            
                
                    , Written by Vandana Ramnani141535
            Companies are now allowing employees the freedom to freelance, choose projects and decide compens...
            
                Read more
            Shine jobs articlesGrowth through failure acceptable
            Tuesday, July 28, 2015
            l Source:
                Shine Jobs
                
            
        258521
            TALENTSCAPE Employees should be encouraged by organisations to grow their skill-sets and take risks
            
                Read more
            Shine jobs articlesDemand for food safety experts to go up
            Tuesday, July 28, 2015
            
                
                    , Written by Gauri Kohli3212196
            While the majority of movement will be seen in sales and distribution roles, we see the role of f...
            
                Read more
            Shine jobs articlesFew government firms reach out for verification
            Tuesday, July 21, 2015
            
                
                    , Written by Vandana Ramnani812007
            Government firms may not consider employee verification as important as private firms.
            
                Read more
            Shine jobs articlesEmployees are known to lie about education and work experience
            Tuesday, July 21, 2015
            
                
                    , Written by Vandana Ramnani1714401
            Shine.com survey reveals that people are often dishonest about their work experience and educatio...
            
                Read more
            Shine jobs articlesOver 15,000 job seekers attend Shine.com jobs fair
            Tuesday, July 21, 2015
            l Source:
                Shine Jobs
                
            
        2716103
            More than 30 companies participated in the Shine.com job fair.
            
                Read more
            Interview Preparation10 Commonly Asked Questions In A BPO Interview
            Wednesday, May 20, 2015
            
                
                    , Written by Resham Beri367325085
            Appearing for a BPO interview? You should definitely be prepared for these 10 questions!
            
                Read more
            ResumeTop 10 tips for producing a better CV
            Thursday, August 08, 2013
            
                
                    , Written by Dr Hemesh Lakhani 1937202609
            Your resume is an essential tool in the job-hunt process. If you have a flawless resume, chances ...
            
                Read more
            Interview PreparationTips to face job interviews confidently
            Saturday, September 06, 2014
            l Source:
                Shine.com
                
            
        261176809
            We dread interviews and when we are scared, we bungle. Confidence and preparedness are the only t...
            
                Read more
            Interview PreparationTelephonic interview tips
            Tuesday, December 17, 2013
            l Source:
                Shine.com
                
            
        136139093
            Telephonic interview has emerged as a popular way to conduct the preliminary round during the int...
            
                Read more
            Interview Preparation“Tell me about yourself”
            Wednesday, July 23, 2014
            
                
            
        132129337
            Which is the one question asked in every interview? People with significant interview experience ...
            
                Read more
            Salary and Appraisal6 Questions to ask during salary negotiation
            Tuesday, June 03, 2014
            
                
                    , Written by Steffi Joseph344120801
            One of the most apprehensive situations in an interview process is when job seekers negotiate sal...
            
                Read more
            Interview Preparation10 Tips To Face An Interview For The First Time
            Thursday, May 28, 2015
            
                
                    , Written by Resham Beri23371770
            Sitting in the waiting room, anticipating what's going to happen next, biting your nails at the t...
            
                Read moreNews LetterExpert career advice and articles delivered to your inbox!SubscribeSubscribeProfessional Resume Help
      Let our shine specialist write you a world class resume.
    CLICK HERE
        Top Jobs on Shine
        
      
                    TCS is hiring for Salesforce Developer and Salesforce Lead on 29-7-2017
                
            Experience: 2 to 10 Yrs

            Company: Tata Consultancy  Services Ltd.
        
                    TRAVEL SALES CONSULTANT & TECH SALES EXECUTIVE - GURGAON & NOIDA
                
            Experience: 1 to 6 Yrs

            Company: EQS Placements Pvt Ltd
        
                    HIRING FOR BLENDED PROFILE ( BACK OFFICE)
                
            Experience: 0 to 2 Yrs

            Company: Viewry Services LLP
        
                Video Articles
      
            View All
        Importance of team building - Everyone achieves more
       Monday, December 15, 2014
      
                    Team building is a very important aspect of any organization. This video will help you understand the power of a team and how everyone achieves more when in a team.
                    
                        Read More
            Today's Poll / Survey
        
                        Do you regularly check your official email on weekends?
                    
                            Yes
                        
                            No
                        
                            Only if required
                        ×News Letter 
                Please provide Email Id for receiving News Letter.
                    CloseSave



Creative Commons — Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported
— CC BY-SA 3.0 






















Skip to content








 Menu















Help us build a vibrant, collaborative global commons
Donate Now














Creative Commons


Creative Commons License Deed







Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported

(CC BY-SA 3.0)








This is a human-readable summary of (and not a substitute for) the license.


Disclaimer.






You are free to:


Share — copy and redistribute the material in any medium or format


Adapt — remix, transform, and build upon the material


for any purpose, even commercially.

















The licensor cannot revoke these freedoms as long as you follow the license terms.




Under the following terms:



Attribution — You must give appropriate credit, provide a link to the license, and indicate if changes were made. You may do so in any reasonable manner, but not in any way that suggests the licensor endorses you or your use.




Attribute this work:












ShareAlike — If you remix, transform, or build upon the material, you must distribute your contributions under the same license as the original.








No additional restrictions — You may not apply legal terms or technological measures that legally restrict others from doing anything the license permits.






Notices:



You do not have to comply with the license for elements of the material in the public domain or where your use is permitted by an applicable exception or limitation.


No warranties are given. The license may not give you all of the permissions necessary for your intended use. For example, other rights such as publicity, privacy, or moral rights may limit how you use the material.








Learn more about CC licensing, or use the license for your own material.






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
Make a Donation






This page is available in the following languages:


Castellano
Castellano (España)
Català
Dansk
Deutsch
English
Esperanto
français
Galego
hrvatski
Indonesia
Italiano
Latviski
Lietuvių
Melayu
Nederlands
Norsk
polski
Português
Português (BR)
română
Slovenščina
Suomeksi
svenska
Türkçe
íslenska
česky
Ελληνικά
Беларуская
русский
українська
العربية
پارسی
中文
日本語
華語 (台灣)
한국어






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
When you share, everyone wins.





Contribute today to Creative Commons




$100



$50



$25



$5































Disclaimer

This deed highlights only some of the key features and terms of the actual license. It is not a license and has no legal value. You should carefully review all of the terms and conditions of the actual license before using the licensed material.
Creative Commons is not a law firm and does not provide legal services. Distributing, displaying, or linking to this deed or the license that it summarizes does not create a lawyer-client or any other relationship.




What does "Attribute this work" mean?


The page you came from contained embedded licensing metadata, including how the creator wishes to be attributed for re-use. You can use the HTML here to cite the work. Doing so will also include metadata on your page so that others can find the original work as well.




The applicable mediation rules will be designated in the copyright notice published with the work, or if none then in the request for mediation. Unless otherwise designated in a copyright notice attached to the work, the UNCITRAL Arbitration Rules apply to any arbitration.
More info.




If supplied, you must provide the name of the creator and attribution parties, a copyright notice, a license notice, a disclaimer notice, and a link to the material. CC licenses prior to Version 4.0 also require you to provide the title of the material if supplied, and may have other slight differences.
More info.




In 4.0, you must indicate if you modified the material and retain an indication of previous modifications. In 3.0 and earlier license versions, the indication of changes is only required if you create a derivative.
Marking guide.
More info.




You may also use a license listed as compatible at https://creativecommons.org/compatiblelicenses
More info.




A commercial use is one primarily intended for commercial advantage or monetary compensation.
More info.




Merely changing the format never creates a derivative.
More info.




The license prohibits application of effective technological measures, defined with reference to Article 11 of the WIPO Copyright Treaty.
More info.




The rights of users under exceptions and limitations, such as fair use and fair dealing, are not affected by the CC licenses.
More info.




You may need to get additional permissions before using the material as you intend.
More info.




















Industry Analysis and Career Guidance - Industry Articles | Career OptionsIndustry & Career Advice
    Popular this week
  
                            GenY is mentoring seniors and no one's complaining
                        
                    Tuesday, November 22, 2016
                    
                        
                            , Written by Gauri Kohli,
                    
                
                     reverse mentoring is gaining wide acceptance in India where managing the expectations and aspirations of a multi-generational workforce is becoming a big challenge for organisations



                    
                        Read more
                    Banking & Financial Services
                    GST bill tabled in Tamil Nadu assembly amid ruckus
                    Wednesday, June 21, 2017
                    
                        
                    
                Read more
                    Banking & Financial Services
                    After farm loan waiver, UP govt looks at waiving loans for physically challenged
                    Wednesday, June 21, 2017
                    
                        
                    
                Read more
                    Banking & Financial Services
                    Cabinet clears proposal for Bill to deal with bankruptcy
                    Wednesday, June 21, 2017
                    
                        
                    
                Read moreEditor's ChoiceMost Popular
            Shine jobs articlesAlignment matters when hiring a CEO
            Monday, September 26, 2016
            
                
                    , Written by Ayesha Banerjee352422
            Not in sync? Things can take a turn for the worse if an ¬organisation and its leader’s vision are...
            
                Read more
            MiscellaneousIndian organisations willing to adopt a flexible employment structure
            Friday, September 23, 2016
            
                
                    , Written by Vandana Ramnani141535
            Companies are now allowing employees the freedom to freelance, choose projects and decide compens...
            
                Read more
            Shine jobs articlesGrowth through failure acceptable
            Tuesday, July 28, 2015
            l Source:
                Shine Jobs
                
            
        258521
            TALENTSCAPE Employees should be encouraged by organisations to grow their skill-sets and take risks
            
                Read more
            Shine jobs articlesDemand for food safety experts to go up
            Tuesday, July 28, 2015
            
                
                    , Written by Gauri Kohli3212196
            While the majority of movement will be seen in sales and distribution roles, we see the role of f...
            
                Read more
            Shine jobs articlesFew government firms reach out for verification
            Tuesday, July 21, 2015
            
                
                    , Written by Vandana Ramnani812007
            Government firms may not consider employee verification as important as private firms.
            
                Read more
            Shine jobs articlesEmployees are known to lie about education and work experience
            Tuesday, July 21, 2015
            
                
                    , Written by Vandana Ramnani1714401
            Shine.com survey reveals that people are often dishonest about their work experience and educatio...
            
                Read more
            Shine jobs articlesOver 15,000 job seekers attend Shine.com jobs fair
            Tuesday, July 21, 2015
            l Source:
                Shine Jobs
                
            
        2716103
            More than 30 companies participated in the Shine.com job fair.
            
                Read more
            Interview Preparation10 Commonly Asked Questions In A BPO Interview
            Wednesday, May 20, 2015
            
                
                    , Written by Resham Beri367325085
            Appearing for a BPO interview? You should definitely be prepared for these 10 questions!
            
                Read more
            ResumeTop 10 tips for producing a better CV
            Thursday, August 08, 2013
            
                
                    , Written by Dr Hemesh Lakhani 1937202609
            Your resume is an essential tool in the job-hunt process. If you have a flawless resume, chances ...
            
                Read more
            Interview PreparationTips to face job interviews confidently
            Saturday, September 06, 2014
            l Source:
                Shine.com
                
            
        261176809
            We dread interviews and when we are scared, we bungle. Confidence and preparedness are the only t...
            
                Read more
            Interview PreparationTelephonic interview tips
            Tuesday, December 17, 2013
            l Source:
                Shine.com
                
            
        136139093
            Telephonic interview has emerged as a popular way to conduct the preliminary round during the int...
            
                Read more
            Interview Preparation“Tell me about yourself”
            Wednesday, July 23, 2014
            
                
            
        132129337
            Which is the one question asked in every interview? People with significant interview experience ...
            
                Read more
            Salary and Appraisal6 Questions to ask during salary negotiation
            Tuesday, June 03, 2014
            
                
                    , Written by Steffi Joseph344120801
            One of the most apprehensive situations in an interview process is when job seekers negotiate sal...
            
                Read more
            Interview Preparation10 Tips To Face An Interview For The First Time
            Thursday, May 28, 2015
            
                
                    , Written by Resham Beri23371770
            Sitting in the waiting room, anticipating what's going to happen next, biting your nails at the t...
            
                Read moreNews LetterExpert career advice and articles delivered to your inbox!SubscribeSubscribeProfessional Resume Help
      Let our shine specialist write you a world class resume.
    CLICK HERE
        Top Jobs on Shine
        
      
                    TCS is hiring for Salesforce Developer and Salesforce Lead on 29-7-2017
                
            Experience: 2 to 10 Yrs

            Company: Tata Consultancy  Services Ltd.
        
                    TRAVEL SALES CONSULTANT & TECH SALES EXECUTIVE - GURGAON & NOIDA
                
            Experience: 1 to 6 Yrs

            Company: EQS Placements Pvt Ltd
        
                    HIRING FOR BLENDED PROFILE ( BACK OFFICE)
                
            Experience: 0 to 2 Yrs

            Company: Viewry Services LLP
        
                Video Articles
      
            View All
        Importance of team building - Everyone achieves more
       Monday, December 15, 2014
      
                    Team building is a very important aspect of any organization. This video will help you understand the power of a team and how everyone achieves more when in a team.
                    
                        Read More
            Today's Poll / Survey
        
                        Do you regularly check your official email on weekends?
                    
                            Yes
                        
                            No
                        
                            Only if required
                        ×News Letter 
                Please provide Email Id for receiving News Letter.
                    CloseSaveOil and Gas Companies in India | Corporate Social Responsibility | Bharat Petroleum SFK 





















It's time to upgrade your browser
You're using an outdated version of Internet Explorer.
DOWNLOAD NOW










What are you looking for?










   





SWACHH BHARAT

BPC TARANG
   ACCESSIBILITY 



Lang
lang-box:

English
Hindi



Font
 A- A+ 

 
Screen Reader

 



BPCL GROUP
BPCL LINKS


extaps.in
borl.in
bpclaviation.in
bpclvts.in/BPCL

ebharatgas.com 

ebiz.bpc.co.in
https://efp.bpcl.in/
mylpg.in
mysmartfleet.com
nrl.co.in

petrobonus.com
petroleum.nic.in
petrotech.in
http://www.rgipt.ac.in/



CONNECT


Customer Care
MoPNG eSEVA
SmartLine
Contact Us
Locate Us



PRINT




 

















BPCL STOCK:













 Toggle

HomeAbout BPCLOur JourneyBoard of DirectorsVision & ValuesAwards & AccoladesOur PoliciesAuditBPCL InfolinePetrozineAwards & AccoladesStock QuotePetro DailyMinistry UpdateBharat Petroleum ForMotorists-Fleet OwnersFuel & ServicesLubricantsLocate UsCelebrating with CustomersHouseholdsBharatgasAviationIndustriesIndustrial & CommercialGasInvestorsCorporate InfoShareholders InformationFinancial PerformanceAnnual ReportsCorporate Governance ReportsShareholding PatternPostal BallotUnclaimed Dividend dataConference Call RecordingAGM ReportsView ArchivesNomination FormsInvestor GuideOur PoliciesCorporate AnnouncementsBusiness AssociatesDistributorsVendorsDealersCOCOPensionersLocate a Fellow PensionerDownloadsPost Retirement Medical Benefit SchemeEmployees Pension Scheme 1995Superannuation BenefitsSettlement of AnnuitiesContacts UsYour CornerPetroZineFeedbackGreetings CornerContest CornerBPCL Ad CampaignsBPC TarangSAP TrainingOur BusinessesFuels & ServicesAbout Fuels & ServicesPure For SureFuel StationSpeed FuelsPetroBonusBeyond FuelsAutomotive LPG & CNGSmartFleetBPCL GHARPetro DailySmartDrivePetro PricesBharatgasAbout BharatgasGive Up SubsidyIndustrial LPGBharat Metal Cutting GasBeyond LPGBharatgas MiniPahalBecome LPG distribiutorLPG SafetyMAK LubricantsAbout MAK LubricantsSelect Your OilAuto LubricantsIndustrial LubricantsMAK LubricantsMAK ManthanMAK 4T NXTAviationAbout AviationProducts & ServicesJoint VenturesRefineriesMumbai RefineryPerformanceTechnologyRefining CapacityProductEnergy ConservationFuture PlansProcessProjectsEnvironmentAwards & RecognitionAmbient Air Quality ReportKochi RefineryOverviewHistoryPerformanceRefining CapacityFuture PlansTechnologyProjectsEnergy ConservationProcessInnovationEnvironmentAmbient Air Quality ReportIREPAwards & RecognitionBina RefineryNumaligarh RefineryGasAbout Natural Gas IndustryBPCLs Foray in GasCity Gas DistributionNew InitiativeBPCL Natural Gas PortalCompressed Natural GasNew to Gas?JVs-SubsidiariesEmpanelment of LNG supplierEmpanelment of Consultants for CGD AssignmentsIndustrial & CommercialIndustrial Fuel ProductsGasesFuelsBitumenSolvent and Special ProductsIndustrial LubricantsSulphurServicesCustomer Advisory BoardEnergy AuditsE-BankingConsultancy / Technical ServicesFuel Management SystemOnline OrderingBunkeringMODVAT & Tax SchemeConversion TableBharat PetroResources Limited (BPRL)About BPRLMission & VisionContact UsPartner with UsBPRL JourneyFinancialGlobal SpreadOperatorshipShale GasOur PartnersAwards & RecognitionEnvironmental ClearenceInternational TradeAbout International TradeCrude ImportsProductsShip CharteringRisk ManagementCounterparty RegistrationProficiency TestingAbout Proficiency TestingWhy Us?Program Schedule and FeesOther Important InformationBPCL GroupTendersView TendersView Tenders AwardedView Project Completion DetailsCareersCurrent OpeningsLife @ BPCLHR InitiativesEmployee TestimonialsCSRCorporate Social ResponsibilityVision & MissionPolicyObjectiveMethodologyAccoladesSharing Wider ResponsibilityOverviewSAP Training CentreRajiv Gandhi Institute Of Petroleum TechnologyCounsellingProject BoondSwachh Bharat BPCLSustainabilityHealth, Safety, Security & EnvironmentRole of HSSESecurity PolicyAchievementsBPCL on Renewable EnergyDid You KnowGreen RefineriesMumbai RefineryKochi RefineryAlternative Energy ResourcesEnergy ConservationSustainability ReportsCampaign for Climate ChangeEnvironmental ClearanceVigilanceMessage from the CVOSubmit Vigilance ComplaintIntegrity ClubRequest Session at your schoolVigilance EventsRTIAbout RTI ActApply for Additional InformationPublic Information OfficersStatus of RTI ApplicationsRules & RegulationsFAQsInformation ManualGST






 



DOWNLOAD OUR APPS
SHARE YOUR FEEDBACK
PETRO DAILY
VIEW PRICES






      MY FUEL, MY DAY, MY PRICEDAILY PRICE CHANGEKNOW MORE MoPNG eSEVADedicated social media based grievance redressal platform for Oil & Gas SectorKNOW MORE FUELS & SERVICESFUELLING THE NATION, FROM KASHMIR TO KANYAKUMARIKNOW MORE MAK LubricantsLubricants you can trustKNOW MORE BPRL10 Years of BPRLKNOW MORE SAP TRAININGA NEW APPROACH TO LEARNINGKNOW MORE GO GREEN WITH SPEEDThe Environment friendly fuelKNOW MORE CONTACT USWE'D LIKE TO HEAR FROM YOUKNOW MORE GO GREEN WITH SPEEDSPEED FUELSKNOW MORE         Previous Next  Fuel & ServicesBharat Petroleum is committed towards serving its customers in the best possible way by offering customer-friendly Fuel Stations across the length and breadth of the country.KNOW MORE  BharatgasBharat Petroleum’s flagship product Bharatgas has been dominating the LPG gas market since the past three decades reaching out to over 45 million homes.KNOW MORE  MAK LubricantsBharat Petroleum understands the importance of the right lubricants in extending the life of vehicles, and offers a complete range of quality products across categories such as Automotive Engine Oils, Gear Oils, Transmission Oils and Specialty Oils.KNOW MORE  AviationThe history of Indian Civil Aviation is synonymous with the history of Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd. (BPCL) - Aviation Service, which has completed more than 75 years of Aviation Service.KNOW MORE  RefineriesBharat Petroleum is the proud owner of multiple refinery units spread across Mumbai, Kochi, Numaligarh and Bina.KNOW MORE  GasBharat Petroleum has expanded its fuel portfolio to include natural gas, with an objective of providing energy security to millions of Indians.KNOW MORE  Industrial & CommercialAt Bharat Petroleum, we cater to the fuel requirements of around 8000 industries, across the Public & Private sectors and various Govt. establishments such as Defense, Railways, State Transport Undertakings, State Electricity Boards etc.KNOW MORE  BPRLWith the objective of carrying out Exploration and Production activities, Bharat Petroleum incorporated a wholly owned subsidiary called Bharat PetroResources Limited in 2006.KNOW MORE  International TradeAt BPCL, International Trade involves the import of crude oil, import and export of finished products, transportation of coastal product, risk management.KNOW MORE  Proficiency TestingTo cater to the needs of petroleum sector laboratories in and around India, Bharat Petroleum has launched Proficiency Testing labs.KNOW MORE        

		 

KNOW MORE


 Ministry Updates    2.5 Croreth PMUY connection at Raghunathgunj, Murshidabad, West Bengal2017-07-15 KNOW MORE »One Year of Pradhan Mantri Ujjwala Yojana2017-05-05 KNOW MORE »MPONG ESeva2017-03-24 KNOW MORE »Lok Sabha Unstarred Qs No. 2932 -"Welfare Scheme by Oil PSUs"2017-03-16 KNOW MORE »Sanrakshan Kshamta Mahotsav “SAKSHAM” 2017 begins 2017-01-16 KNOW MORE »Honorable PM Launches Urja Ganga at Varanasi2016-10-24 KNOW MORE »Energetic 2 Years of MoP&NG 2016-06-04 KNOW MORE »Hon’ble MoS, MoP&NG launches PMUY website2016-06-03 KNOW MORE »Unified Guidelines for LPG Distributorships issued2016-06-03 KNOW MORE »Hon’ble PM launches PMUY2016-05-06 KNOW MORE »  

		 

Know More

 
 BPCL Infoline    BPCL shines at World Petroleum Congress Exhibition, Istanbul- 201725 Jul 2017 KNOW MORE »BRAND QUIZ BAADSHAH 05 May 2017 KNOW MORE »Sand Artist-BS IV02 Apr 2017 KNOW MORE »BPCL pavilion shines at Vibrant Gujarat Global Trade Show 201716 Jan 2017 KNOW MORE » BPCL Launches Customer Awareness Program On “Cashless” Transactions 26 Dec 2016 KNOW MORE » 


			 

KNOW MORE



			Join Us




					Bharat Petroleum welcomes you to be a part of this phenomenal growth and change, where you can merge your aspirations and values with that of ours and work towards fuelling a billion lives.







			 

KNOW MORE



			Society





						Bharat Petroleum recognises its responsibility towards the community and has been working conscientiously for the betterment of weaker sections of society for years. We endeavour to maximise the impact of our initiatives, ensuring it benefits all the stakeholders.









			 

KNOW MORE




			Journals





Our In house publications.







			 

KNOW MORE




			Press Release





Our news releases for media. 







		BHARAT PETROLEUM LABS

		Pioneering cutting-edge research to find sustainable and environment-friendly fuel sources




Previous Next





KNOW MORE



										11 JULY 2017

										Integration of Refining and Petrochem Industry







KNOW MORE



										11 JULY 2017

										Paper presented at WPC-2017







KNOW MORE



										23 NOVEMBER 2016

										BHARAT ECOCHEM







KNOW MORE



										23 NOVEMBER 2016

										BPMARRK







KNOW MORE



										11 OCTOBER 2016

										India Transits to Clean Energy Economy








											 
KNOW MORE



										31 JULY 2015

										Novel Research & Processes








											 
KNOW MORE



										4 MAY 2015

										Decoding Energy Inclusiveness for India 2015
										 








											 
KNOW MORE



										30 SEPTEMBER 2010

										Grease Composition for Lubrication of Journal Bearings in Sugar Mills












    HomePage

VIDEO GALLERY 












 











					About BPCL


Our Journey

Board of Directors

Vision & Values

Awards & Accolades

Our Policies

Audit

BPCL Infoline






					Our Businesses


Fuels & Services

Bharatgas

MAK Lubricants

Aviation

Refinery

Gas

Industrial & Commercial 

BPRL

International Trade

Proficiency Testing

BPCL Group






					Bharat Petroleum For


Motorists/Fleet owners

Households

Aviation

Investor

Business & Associates

Pensioners

Industries 

Your Corner






					Important LinkS


Website Compliance Policy

Hyperlink Policy

Non PDS (White) SKO

RTI

Integrity Pact

Citizen Charter for Marketing Products

M. B. LAL Recommendations

Urja Sangam

Details of Agreements With Media Companies etc

Empanelment of LNG supplier

Public Notice Bharat Gas

State wise GST registration numbers




					Other links


Tenders

Careers

Investors

Sustainability







					CONNECT WITH US


SmartLine

Feedback

Locate Us




					APPS


BPCL SmartDrive

Google Play

Apple App Store

Bharatgas

SmartFleet









				FOLLOW US




 

 

 

 

 









                             
                        

                             
                        










					2016 Copyright Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited All Rights Reserved.          Site by Digital L & K | Saatchi & Saatchi




 Complaint / Feedback

Disclaimer

Sitemap


FAQs



















 
 

Oil and Gas Companies in India | Corporate Social Responsibility | Bharat Petroleum SFK 





















It's time to upgrade your browser
You're using an outdated version of Internet Explorer.
DOWNLOAD NOW










What are you looking for?










   





SWACHH BHARAT

BPC TARANG
   ACCESSIBILITY 



Lang
lang-box:

English
Hindi



Font
 A- A+ 

 
Screen Reader

 



BPCL GROUP
BPCL LINKS


extaps.in
borl.in
bpclaviation.in
bpclvts.in/BPCL

ebharatgas.com 

ebiz.bpc.co.in
https://efp.bpcl.in/
mylpg.in
mysmartfleet.com
nrl.co.in

petrobonus.com
petroleum.nic.in
petrotech.in
http://www.rgipt.ac.in/



CONNECT


Customer Care
MoPNG eSEVA
SmartLine
Contact Us
Locate Us



PRINT




 

















BPCL STOCK:













 Toggle

HomeAbout BPCLOur JourneyBoard of DirectorsVision & ValuesAwards & AccoladesOur PoliciesAuditBPCL InfolinePetrozineAwards & AccoladesStock QuotePetro DailyMinistry UpdateBharat Petroleum ForMotorists-Fleet OwnersFuel & ServicesLubricantsLocate UsCelebrating with CustomersHouseholdsBharatgasAviationIndustriesIndustrial & CommercialGasInvestorsCorporate InfoShareholders InformationFinancial PerformanceAnnual ReportsCorporate Governance ReportsShareholding PatternPostal BallotUnclaimed Dividend dataConference Call RecordingAGM ReportsView ArchivesNomination FormsInvestor GuideOur PoliciesCorporate AnnouncementsBusiness AssociatesDistributorsVendorsDealersCOCOPensionersLocate a Fellow PensionerDownloadsPost Retirement Medical Benefit SchemeEmployees Pension Scheme 1995Superannuation BenefitsSettlement of AnnuitiesContacts UsYour CornerPetroZineFeedbackGreetings CornerContest CornerBPCL Ad CampaignsBPC TarangSAP TrainingOur BusinessesFuels & ServicesAbout Fuels & ServicesPure For SureFuel StationSpeed FuelsPetroBonusBeyond FuelsAutomotive LPG & CNGSmartFleetBPCL GHARPetro DailySmartDrivePetro PricesBharatgasAbout BharatgasGive Up SubsidyIndustrial LPGBharat Metal Cutting GasBeyond LPGBharatgas MiniPahalBecome LPG distribiutorLPG SafetyMAK LubricantsAbout MAK LubricantsSelect Your OilAuto LubricantsIndustrial LubricantsMAK LubricantsMAK ManthanMAK 4T NXTAviationAbout AviationProducts & ServicesJoint VenturesRefineriesMumbai RefineryPerformanceTechnologyRefining CapacityProductEnergy ConservationFuture PlansProcessProjectsEnvironmentAwards & RecognitionAmbient Air Quality ReportKochi RefineryOverviewHistoryPerformanceRefining CapacityFuture PlansTechnologyProjectsEnergy ConservationProcessInnovationEnvironmentAmbient Air Quality ReportIREPAwards & RecognitionBina RefineryNumaligarh RefineryGasAbout Natural Gas IndustryBPCLs Foray in GasCity Gas DistributionNew InitiativeBPCL Natural Gas PortalCompressed Natural GasNew to Gas?JVs-SubsidiariesEmpanelment of LNG supplierEmpanelment of Consultants for CGD AssignmentsIndustrial & CommercialIndustrial Fuel ProductsGasesFuelsBitumenSolvent and Special ProductsIndustrial LubricantsSulphurServicesCustomer Advisory BoardEnergy AuditsE-BankingConsultancy / Technical ServicesFuel Management SystemOnline OrderingBunkeringMODVAT & Tax SchemeConversion TableBharat PetroResources Limited (BPRL)About BPRLMission & VisionContact UsPartner with UsBPRL JourneyFinancialGlobal SpreadOperatorshipShale GasOur PartnersAwards & RecognitionEnvironmental ClearenceInternational TradeAbout International TradeCrude ImportsProductsShip CharteringRisk ManagementCounterparty RegistrationProficiency TestingAbout Proficiency TestingWhy Us?Program Schedule and FeesOther Important InformationBPCL GroupTendersView TendersView Tenders AwardedView Project Completion DetailsCareersCurrent OpeningsLife @ BPCLHR InitiativesEmployee TestimonialsCSRCorporate Social ResponsibilityVision & MissionPolicyObjectiveMethodologyAccoladesSharing Wider ResponsibilityOverviewSAP Training CentreRajiv Gandhi Institute Of Petroleum TechnologyCounsellingProject BoondSwachh Bharat BPCLSustainabilityHealth, Safety, Security & EnvironmentRole of HSSESecurity PolicyAchievementsBPCL on Renewable EnergyDid You KnowGreen RefineriesMumbai RefineryKochi RefineryAlternative Energy ResourcesEnergy ConservationSustainability ReportsCampaign for Climate ChangeEnvironmental ClearanceVigilanceMessage from the CVOSubmit Vigilance ComplaintIntegrity ClubRequest Session at your schoolVigilance EventsRTIAbout RTI ActApply for Additional InformationPublic Information OfficersStatus of RTI ApplicationsRules & RegulationsFAQsInformation ManualGST






 



DOWNLOAD OUR APPS
SHARE YOUR FEEDBACK
PETRO DAILY
VIEW PRICES






      MY FUEL, MY DAY, MY PRICEDAILY PRICE CHANGEKNOW MORE MoPNG eSEVADedicated social media based grievance redressal platform for Oil & Gas SectorKNOW MORE FUELS & SERVICESFUELLING THE NATION, FROM KASHMIR TO KANYAKUMARIKNOW MORE MAK LubricantsLubricants you can trustKNOW MORE BPRL10 Years of BPRLKNOW MORE SAP TRAININGA NEW APPROACH TO LEARNINGKNOW MORE GO GREEN WITH SPEEDThe Environment friendly fuelKNOW MORE CONTACT USWE'D LIKE TO HEAR FROM YOUKNOW MORE GO GREEN WITH SPEEDSPEED FUELSKNOW MORE         Previous Next  Fuel & ServicesBharat Petroleum is committed towards serving its customers in the best possible way by offering customer-friendly Fuel Stations across the length and breadth of the country.KNOW MORE  BharatgasBharat Petroleum’s flagship product Bharatgas has been dominating the LPG gas market since the past three decades reaching out to over 45 million homes.KNOW MORE  MAK LubricantsBharat Petroleum understands the importance of the right lubricants in extending the life of vehicles, and offers a complete range of quality products across categories such as Automotive Engine Oils, Gear Oils, Transmission Oils and Specialty Oils.KNOW MORE  AviationThe history of Indian Civil Aviation is synonymous with the history of Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd. (BPCL) - Aviation Service, which has completed more than 75 years of Aviation Service.KNOW MORE  RefineriesBharat Petroleum is the proud owner of multiple refinery units spread across Mumbai, Kochi, Numaligarh and Bina.KNOW MORE  GasBharat Petroleum has expanded its fuel portfolio to include natural gas, with an objective of providing energy security to millions of Indians.KNOW MORE  Industrial & CommercialAt Bharat Petroleum, we cater to the fuel requirements of around 8000 industries, across the Public & Private sectors and various Govt. establishments such as Defense, Railways, State Transport Undertakings, State Electricity Boards etc.KNOW MORE  BPRLWith the objective of carrying out Exploration and Production activities, Bharat Petroleum incorporated a wholly owned subsidiary called Bharat PetroResources Limited in 2006.KNOW MORE  International TradeAt BPCL, International Trade involves the import of crude oil, import and export of finished products, transportation of coastal product, risk management.KNOW MORE  Proficiency TestingTo cater to the needs of petroleum sector laboratories in and around India, Bharat Petroleum has launched Proficiency Testing labs.KNOW MORE        

		 

KNOW MORE


 Ministry Updates    2.5 Croreth PMUY connection at Raghunathgunj, Murshidabad, West Bengal2017-07-15 KNOW MORE »One Year of Pradhan Mantri Ujjwala Yojana2017-05-05 KNOW MORE »MPONG ESeva2017-03-24 KNOW MORE »Lok Sabha Unstarred Qs No. 2932 -"Welfare Scheme by Oil PSUs"2017-03-16 KNOW MORE »Sanrakshan Kshamta Mahotsav “SAKSHAM” 2017 begins 2017-01-16 KNOW MORE »Honorable PM Launches Urja Ganga at Varanasi2016-10-24 KNOW MORE »Energetic 2 Years of MoP&NG 2016-06-04 KNOW MORE »Hon’ble MoS, MoP&NG launches PMUY website2016-06-03 KNOW MORE »Unified Guidelines for LPG Distributorships issued2016-06-03 KNOW MORE »Hon’ble PM launches PMUY2016-05-06 KNOW MORE »  

		 

Know More

 
 BPCL Infoline    BPCL shines at World Petroleum Congress Exhibition, Istanbul- 201725 Jul 2017 KNOW MORE »BRAND QUIZ BAADSHAH 05 May 2017 KNOW MORE »Sand Artist-BS IV02 Apr 2017 KNOW MORE »BPCL pavilion shines at Vibrant Gujarat Global Trade Show 201716 Jan 2017 KNOW MORE » BPCL Launches Customer Awareness Program On “Cashless” Transactions 26 Dec 2016 KNOW MORE » 


			 

KNOW MORE



			Join Us




					Bharat Petroleum welcomes you to be a part of this phenomenal growth and change, where you can merge your aspirations and values with that of ours and work towards fuelling a billion lives.







			 

KNOW MORE



			Society





						Bharat Petroleum recognises its responsibility towards the community and has been working conscientiously for the betterment of weaker sections of society for years. We endeavour to maximise the impact of our initiatives, ensuring it benefits all the stakeholders.









			 

KNOW MORE




			Journals





Our In house publications.







			 

KNOW MORE




			Press Release





Our news releases for media. 







		BHARAT PETROLEUM LABS

		Pioneering cutting-edge research to find sustainable and environment-friendly fuel sources




Previous Next





KNOW MORE



										11 JULY 2017

										Integration of Refining and Petrochem Industry







KNOW MORE



										11 JULY 2017

										Paper presented at WPC-2017







KNOW MORE



										23 NOVEMBER 2016

										BHARAT ECOCHEM







KNOW MORE



										23 NOVEMBER 2016

										BPMARRK







KNOW MORE



										11 OCTOBER 2016

										India Transits to Clean Energy Economy








											 
KNOW MORE



										31 JULY 2015

										Novel Research & Processes








											 
KNOW MORE



										4 MAY 2015

										Decoding Energy Inclusiveness for India 2015
										 








											 
KNOW MORE



										30 SEPTEMBER 2010

										Grease Composition for Lubrication of Journal Bearings in Sugar Mills












    HomePage

VIDEO GALLERY 












 











					About BPCL


Our Journey

Board of Directors

Vision & Values

Awards & Accolades

Our Policies

Audit

BPCL Infoline






					Our Businesses


Fuels & Services

Bharatgas

MAK Lubricants

Aviation

Refinery

Gas

Industrial & Commercial 

BPRL

International Trade

Proficiency Testing

BPCL Group






					Bharat Petroleum For


Motorists/Fleet owners

Households

Aviation

Investor

Business & Associates

Pensioners

Industries 

Your Corner






					Important LinkS


Website Compliance Policy

Hyperlink Policy

Non PDS (White) SKO

RTI

Integrity Pact

Citizen Charter for Marketing Products

M. B. LAL Recommendations

Urja Sangam

Details of Agreements With Media Companies etc

Empanelment of LNG supplier

Public Notice Bharat Gas

State wise GST registration numbers




					Other links


Tenders

Careers

Investors

Sustainability







					CONNECT WITH US


SmartLine

Feedback

Locate Us




					APPS


BPCL SmartDrive

Google Play

Apple App Store

Bharatgas

SmartFleet









				FOLLOW US




 

 

 

 

 









                             
                        

                             
                        










					2016 Copyright Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited All Rights Reserved.          Site by Digital L & K | Saatchi & Saatchi




 Complaint / Feedback

Disclaimer

Sitemap


FAQs



















 
 

Bharat Petroleum Corporation Finished Products | Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd Finished ProductsNever miss a great news story!Get instant notifications from Economic TimesAllowNot nowYou can switch off notifications anytime using browser settings.SECTIONSET APPSET Android AppET iPhone AppET iPad AppET Wealth Android AppET Blackberry AppET Nokia AppET Markets Android AppET Markets iPhone AppET Money Android AppENGLISHहिन्दीગુજરાતીE-PAPERSIGN-INFOLLOW USFACEBOOKTWITTERYOUTUBELINKEDINGOOGLE PLUSRSSStocksLATEST NEWSSebi forms committee on fair market conductRupee rallies 12 paise to 2.5-month high on RBI rate cut hopesEIH Q1 net profit at Rs 9.48 croreJSW Steel Q1 net profit falls 43% to Rs 624 crorePiramal Enterprises Q1 net profit up 43% to Rs 247.46 croreIndia refiners outshine Asia peers with new output, rising local demandETMarkets Evening Podcast: Is sky the limit for Dalal Street now?Marico Q1 net profit falls 16% on higher input costsWestlife Development posts marginal net profit for June quarterET Home›Markets›Stocks04:05 PM | 01 Augmarket statsSENSEX32,57560.23NIFTY 5010,11537.55GOLD (MCX) (Rs/10g.)28,520-37.00USD/INR64.07-0.11PortfolioLoading...Select Portfolio and Asset Combination for Display on Market BandSelect PortfolioSelect Asset ClassStocksMFETFShow MoreCREATE PORTFOLIOADD INVESTMENT
                    	Download ET MARKETS APP
                    Get ET Markets in your own languageDOWNLOAD THE APP NOW+91CHOOSE LANGUAGEENGENG - EnglishHIN - हिन्दीGUJ - ગુજરાતીMAR - मराठीBEN - বাংলা KAN - ಕನ್ನಡORI - ଓଡିଆTEL - తెలుగుTAM - தமிழ்Drag according to your convenienceET NOW RADIOET NOWTIMES NOWSummaryPricesFinancialsReportsCompany InfoNewsCompetitorsET Buzz Tracker NewDirectors ReportChairman's SpeechFinished Products5Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd.BSE:500547  |  NSE:BPCLEQ  |  58888:bpcl  |  IND:Refineries  |  ISIN code:INE029A01011  |  SECT:PetroleumPREMARKETBSE LIVEChange:Volume:Open:Prv. Close:Today:52-Wk:Bid:()Offer:()NSE LIVEChange:Volume:Open:Prv. Close:Today:52-Wk:Bid:()Offer:()You can view the entire product mix with sales quantity & value along with percentage contribution from each individual product for Bharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd.Finished ProductsPRODUCT NAMEUNITSINSTALLED CAPACITYPRODUCTION QUANTITYSALES QUANTITYSALES VALUE (Rs Cr.)Petroleum ProductsN.A.0.000.000.00215227.9700SubsidyN.A.0.000.000.001598.4900Oil CrudeN.A.0.000.000.00979.3500Other Operating RevenueN.A.0.000.000.00205.2300Get a QuoteLatest From ETLatest From WebMost ReadMost SharedMost CommentedThese 70 stocks are ready to go downhill; so say MACD chartsCochin Shipyard IPO kicks off: Does it offer better value than its listed peers?15 money-making ideas for August with a budget below Rs 1,500What’s really driving market surge? Earnings numbers have a story to tell3,000% returns in 5 yrs! These 12 stocks have more steam leftMore »What took West 300 years, China 30 years, India will achieve in just 10 years: Mukesh AmbaniAirtel bleeds Rs 550 crore per quarter as Ambani’s Jio triggers tsunami of callsRs 85,000 crore goes up in smoke in a day! How ITC made investors an unhappy lotTax ratio similar to Rwanda, but wants to beat China: That’s IndiaEffect of GST is going to be far deeper than the tax itself: Rakesh JhunjhunwalaMore »Tech Mahindra Q1 beats profit expectations on wage deferments, forex gain3,000% returns in 5 yrs! These 12 stocks have more steam leftF&O: Nifty logs 6% gain in July; next stop is at 10,250Market Now: Bank stocks surge as SBI cuts savings rate15 money-making ideas for August with a budget below Rs 1,500More »ET Speed NewsManyataRao MARKET SESSION UPDATE
TOP GAINERS
EICHERMOT +4.88%, IBULHSGFIN +4.83%, TECHM +4.09%, BPCL +2.93%, BOSCHLTD +2.88% JUST REGISTER HERE goo.gl/1Pi8cK
 1 hour agoBestTradingtips BUY BPCL FUT AUG ABOVE 478 TG 479-481-485 WITH SL 474
Just join on whatsapp Visit - goo.gl/ywBFZH 5 days agoBestTradingtips SELL BPCL FUT BELOW 465.5 TG 464.5-462-459.5 WITH SL 468.5
Get More Live Updates Just Give Miss call @7879881122  7 days agoManyataRao TOP GAINERS

BAJAJ-AUTO +2.47%, BPCL +2.30%, HINDALCO +2.30%, INFY+2.25%, TATAMOTORS+2.15% 21 days agoAsvi Lupin, Tata Power, SBI, BPCL, Bajaj Auto, Aurobindo Pharma and Sun Pharma stood as early gainers. 21 days ago» More speed newsMarkets TrackerSENSEXNIFTYGold (MCX) (Rs/10g.)MARKETNOWLASTVIEWEDYOURWATCHLISTYOURPORTFOLIOBSENSEClick here to see performance of Sensex CompaniesClick here to see performance of Nifty CompaniesQuick LinksBharat Petroleum Corporation Ltd.  Quick LinksStock SummaryCash Flow StatementHalf Yearly ResultsCapital StructureChairman's SpeechCompany HistoryLocationsDividendsSplitsCompetitorsHistorical PricesBalance SheetNine Monthly ResultsShareholding PatternFinished ProductsBackground InformationBoard MeetingsBonusIPO InformationProfit and Loss AccountQuarterly ResultsYearly ResultsDirectors ReportCompany ManagementListing InformationAGM/EGMRightsNewsMarkets Quick LinksDaily GainersMost Active - VolumeIndicesNew 52Wk HighNear 52Wk HighOnly BuyersFII ActivityWeekly GainersMonthly GainersSensex ConstituentsFall from Day's HighDaily LosersMost Active - ValueLive AnnouncementsNew 52Wk LowNear 52Wk LowOnly SellersMF ActivityWeekly LosersMonthly LosersNifty ConstituentsUp from Day's LowMore from marketsMarkets HomeStocks HomeMarket LiveIPO/FPO/Rights IssueViews and RecommendationsSharebazziPortfolioET 500 CompaniesQuarterly Results (Earnings)View Complete Site Map  »Date Sources:Live BSE and NSE Quotes Service: TickerPlant | Corporate Data, F&O Data & Historical price volume data: Dion Global Solutions Ltd.BSE Quotes and Sensex are real-time and licensed from the Bombay Stock Exchange. NSE Quotes and Nifty are also real time and licenced from National Stock Exchange. All times stamps are reflecting IST (Indian Standard Time).By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service and Privacy Policy.Get a QuoteBrowse CompaniesABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ|123456789Browse Mutual FundsABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ

Bharat Petroleum Corp Ltd | Business | Energy And Resource














 





ExploreUploadSign inJoinclose user settings menuOptionsJoinSign InUpload




Bharat Petroleum Corp LtdUploaded by Raman Kumar JhaRelated InterestsBusinessEnergy And ResourceRating and Stats0.0 (0)Document ActionsDownloadShare or Embed DocumentEmbedView MoreCopyright: Attribution Non-Commercial (BY-NC)Download as DOC, PDF, TXT or read online from ScribdFlag for inappropriate content
Recommended DocumentsDocuments Similar To Bharat Petroleum Corp LtdBHARAT PETROLEUMby Mansi AroraBpcl Project Reportby enrique_sumitFinal Copy of Summer Internship @Bharat Petroleum Corp.ltd.by PRATICK RANJAN GAYENDocuments About BusinessAdministrative Assistant Resume Sampleby resume7.comBusiness Entity Planning Worksheetby RocketLawyerMilitary Resume Sampleby resume7.comMore From Raman Kumar Jhamarket size and rear and front eng. market analysisby Raman Kumar JhaComparison of Three Wheeler industryby Raman Kumar JhaIndia is a Booming Automobile Industryby Raman Kumar Jha
Screen Reader Compatibility InformationDue to the method this document is displayed on the page, screen readers may not read the content correctly. For a better experience, please download the original document and view it in the native application on your computer.


 





 

A

SUMMER TRAINING REPORT 

ON

“ 

REQUIREMENTS OF L.P.G. GAS PRODUCT IN INDUSTRIES ANDBAZAAR (RETAIL) POTENTIAL ASSESMENT

 .” 

AT

BHARATPETROLEUMCORPORATION LTD.

JAIPUR, RAJASTHAN.PREPARED BY

RAMAN KUMAR JHA.

TAXILA BUSINESS SCHOOL MANSAROWAR JAIPUR.BATCH 2010-2012.UNDER THE GUIDANCE OF

 PROF. RAKHI ARORA. MR.SHISHIR KUMAR.(Assistant professor) (Territory manager)

 INTERNAL GUIDE. COMPANY GUIDE .

AS A PARTIAL FULFILLMENT PGDBM

PROGRAM 

OF T.B.S.

TAXILA BUSINESS SCHOOL

JAIPUR, RAJASTHAN.3
























 

CONTENTS



CERTIFICATE.



DECLARATION.



ACKNOWLEDGEMENT.



ABSTRACT.

SECTION 1

INTRODUCTION

1.1COMPANY PROFILE.

1.1. A. BRIEF AND HISTORY.1.1. B. ORGANISATIONAL STURTURE.1.1. C. MARKETING.1.1. D. FINANCE & ECONOMY.1.1. D. HUMAN RESOURCE.1.1. E. OPERATIONS.1.1. F. RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT.

1.2 INDUSTRY PROFILE. 

1.2. A. L.P.G. INDUSTRY1.2 L.P.G. INDUSTRIAL USES.1.2. B. BRIEF ABOUT THE COMPETITORS.

SECTION 02

OBJECTIVES, SCOPES, RESEARCH METHODOLOGY, DATA ANALYSIS,FINDINGS AND CONCLUSIONS

.

2.1. OBJECTIVE OF THE STUDY.2.2. SCOPES AND LIMITATION.2.3. RESEARCH METHODOLOGY.2.4. DATA ANALYSIS.2.4. A. INDUSTRY (BUSINESS-TO-BUSINESS).2.4. B. RETAIL MARKET (BAZAAR).2.5. FINDINGS.

RecommendationConclusion

ANNEXURE.

INDUSTRY (BUSINESS TO BUSINESS).RETAIL MARKET (BAZAAR).QUESTIONNAIR THROUGH WHICH SURVEY WAS CONDUCTED

REFERENCES.

4
























 

CERTIFICATE .

5






























































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































Sign up to vote on this titleUsefulNot usefulClose DialogAre you sure?This action might not be possible to undo. Are you sure you want to continue?CANCELOKClose DialogGet the full title to continueGet the full title to continue reading from where you left off, or restart the preview.Restart preview






